रजिस्ट्री सं. डी.एल.- 33004/99 REGD. No. 0. L.-33004/99 


Jiitd = राज्जपतनत्र 
Che Gazette of Jndia 


Ooh. -ST. Wet. -37.-2032024-253270 
CG-DL-E-2032024-253270 


असाधारण 
EXTRAORDINARY 


भाग Wi—ave 4 
PART IJ—Section 4 


प्राधिकार से प्रकाशित 
PUBLISHED BY AUTHORITY 


a. 89] नई दिल्ली, मंगलवार, मार्च 9, 2024/फाल्गुन 29, 945 
No. 89] NEW DELHI, TUESDAY, MARCH 9, 2024/PHALGUNA 29, 945 


राष्ट्रीय होम्योपैथी आयोग 
अधिसूचना 
नई दिल्‍ली, 8 मार्च, 2024 


फा. सं. 3-42/2024/एनसीएच/एचईबी/पीजी. रजि.--राष्ट्रीय होम्योपैथी आयोग अधिनियम, 2020 (2020 का 
45) की धारा 46 और धारा 26 के साथ पठित धारा 55 की उप-धारा (4) और उपधारा (2) के खंड (द) द्वारा प्रदत्त 
शक्तियों का प्रयोग करते हुए और होम्योपैथी (स्नातकोत्तर डिग्री पाठ्यक्रम) एम.डी. (होम्यो.) विनियम, 7989 का 
अधिक्रमण करते हुए, ऐसे अधिक्रमण से पहले किए गए या किए जाने वाले कार्यों के लोप के सिवाय, आयोग एतट्टारा 
निम्नलिखित विनियम बनाता है, नामत: - 


4. संक्षिप्त शीर्षक एवं प्रारंभ - () इन विनियमों को राष्ट्रीय होम्योपैथी आयोग (होम्योपैथी स्नातकोत्तर डिग्री पाठ्यक्रम 
- होम्योपैथी में डॉक्टर ऑफ मेडिसिन) विनियम, 2024 कहा जाएगा। 


(2) ये विनियम भारत के राजपत्र में प्रकाशन की तिथि से प्रवृत्त होंगे। 
2. परिभाषाएँ- (4) इन विनियमों में, जब तक कि संदर्भ से अन्यथा अपेक्षा न हो- 
क) “अधिनियम" से राष्ट्रीय होम्योपैथी आयोग अधिनियम, 2020 (2020 का 5) अभिष्रेत है; 
ख) “अनुलग्नक” से इन विनियमों के साथ संलग्न एक अनुलग्नक ATA है; 
ग) “परिशिष्ट” से इन विनियमों के साथ संलग्न परिशिष्ट अभिप्रेत है; 


a) “ऐच्छिक" से अभिप्रेत है छात्र की शैक्षणिक अभिव्यक्ति को समृद्ध करने के लिए तैयार किए गए अध्ययन का एक 
वैकल्पिक पाठ्यक्रम; 


( 
( 
( 
( 


230 GI/2024 (.) 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


(=) “एम.डी. (होम्योपैथी) से अभिप्रेत है इन विनियमों में यथा-विनिर्दिष्ट होम्योपैथी (होम्योपैथी में डॉक्टर ऑफ 


मेडिसिन) में स्नातकोत्तर डिग्री अथवा उपाधि; 


(a) "पाख्यविवरण (सिलेबस)" में इन विनियमों के तहत राष्ट्रीय हौम्योपैथी आयोग द्वारा यथा विनिर्दिष्ट अध्ययन 


(2) 


के लिए पाठ्यचर्या अंतर्विष्ट है। 


इन विनियमों में प्रयुक्त शब्दों एवं अभिव्यक्तियों को यहां पारिभाषित नहीं किया गया है परंतु उन्हें 
अधिनियम में पारिभाषित किया गया है, उनका वही अर्थ होगा जो उन्हें अधिनियम में क्रमश: पारिभिषित 
किया गया है। 


3. होम्योपैथी स्नातकोत्तर प्रशैक्षणिक कार्यक्रम का उद्देश्य - होम्योपैथी स्नातकोत्तर प्रशैक्षणिक कार्यक्रम का उद्देश्य निम्न 
प्रकार होगा, AAT: - 


(क) 


(ख) 


(ग) 


(घ) 


(ड) 


होम्योपैथी की महत्ता को राष्ट्रीय प्राथमिकताओं और समुदाय की स्वास्थ्य आवश्यकताओं के संदर्भ में मान्यता 
देना; 


होम्योपैथी की प्रैक्टिस नैतिकता और प्रणाली (सिस्टम) के सिद्धांतों के अनुरूप करना; 

स्वतः:-निर्देशित छात्र के रूप में कौशल विकसित करना, निरंतर शिक्षा आवश्यकताओं को मान्यता देना, 
उपयुक्त अधिगम संसाधनों का चयन एवं उपयोग करना। 

शोध प्रविधि अर्थात रिसर्च मैथोडोलॉजी एवं जानपदिक विज्ञान के मूलभूत सिद्धांतों में अपनी अभिक्षमता को 
प्रदर्शित करना और संबद्ध प्रकाशित शोध साहित्य का विस्तृत रूप से विश्लेषण करना। 


किसी दिए गए मामले में स्वास्थ्य के सामाजिक, आर्थिक, पर्यावरणीय, जैवकीय और भावनात्मक निर्धारकों की 
पहचान करना, और थेराप्यूटिक अथवा चिकित्साविधान, पुनर्वास, रोकथाम और प्रोत्साहक उपायों या 
रणनीतियों की योजना बनाते हुए उनको ध्यान में रखना; 


स्वास्थ्य समस्याओं का निदान करना और नैदानिक मूल्यांकन, जांचों आदि के आधार पर और होम्योपैथी के 
दायरे के अनुसार प्रबंध करना; 


उचित शोध प्रविधि का प्रयोग करके शोधनिबंध (डिसर्टेशन) या शोध परियोजना शुरु करके वैज्ञानिक कौशल 
का प्रदर्शन करना; 


होम्योपैथी के साथ राष्ट्रीय स्वास्थ्य कार्यक्रमों के कार्यान्वयन में सौंपी गई भूमिका को प्रभावशाली ढंग से और 
जिम्मेदारी से निभाना; 


आयुष क्लिनिक या अस्पताल या क्षेत्र/फील्ड में पर्याप्त प्रबंधकीय कौशल का प्रदर्शन करते हुए चुनी हुई या 
सौंपी गई स्वास्थ्य परिचर्या सेवाओं को व्यवस्थित करना और पर्यवेक्षण करना; और 


होम्योपैथी चिकित्सा छात्रों के शैक्षणिक के लिए लागू शैक्षणिक विधियों और तकनीकों का उपयोग करने में 
उनमें कौशल विकसित करना। 


4. ख््रातकोत्तर पाठ्यक्रम के संघटक - स्नातकोत्तर पाख्यचर्या प्रत्येक विशेषता वाले विषय अथवा प्रत्येक स्पेशिएलिटी 
सब्जेक्ट के लिए पारिभाषित परिणामों के आधार पर अभिक्षमता आधारित एकीकृत फ्रेमवर्क में स्थापित की जाएगी। अन्य 
विशिष्ट संघटकों के अलावा, इसमें निम्नलिखित शामिल होंगे, अर्थात: - 


सैद्धांतिक और व्यावहारिक ज्ञान; 
विशेषज्ञता वाले विषय से संबंधित व्यावहारिक, नैदानिक (क्लिनिकल), समुदाय और प्रबंधन संबंधी कौशल; 
शोधनिबंध कार्य पूरा करना; 


किसी शोध लेख का किसी पीयर-रिव्यूड वैज्ञानिक जर्नल में प्रकाशन या शोध आलेख का प्रस्तुतीकरण 
संबंधित सोसायटी के राष्ट्रीय सम्मेलन में करना; 


अंतर्वैयक्तिक और संचार कौशलों सहित सॉफ्ट कौशल और विशेषताएं; 
शोध प्रविधि, चिकित्सा नैतिकता और चिकित्सा-विधिक पहलुओं में प्रशैक्षणिक; और 


[भाग ता--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 3 


(छ) पूरे व्यावसायिक जीवन में निरंतर सीखने की प्रतिबद्धता एवं व्यावसायिकता। 


5. प्रवेश के लिए पात्रता मानदंड और प्रवेश की प्रक्रिया- () एम.डी. (होम्योपैथी) पाठ्यक्रम में प्रवेश के लिए पात्रता 
निम्नलिखित होगी, अर्थात: - 


(क) किसी भी उम्मीदवार को एम.डी. (होम्योपैथी) पाठ्यक्रम में प्रवेश नहीं दिया जाएगा जब तक उसके पास 
निम्नलिखित डिग्री न हो:- 


6) एक वर्ष की अनिवार्य रोटेटरी इन्टर्नशिप सहित पांच वर्ष और छह महीने की अवधि के अध्ययन 
पाठ्यक्रम को उत्तीर्ण करने के बाद, होम्योपैथी में बैचलर ऑफ होम्योपैथिक मेडिसिन और सर्जरी या 
समकक्ष अर्हता, जो अधिनियम के उपबंधों के तहत अनुसूची या चिकित्सा अहता मान्यता सूची में 
शामिल हो; या 


Gi) कम से कम दो वर्ष की अवधि के अध्ययन पाठ्यक्रम को उत्तीर्ण करने के बाद, होम्योपैथी में बैचलर ऑफ 
होम्योपैथिक मेडिसिन और सर्जरी (ise डिग्री) या समकक्ष अर्हता, जो होम्योपैथी केंद्रीय परिषद 
अधिनियम, 973 (973 का 59) की दूसरी अनुसूची में शामिल हो; 


(ख) उम्मीदवार राज्य बोर्ड या परिषद, जैसा भी मामला हो, के साथ पंजीकृत हो। 


(2) सभी होम्योपैथिक सत्रातकों के लिए समान प्रवेश परीक्षा होगी, नामत:, प्रत्येक शैक्षणिक वर्ष में चिकित्सा 
संस्थान में स्नातकोत्तर पाठ्यक्रम में प्रवेश के लिए अखिल भारतीय आयुष ख्लातकोत्तर प्रवेश परीक्षण (ए आई 
ए पी जी ई टी) परीक्षा, जो राष्ट्रीय होम्योपैथी आयोग द्वारा नामित प्राधिकारी द्वारा आयोजित की जाएगी: 


बशर्ते कि विदेशी नागरिक उम्मीदवारों के लिए, केंद्र सरकार द्वारा अनुमोदित कोई अन्य समकक्ष ASAT को प्रवेश के 
लिए अनुमति दी जा सकेगी और इस उप-विनियम के उपरोक्त उपबंध लागू नहीं होंगे। 


(3) कोई भी उम्मीदवार, जो उक्त शैक्षणिक वर्ष के लिए आयोजित स्नातकोत्तर पाठ्यक्रम के लिए अखिल भारतीय 
आयुष स्नातकोत्तर प्रवेश परीक्षा में 50वीं परसेंटाइल से कम अंक प्राप्त करता है, के प्रवेश के लिए विचार नहीं 
किया जाएगा: 


बशर्ते कि अनुसूचित जाति, अनुसूचित जनजाति और अन्य पिछड़ा वर्ग के उम्मीदवारों जिन्होंने न्यूनतम 40वीं 
परसेंटाइल प्राप्त किए हैं और दिव्यांग व्यक्तियों के अधिकार अधिनियम, 2046 (2046 का 49) के तहत निर्दिष्ट दिव्यांगों के 
लिए न्यूनतम अंक सामान्य वर्ग के मामले में न्यूनतम 45वीं परसेंटाइल और अनुसूचित जाति, अनुसूचित जनजाति और 
अन्य पिछड़ा वर्ग के मामले में न्यूनतम 40वीं परसेंटाइल प्राप्त किए हैं, उन्हें प्रवेश के लिए विचार किया जाएगा: 


बशर्ते यह और कि जब संबंधित श्रेणियों में पर्याप्त संख्या में उम्मीदवार स्नातकोत्तर पाठ्यक्रमों में प्रवेश हेतु किसी भी 
शैक्षणिक वर्ष के लिए आयोजित अखिल भारतीय आयुष ख्लातकीत्तर प्रवेश परीक्षा में न्यूनतम अंक प्राप्त करने में विफल रहते 
हैं, तो आयोग केंद्र सरकार के परामर्श के साथ, संबंधित श्रेणी के उम्मीदवारों के लिए स्नातकोत्तर पाठ्यक्रम में प्रवेश के लिए 
आवश्यक अंकों को कम कर सकेगा और आयोग द्वारा कम किए गए अंक केवल उसी शैक्षणिक वर्ष के लिए लागू होंगे। 


(4) नामित प्राधिकारी द्वारा शैक्षणिक वर्ष के लिए आयोजित अखिल भारतीय आयुष ख्लातकोत्तर प्रवेश परीक्षा 
में प्राप्त अंकों के आधार पर एक अखिल भारतीय सामान्य योग्यता अथवा मेरिट सूची के साथ-साथ पात्र 
उम्मीदवारों की राज्य-वार योग्यता सूची तैयार की जाएगी और संबंधित श्रेणी के भीतर उम्मीदवार को 
उक्त योग्यता सूची से स्नातकोत्तर पाठ्यक्रम में प्रवेश के लिए विचार किया जाएगा। 


(5) सरकारी संस्थान, सरकारी सहायता प्राप्त संस्थान और निजी संस्थानों में प्रवेश के लिए सीट मैट्रिक्स 
अखिल भारतीय कोटा के लिए पंद्रह प्रतिशत और राज्य कोटा एवं संघ राज्य क्षेत्र कोटा, जैसा भी मामला 
हो, के लिए पचासी प्रतिशत होगा: 


बशर्ते कि, - 


(क) मानद (डीम्ड) विश्वविद्यालयों में प्रवेश के प्रयोजन के लिए अखिल भारतीय कोटा सरकारी और निजी दोनों के 
लिए एक सौ प्रतिशत होगा; 


(ख) पंद्रह प्रतिशत से अधिक अखिल भारतीय कोटा सीट वाले विश्वविद्यालय और संस्थान उक्त कोटा को अक्षुण्ण 
रखेंगे; 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


(ग) सरकारी और सरकारी सहायता प्राप्त संस्थानों में वार्षिक स्वीकृत सीट संख्या का पांच प्रतिशत, दिव्यांग जन 
अधिकार अधिनियम, 2046 (2046 का 49) के प्रावधानों के तहत विनिर्दिष्ट दिव्यांगता वाले उम्मीदवारों 
द्वारा भरा जाएगा। 


स्पष्टीकरण - इस विनियम के प्रयोजनों के लिए, दिव्यांग जन अधिकार अधिनियम, 2046 (206 का 49) की 
अनुसूची में निहित निर्दिष्ट दिव्यांगता wee "a" में निर्दिष्ट है और होम्योपैथी में निर्दिष्ट दिव्यांगता के साथ किसी 
पाठ्यक्रम की पढ़ाई करने के लिए उम्मीदवारों की पात्रता Wee "a" में निर्दिष्ट दिशानिर्देशों के अनुसार होगी। यदि 
किसी विशेष श्रेणी में दिव्यांग जन के लिए आरक्षित सीटें उम्मीदवारों की अनुपलब्धता के कारण खाली रह जाती हैं, तो उन 
सीटों को संबंधित श्रेणी के लिए वार्षिक स्वीकृत सीटों में शामिल किया जाएगा। 


(6) 


(7) 


(8) 
(क) 
(ख) 


राज्य सरकार, विश्वविद्यालय, ट्रस्ट, सोसायटी, अल्पसंख्यक संस्थान, निगम या कंपनी द्वारा स्थापित 
संस्थानों सहित राज्यों और संघ राज्य क्षेत्रों में सभी होम्योपैथिक शैक्षणिक संस्थानों में स्नातकोत्तर पाठ्यक्रम 
में प्रवेश के लिए राज्य और संघ राज्य क्षेत्र के पचासी प्रतिशत कोटा की काउंसलिंग के लिए नामित 
प्राधिकारी संबंधित राज्य सरकार या संघ राज्य क्षेत्र प्रशासन के संबद्ध नियमों और विनियमों के अनुसार 
संबंधित राज्य या संघ राज्य क्षेत्र, जैसा भी मामला हो, का होगा। 


अखिल भारतीय कोटा के तहत सीटों के साथ-साथ केंद्र सरकार द्वारा स्थापित सभी होम्योपैथी शैक्षणिक 
संस्थानों के लिए स्नातकोत्तर पाठ्यक्रम में प्रवेश हेतु काउंसलिंग केंद्र सरकार द्वारा नामित प्राधिकारी द्वारा 
आयोजित की जाएगी :- 


प्रवेश निम्न प्रक्रिया में दिया जाएगा :- 


विदेशी नागरिकों के सिवाय, विनियम 5 के उप-विनियम (ख) के अनुसार काउंसलिंग के माध्यम से; 
इन विनियमों में निर्दिष्ट प्रक्रिया के सिवाय, कोई अन्य प्रक्रिया को किसी भी संस्थान द्वारा अनुमोदित नहीं 


किया जाएगा और इन विनियमों के विनियम 5 के प्रावधानों का उल्लंघन करके छात्रों को प्रवेश देने वाले 
किसी भी संस्थान को आगे के शैक्षणिक वर्ष के लिए प्रवेश लेने की अनुमति से वंचित कर दिया जाएगा; 


(9) 


(I0) 


() 


(I2) 


(I3) 


(I4) 


चिकित्सा संस्थानों को प्रवेश दिए गए सभी छात्रों की सूची आयोग द्वारा प्रवेश के लिए समय-समय पर 
नियत कटऑफ तिथि को सायंकाल छह बजे या उससे पहले उसके द्वारा निर्दिष्ट प्रारूप में जमा करनी 
होगी; 

चिकित्सा संस्थानों को प्रवेश दिए गए उन छात्रों की सूची भी उपलब्ध करानी होगी जिन्हें विदेशी 
नागरिकों के सिवाय, काउंसलिंग प्राधिकारी (केंद्र, राज्य या संघ राज्य क्षेत्र, जैसा भी मामला हो) के 
माध्यम से सीटें आवंटित की गई हैं। 


जो उम्मीदवार उप-विनियम (3) के तहत विनिर्दिष्ट न्यूनतम पात्रता अंक प्राप्त करने में विफल रहा है, उसे 
उक्त शैक्षणिक वर्ष में स्नातकोत्तर पाठ्यक्रम में प्रवेश नहीं दिया जाएगा। 


कोई भी प्राधिकारी या चिकित्सा संस्थान इन विनिययमों में निर्दिष्ट मानदंडों या प्रक्रिया के उल्लंघन में 
किसी भी उम्मीदवार को ख्लातकोत्तर पाठ्यक्रम में प्रवेश नहीं देगा और इन विनियमों के उल्लंघन में किए 
गए किसी भी प्रवेश को आयोग द्वारा तुरंत रद्द कर दिया जाएगा। 


प्राधिकारी या चिकित्सा संस्थान, जो इन विनियमों के प्रावधानों के उल्लंघन में किसी भी छात्र को प्रवेश 
देता है, तो वह अधिनियम के विनियम 28 के उप-विनियम (4) के खंड (A) के तहत विहित कार्रवाई के 
लिए उत्तरदायी होगा। 

चिकित्सा संस्थान प्रवेश बंद होने के एक महीने के भीतर प्रवेश दिए गए छात्रों की अंतिम सूची आयोग को 
भेजेगा और आयोग किसी भी समय पर नियमों के प्रावधानों का अनुपालन सुनिश्चित करने के लिए 
चिकित्सा संस्थान का सत्यापन करेगा। 


6. अध्ययन पाठ्यक्रम.- (4) होम्योपैथी स्नातकोत्तर डिग्री पाठ्यक्रम के लिए विशेषज्ञता के विषय निम्नलिखित होंगे, अर्थात: 


(क) होम्योपैथिक मटेरिया मेडिका; 
(ख) ऑर्गेनन ऑफ मेडिसिन और होम्योपैथिक फिलॉसफी; 


[भाग ता--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 5 


(ग) होम्योपैथिक रिपर्टरी और केस टे्किंग 

(घ) होम्योपैथिक फार्मेसी 

(ड.) चिकित्सा का अभ्यास 

(च) बाल चिकित्सा 

(छ) मनोचिकित्सा 

(ज) सामुदायिक चिकित्सा 

(झ) त्वचाविज्ञान। 

(2) पाठ्यक्रम नियमित, पूर्णकालिक और तीन वर्ष की अवधि का होगा। 
( 


) छात्र नियमित अध्ययन करेगा और परिसर में संस्थागत-नौकरी अथवा हाउस-जॉब के एक वर्ष के दौरान 
निवासित रहेगा और उसे विनियमन 7 के प्रावधानों के अनुसार प्रशैक्षणिक दिया जाएगा: 


बशर्ते कि छात्र अपने प्रवेश की तारीख से अधिकतम छह वर्ष की अवधि के भीतर एक विशेषज्ञता वाले विषय में 
एम.डी. (होम्योपैथी) का पाठ्यक्रम पूरा करेगा। 


(4) प्रत्येक कार्यक्रम को दो भागों में विभाजित किया जाएगा, अर्थात प्रत्येक अठारह महीने की अवधि के क्रमशः 
एम.डी. (होम्योपैथी) भाग-] और एम.डी. (होम्योपैथी) भाग-॥ । 


(5) प्रत्येक कार्यक्रम के भाग-| के अंतर्गत पाठ्यक्रम निम्न प्रकार होंगे: - 
(क) एम.डी. (होम्योपैथी) होम्योपैथिक मटेरिया मेडिका - 
6) होम्योपैथिक मटेरिया मेडिका के मूलभूत सिद्धांत; 
60) टहोम्योपैथिक मटेरिया मेडिका में नैदानिक चिकित्सा के मूलभूत सिद्धांत; और 
Gi) शोध प्रविधि एवं जैव सांख्यिकी। 
(ख) एम.डी. (होम्योपैथी) ऑर्गेनन ऑफ मेडिसिन और होम्योपैथिक फिलॉसफी- 
@ आऑर्गेनन ऑफ मेडिसिन और होम्योपैथिक फिलॉसफी के मूल सिद्धांत; 
0) आऑर्गनन ऑफ मेडिसिन और होम्योपैथिक फिलॉसफी में नैदानिक चिकित्सा के मूलभूत सिद्धांत; और 
(0) शोध प्रविधि और जैव सांखियिकी। 
(ग) एम.डी. (होम्योपैथी) होम्योपैथिक रिपर्टरी और केस टेकिंग - 
6) _ रिपर्टरी और केस टेकिंग के मूलभूत सिद्धांत; 
0) टहोम्योपैथिक रिपर्टरी और केस टेकिंग में नैदानिक चिकित्सा के मूलभूत सिद्धांत; और 
Gi) शोध प्रविधि एवं जैव सांख्यिकी। 
(घ) एम.डी. (होम्योपैथी) होम्योपैथिक फार्मेसी - 
6) होम्योपैथी फार्मेसी के मूलभूत सिद्धांत; 
(0) होम्योपैथिक फार्मेसी में नैदानिक चिकित्सा के मूलभूत सिद्धांत; और 
(ii) शोध प्रविधि एवं जैव सांख्यिकी। 
(ड.) एम.डी. (होम्योपैथी) चिकित्सा अभ्यास - 
6) चिकित्सा अभ्यास के मूल सिद्धांत; 
0) चिकित्सा अभ्यास में होम्योपैथी के मूल सिद्धांत; और 
Gi) शोध प्रविधि एवं जैव सांख्यिकी। 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


(7) 


(8) 


एम.डी. (होम्योपैथी) बाल चिकित्सा - 

@ बाल चिकित्सा के मूल सिद्धांत; 

(0) बाल चिकित्सा में होम्योपैथी के मूल सिद्धांत; और 
Gi) शोध प्रविधि एवं जैव सांख्यिकी। 

एम.डी. (होम्योपैथी) मनोचिकित्सा - 

60) मनोचिकित्सा के मूल सिद्धांत; 

0) मनोचिकित्सा में होम्योपैथी के मूल सिद्धांत; और 
Gi) शोध प्रविधि एवं जैव सांख्यिकी। 


(ज) एम.डी. (होम्योपैथी) सामुदायिक चिकित्सा - 


(झ) 


@ सामुदायिक चिकित्सा के मूल सिद्धांत; 
0) सामुदायिक चिकित्सा में होम्योपैथी के मूल सिद्धांत; और 
Gi) शोध प्रविधि एवं जैव सांख्यिकी। 


एम.डी. (होम्योपैथी) त्वचाविज्ञान - 

60) त्वचाविज्ञान के मूल सिद्धांत; 

(0) त्वचाविज्ञान में होम्योपैथी के मूलभूत सिद्धांत; और 
(ii) शोध प्रविधि एवं जैव सांख्यिकी। 


(6) एम.डी. (होम्योपैथी) भाग-ा परीक्षा के लिए, केवल दो प्रश्नपत्रों के साथ मुख्य विशेषता वाला विषय होगा। 


7. प्रशैक्षणिक का तरीका (पैटर्न) - () होम्योपैथी पोस्ट-ग्रेजुएट डिग्री इन स्पेशिएलिटी सब्जेक्ट के लिए प्रशैक्षणिक की 
अवधि परीक्षा अवधि सहित तीन पूर्ण वर्ष होगी। 


(2) 


(क) 
(ख) 


(3) 


(4) 


स्नातकोत्तर प्रशैक्षणिक की शुरुआत में, सात दिनों का एक प्रवेश कार्यक्रम (इंडक्शन प्रोग्राम) होगा जिसमें 
निम्न शामिल होगा - 


स्नातकोत्तर पाठ्यक्रम के बारे में अभिविन्यास; और 
विषय विशेषज्ञों के साथ संबंधित विषय विशेषज्ञता में कार्यशाला। 


होम्योपैथी स्नातकोत्तर डिग्री पाठ्यक्रम के सभी विशेषज्ञता वाले विषयों में स्नातकोत्तर छात्रों को एम.डी. 
(होम्योपैथी) भाग-। में जूनियर रेजिडेंट और एम.डी. (होम्योपैथी) भाग-॥ में सीनियर रेजिडेंट कहा जाएगा। 


स्नातकोत्तर पाठ्यक्रम के दौरान, नैदानिक प्रशैक्षणिक पर अधिक जोर दिया जाएगा और उपदेशात्मक व्याख्यान 
पर कम दिया जाएगा। 


छात्र को सेमिनार, समूह चर्चाओं, नैदानिक बैठकों और जर्नल क्लब बैठकों में भाग लेना चाहिए। 
छात्र को विनियम 8 में वर्णन के अनुसार एक शोधनिबंध लिखना होगा। 


छात्र को अस्पताल परिसर में ड्यूटी रोस्टर के अनुसार उसकी देखभाल के तहत दाखिल मरीजों के प्रबंधन और 
उपचार हेतु उच्च जिम्मेदारी दी जाएगी। 


छात्र स्नातक छात्रों या इन्टर्न के शैक्षणिक और प्रशैक्षणिक में भाग लेगा। 


छात्रों को एक ई-लॉग बुक या लॉग बुक कायम रखनी होगी और प्रत्येक विशेषज्ञता वाले विषय की जरूरतों को 
ध्यान में रखते हुए प्रयोगशाला या नैदानिक कार्य करने होंगे। 


[भागवता--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण yf 


(0) एम.डी. होम्योपैथी पाठ्यक्रम की पढ़ाई करने वाला छात्र पूरी अवधि में संस्थान के संबंधित विभाग में एक 
नियमित छात्र के रूप में अध्ययन करेगा। होम्योपैथी स्नातकोत्तर डिग्री कार्यक्रम की पढ़ाई करने के दौरान किसी 
भी छात्र को किसी प्रयोगशाला या महाविद्यालय या उद्योग या फार्मेसी में कार्य करने की अनुमति नहीं है। 
होम्योपैथी स्नातकोत्तर डिग्री पाठ्यक्रम की अवधि के दौरान कोई भी छात्र भारत या विदेश में किसी अन्य 
विश्वविद्यालय में किसी अन्य नियमित डिग्री कार्यक्रम में प्रवेश नहीं लेगा। 


(() स््रातकोत्तर छात्रों को संस्थान के प्रमुख की अनुमति से एम.डी. (होम्योपैथी) पाठ्यक्रम के लिए सौंपे गए कार्य 
या कर्तव्यों में कोई व्यवधान के बिना विभिन्न कौशलों में सुधार लाने के लिए मुक्त दूरस्थ अधिगम या 
ऑनलाइन मोड के माध्यम से विश्वविद्यालय अनुदान आयोग द्वारा अनुमोदित प्रमाणपत्र या डिप्लोमा 
पाठ्यक्रमों की अनुमति दी जा सकती है। 


(42) उपस्थिति की गणना के प्रयोजन के लिए प्रत्येक वर्ष को एक इकाई के रूप में लिया जाएगा। 


(43) प्रत्येक छात्र को विभाग या महाविद्यालय या विश्वविद्यालय द्वारा यथा निर्दिष्ट प्रत्येक वर्ष के दौरान 
संगोष्ठियों, सेमिनारों, सम्मेलनों, जर्नल क्लब की बैठकों और व्याख्यानों में अनिवार्य रूप से भाग लेना होगा 
और बिना किसी ta कारण और संस्थान के प्रमुख की पूर्व अनुमति के बिना अनुपस्थित नहीं रहना होगा। 


(4) कोई छात्र जिसने न्यूनतम पचहत्तर प्रतिशत उपस्थिति प्राप्त की है और वह संतोषजनक प्रगति दिखाता है, तो 
उसे क्रमशः एम.डी. (होम्योपैथी) भाग-। और भाग-॥ परीक्षाओं में उपस्थित होने की अनुमति दी जाएगी। 


(5) कोई भी छात्र जो उपरोक्त में उल्लेखित प्रक्रिया में पाठ्यक्रम पूरा करने में विफल रहता है, तो उसे 
विश्वविद्यालय परीक्षाओं में बैठने की अनुमति नहीं दी जाएगी। इस संबंध में संबंधित महाविद्यालय के प्राचार्य 
द्वारा विश्वविद्यालय को एक प्रमाण पत्र भेजा जाएगा। 


(6) प्रत्येक छात्र एम.डी. (होम्योपैथी) के लिए एक ई-लॉग बुक या लॉगबुक (भाग-। और भाग-॥ के लिए अलग- 
अलग) कायम रखेगा और विभाग द्वारा आयोजित प्रशैक्षणिक कार्यक्रमों, जैसे कि जर्नल समीक्षाएं, नैदानिक 
प्रस्तुतीकरणों, सेमिनारों में अपनी सहभागिता को दर्ज करेगा। 


(47) विभागाध्यक्ष और संस्था प्रमुख द्वारा कार्य डायरी की संवीक्षा और प्रमाणन किया जाएगा और प्रैक्टिकल 
परीक्षा के समय पर विश्वविद्यालय में, यथा आवश्यकता, प्रस्तुत की जाएगी। 


(8) छात्र द्वारा प्रस्तुत प्रस्तुतीकरणों के साथ-साथ छात्र द्वारा किए गए परीक्षणों या प्रयोगशाला प्रक्रियाओं के 
विवरण का विशेष रूप से उल्लेख किया जाएगा। 


(9) प्रस्तुतीकरणों का मूल्यांकन संकाय सदस्यों और पीयर्स द्वारा 7 से 40 तक संख्यात्मक रेटिंग स्केल पर किया 
जाएगा। 


8. सिनोप्सिस एवं शोध प्रबंध:- () प्रत्येक छात्र को पाठ्यक्रम शुरु होने की तारीख से नौ महीने की अवधि के भीतर या 
विश्वविद्यालय द्वारा अधिसूचित तिथि से पहले प्रस्तावित शोध अध्ययन के विवरणों सहित एक रूपरेखा (सिनोप्सिस) 
अनुलग्रक में दिए गए विहित प्रोफार्मा में विश्वविद्यालय के सक्षम प्राधिकारी को प्रस्तुत करनी होगी। सिनोप्सिस को गाइड 
अथवा निर्देशक, संबंधित विशेषज्ञता विभाग के प्रमुख के माध्यम से प्रस्तुत करना होगा और संस्थान के प्रमुख द्वारा 
प्रतिहस्ताक्षरित की जाएगी। 


(2) प्रत्येक स्नातकोत्तर छात्र अपने गाइड की देखरेख में विश्वविद्यालय द्वारा निर्दिष्ट प्रारूप में अपने शोध अध्ययन 
के बारे में शोधनिबंध लिखेंगे और विश्वविद्यालय के पास उसे जमा करेंगे। इसमें समस्या की पहचान करना, 
शोध प्रश्न का सूत्रीकरण, हाइपोथिसिस साहित्य की समीक्षा, अध्ययन डिजाइन सहित शोध प्रविधि, शोध 
अध्ययन संचालित करने के परिणामों और विधियों पर चर्चा, डेटा संग्रहण, सांख्यिकीय विश्लेषण और निष्कर्ष 
निकालना शामिल है। 


(3) एम.डी. (होम्योपैथी) डिग्री कोर्स करने वाले प्रत्येक छात्र को एम.डी. (होम्योपैथी) भाग-॥ परीक्षा आयोजित 
करने के छह महीने पहले कम से कम दस हजार शब्दों में अपने स्वयं के शोध अध्ययन के शोधनिबंध की छह 
मुद्रित प्रतियां या संबंधित विश्वविद्यालय की अपेक्षानुसार प्रतियां तथा सॉफ्ट कॉपी, यदि आवश्यक हो, 
विश्वविद्यालय को अनुमोदन के लिए जमा कराना आवश्यक है। 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


(8) 


(9) 


सिनोप्सिस के निरस्तीकरण के मामले में, छात्र को किसी भी स्थिति में एमडी (होम्योपैथी) भाग-। परीक्षा से 
तीन महीने पहले, अपने गाइड के माध्यम से संबंधित विश्वविद्यालय को सिनोप्सिस फिर से जमा करनी होगी। 


प्रस्तावित अध्ययन की सिनोप्सिस को संस्थागत नैतिक समिति से नैतिक अनुमोदन प्राप्त करने के बाद भारत 
की क्लिनिकल ट्रायल्स रजिस्ट्री के साथ पंजीकृत किया जाना चाहिए। 


शोधनिबंध निम्नलिखित शीर्षकों के तहत लिखा जाना चाहिए, अर्थात: - 
सारसंक्षेप (एक्सट्रैक्ट); 
परिचय; 

अध्ययन के लक्ष्य और उद्देश्य; 
साहित्य की समीक्षा; 

सामग्री और विधियाँ; 

प्रेज्षण और परिणाम; 

चर्चा; 

उपसंहार; 

संदर्भ; और 

अनुलग्रक या परिशिटष्ट 


शोधनिबंध का लिखित पाठ पचास पृष्ठों से कम नहीं होगा और संदर्भों, तालिकाओं, आंकड़ों तथा अनुलग्रकों को 
छोड़कर, दो सौ पृष्ठों से अधिक नहीं होगा। इसे बांड पेपर (ए4 आकार, 8.27” x 4.69”) के एक तरफ डबल 
लाइन स्पेसिंग के साथ साफ-सुथरे ढंग से टाइप किया जाना चाहिए और उचित रूप में बाइंड होना चाहिए। 
स्पायरल बाइंडिंग नहीं की जानी चाहिए। शोध निबंध को गाइड एवं सह-गाइड (यदि कोई हो), विभागाध्यक्ष 
और संस्थान प्रमुख द्वारा प्रमाणित किया जाएगा। 


एक छात्र को समय-समय पर संशोधित साहित्यिक चोरी नीति और कॉपीराइट अधिनियम, 7957 (4957 का 
44) का पालन करना होगा और इसके लिए लिखित रूप में एक वचनपत्र देना होगा। 


शोधनिबंध को विश्वविद्यालय में जमा करने के लिए नियत समय से कम से कम तीन महीने पहले गाइड को 
प्रस्तुत किया जाएगा। गाइड या सुपरवाइजर प्रमाणित करेगा कि शोध प्रबंध की सामग्री/कन्टेंट्स उम्मीदवार 
का मूल कार्य है और उसे किसी भी डिग्री या डिप्लोमा प्रदान करने के लिए किसी अन्य विश्वविद्यालय में प्रस्तुत 
नहीं किया गया है। जिस छात्र का शोधनिबंध विश्वविद्यालय द्वारा स्वीकार नहीं किया गया है, तो छात्र द्वारा 
एम.डी. (होम्योपैथी) भाग-॥ परीक्षा से पहले तीन महीने की अवधि के भीतर उसे फिर से जमा करने की 
अनुमति दी जा सकती है। 


(0) छात्र से अपेक्षा की जाती है कि वह अपने शोधनिबंध के आधार पर एक शोध पत्र लिखे और उसे किसी पीयर- 


रिव्यूड वैज्ञानिक जर्नल में प्रस्तुत करे या राष्ट्रीय स्तर के सेमिनार में प्रस्तुत करे। 


9. ख्रातकोत्तर गाइड या परीक्षक के लिए पात्रता - (7) किसी व्यक्ति के पास गाइड या परीक्षक बनने के लिए पात्र होने के 
लिए निम्नलिखित अर्हताएं और अनुभव होना चाहिए, अर्थात: - 


(क) 


(ख) 


एम.डी. (होम्योपैथी), जो होम्योपैथी केंद्रीय परिषद अधिनियम, 7973 (7973 का 59) की दूसरी अनुसूची 
या राष्ट्रीय होम्योपैथी आयोग अधिनियम, 2020 (2020 का 75) की चिकित्सा seat मान्यता सूची में 
शामिल है; और 

होम्योपैथी चिकित्सा संस्थान में शिक्षक, जो संबंधित विषय में स्नातकोत्तर डिग्री प्राप्त करने के बाद संबंधित 
विशेषज्ञता वाले विषय में संयुक्त प्रोफेसर या प्रोफेसर के पद पर है: 


बशर्ते कि जो शिक्षक पहले से स्नातकोत्तर गाइड के रूप में अनुमोदित हैं, वे स्नातकोत्तर गाइड बने रहेंगे। 


[भाग ता--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 9 


बशर्ते कि त्वचा विज्ञान और सामुदायिक चिकित्सा जैसे नए शुरु किए गए विशेषज्ञता वाले विषयों में, वे शिक्षक 
सत्रातकोत्तर गाइड या परीक्षक बनने के लिए पात्र होंगे जो क्रमशः होम्योपैथी में स्नातकोत्तर Heat के साथ चिकित्सा 
अभ्यास और सामुदायिक चिकित्सा के साथ ख््रातकपूर्व विभाग में शिक्षक हैं और एसोसिएट प्रोफेसर अथवा प्रोफेसर के रूप 
में तैनात हैं। यह व्यवस्था इन विनियमों की अधिसूचना की तारीख से दस वर्ष तक लागू रहेगी: 


बशर्ते यह और कि ख्लातकोत्तर विशेषज्ञता का गाइड या सुपरवाइजर केवल उसी विशेषज्ञता के लिए गाइड या 
सुपरवाइजर बना रहेगा और वह एक से अधिक विशेषज्ञता वाले विषयों के लिए गाइड या सुपरवाइजर नहीं बन सकता है। 
(2) सह-गाइड के चयन के लिए शैक्षणिक Aa और अनुभव- खंड (क) में Geetha या राष्ट्रीय होम्योपैथी आयोग 
द्वारा मान्यता प्राप्त महाविद्यालय में सात वर्ष के शैक्षणिक अनुभव के साथ विशेषज्ञता वाले विषय में 
स्नातकोत्तर डिग्री अर्हता: 


(3) किसी विशेष चिकित्सा संस्थान के शैक्षणिक संकाय केवल उसी संस्थान के Maat छात्रों के गाइड या 
सुपरवाइजर बनने के लिए पात्र हैं। विषयवार गाइड सूची संबंधित विश्वविद्यालय द्वारा अनुमोदित की जाएगी। 


40. छात्र गाइड अनुपात.- () यदि गाइड प्रोफेसर संवर्ग का है तो छात्र-गाइड अनुपात 3:7 होगा। 
(2) यदि गाइड एसोसिएट प्रोफेसर संवर्ग का है तो छात्र-गाइड अनुपात 2:7 होगा। 

4. माइग्रेशन- किसी भी परिस्थिति में, होम्योपैथी स्नातकोत्तर डिग्री पाठ्यक्रम की पढ़ाई कर रहे छात्र का एक 
महाविद्यालय से दूसरे महाविद्यालय में माइग्रेशन या स्थानांतरण की अनुमति किसी भी विश्वविद्यालय या प्राधिकारी 
द्वारा नहीं दी जाएगी। 

42. मूल्यांकन की योजना.- (॥) प्रत्येक कार्यक्रम के लिए मूल्यांकन रचनात्मक और समग्र का होगा। रचनात्मक मूल्यांकन के 
विवरण सक्षमता आधारित मूल्यांकन फ्रेमवर्क में प्रत्येक विशेषता के लिए अलग से तैयार किए जाएंगे। इनका रिकॉर्ड 
रखा जाएगा और इन्हें उचित महत्व दिया जाएगा। समग्र मूल्यांकन के लिए उपस्थित होने के लिए पात्र होने से पहले 
उम्मीदवार को रचनात्मक मूल्यांकन में संतोषजनक प्रदर्शन करना होगा। यह एम.डी. (होम्योपैथी) भाग-। के साथ- 
साथ एम.डी. (होम्योपैथी) भाग-॥ के लिए भी होगा और समग्र मूल्यांकन में निम्न शामिल होगा: - 

(क) लिखित परीक्षा; और 
(a) क्लिनिकल या प्रैक्टिकल और मौखिक परीक्षा (वाइवा-वोस) 


(2) मूल्यांकन की अनुसूची:-मूल्यांकन की अनुसूची निम्नलिखित तालिका के अनुसार होगी, अर्थात 


तालिका 
रचनात्मक मूल्यांकन समग्र मूल्यांकन (विश्वविद्यालय परीक्षा) 
(आंतरिक मूल्यांकन) 
एम.डी.(हो म्यो.) भाग-ा पहले सत्र की परीक्षा - प्रशैक्षणिक के छठे माह | प्रशैक्षणिक के अठारहवें माह के दौरान 
के दौरान 
दूसरे सत्र की परीक्षा - प्रशैक्षणिक के बारहवें 
माह के दौरान 
एम.डी.(हो म्यो.) भाग-ा पहले सत्र की परीक्षा - प्रशैक्षणिक के चौबीसवें | प्रशैक्षणिक के छत्तीसवें माह के दौरान 
माह के दौरान 
दूसरे सत्र की परीक्षा - प्रशैक्षणिक के तीसवें माह 
के दौरान 


(3) एस. जी. /होस्योपैथी) भागय परीक्षा - परीक्षा उत्तीर्ण करने हेतु प्रत्येक विषय के लिए आधिकतम अंक और 
उत्तीर्णाक निम्नवत होगे; अथातिः - 


(क) एम.डी. (होम्योपैथी) होम्योपैथिक मटेरिया मेडिका - 
थ्योरी (सैद्धांतिकी) मौखिक (वाइवा-वोस) सहित 


0 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY 


[PART IHI—SEc.4] 


विषय व्यावहारिक या नैदानिक परीक्षा 
अधिकतम अंक | उत्तीर्णांक अधिकतम अंक उत्तीर्णांक 
प्रश्नपत्र-ा होम्योपैथिक मटेरिया मेडिका के 400 50 200* 400* 
मूलभूत सिद्धांत (460+40) | (80+20) (समग्र 
प्रश्नपत्र-ा होम्योपैथिक मटेरिया मेडिका AF} 400 50 (समग्र मूल्यांकन- | मूल्यांकन- 80 
नैदानिक चिकित्सा के मूलभूत सिद्धांत 460 अंक) अंक) (आंतरिक 
(आंतरिक मूल्यांकन- 20 
मूल्यांकन- 40 अंक) 
अंक) 
प्रश्नपत्र-ात]ा शोध प्रविधि एवं जैवसांख्यिकी 400 50 | ee ll a 


(प्रश्नपत्र) और I ((00 अंक व्यावहारिक + (00 अंक मौखिक परीक्षा) के लिए एक सामान्य व्यावहारिक 
परीक्षा आयोजित की जाएगी; बीस प्रतिशत भारांक आंतरिक मूल्यांकन के लिए दिया जाएगा, जिसकी गणना 
केवल व्यावहारिक या मौखिक सहित नैदानिक परीक्षा के लिए की जाएगी। छ: महीने के प्रत्येक सत्र और औसतन 
दो सत्रों के के बाद 40 अंक के आंतरिक मूल्यांकन (20 अंक (व्यावहारिक या नैदानिक) + 20 अंक (मौखिक 
परीक्षा) पर विचार किया जाएगा। *अस्सी प्रतिशत भारांक समग्र मूल्यांकन के लिए दिया जाएगा)। 


(ख) एम.डी. (होम्योपैथी) ऑर्गेनन ऑफ मेडिसिन और होम्योपैथिक फिलोसफी - 


सैद्धांतिकी (थ्योरी) मौखिक (वाइवा-वोस) सहित 
विषय व्यावहारिक या नैदानिक परीक्षा 
अधिकतम अंक उत्तीर्णांक | अधिकतम अंक उत्तीर्णाक 
प्रश्नपत्र-[ ऑर्गेनन ऑफ मेडिसिन और 400 50 200* 400* 
होम्योपैथिक फिलॉसफी के मूल (460+40) (समग्र| (80+20) (समग्र 
सिद्धांत; मूल्यांकन- 760 | मूल्यांकन- 80 अंक) 
प्रश्नपत्र-]] ऑर्गनन ऑफ मेडिसिन और 400 50 अंक) (आंतरिक |(आंतरिक मूल्यांकन- 
होम्योपैथिक फिलॉसफी में नैदानिक मूल्यांकन- 40 20 अंक) 
चिकित्सा के मूलभूत सिद्धांत; और अंक) 
प्रश्नपत्र-ा]] शोध प्रविधि एवं जैवसांख्यिकी 400 50 | = | re | 


(प्रश्नपत्र) और I ((00 अंक व्यावहारिक + (00 अंक मौखिक परीक्षा) के लिए एक सामान्य व्यावहारिक 
परीक्षा आयोजित की जाएगी; बीस प्रतिशत भारांक आंतरिक मूल्यांकन के लिए दिया जाएगा, जिसकी गणना 
केवल व्यावहारिक या मौखिक सहित नैदानिक परीक्षा के लिए की जाएगी। छ: महीने के प्रत्येक सत्र और औसतन 
दो सत्रों के के बाद 40 अंक के आंतरिक मूल्यांकन (20 अंक (व्यावहारिक या नैदानिक) + 20 अंक (मौखिक 
परीक्षा) पर विचार किया जाएगा। *अस्सी प्रतिशत भारांक समग्र मूल्यांकन के लिए दिया जाएगा)। 


(ग) एम.डी. (होम्योपैथी) होम्योपैथिक रिपर्टरी और केस टेकिंग - 


सैद्धांतिकी (थ्योरी) मौखिक (वाइवा-वोस) सहित 
ee व्यावहारिक या नैदानिक परीक्षा 
अधिकतम अंक उत्तीर्णाक | अधिकतम अंक उत्तीर्णाक 
प्रश्नपत्र-ा होम्योपैथिक रिपर्टरी और केस टेकिंग 400 50 200* 400* 
के मूलभूत सिद्धांत (460+40) (समग्र (80+20) (समग्र 
प्रश्नपत्र-ा होम्योपैथिक रिपर्टरी और केस टेकिंग 400 50 मूल्यांकन- 760 | मूल्यांकन- 80 
में नैदानिक चिकित्सा के मूलभूत अंक) (आंतरिक | अंक) (आंतरिक 
सिद्धांत मूल्यांकन- 40 | मूल्यांकन- 20 
अंक) अंक) 


[भाग ave 4] 


भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


ll 


प्रश्नपत्र-ा] 


शोध प्रविधि एवं जैवसांख्यिकी 


00 


50 


(प्रश्नपत्र) और I ((00 अंक व्यावहारिक + (00 अंक मौखिक परीक्षा) के लिए एक सामान्य व्यावहारिक 
परीक्षा आयोजित की जाएगी; बीस प्रतिशत भारांक आंतरिक मूल्यांकन के लिए दिया जाएगा, जिसकी गणना 
केवल व्यावहारिक या मौखिक सहित नैदानिक परीक्षा के लिए की जाएगी। छ: महीने के प्रत्येक सत्र और औसतन 
दो सत्रों के के बाद 40 अंक के आंतरिक मूल्यांकन (20 अंक (व्यावहारिक या नैदानिक) + 20 अंक (मौखिक 
परीक्षा) पर विचार किया जाएगा। *अस्सी प्रतिशत भारांक समग्र मूल्यांकन के लिए दिया जाएगा)। 


(घ) एम.डी. (होम्योपैथी) होम्योपैथिक फॉर्मेसी - 


सैद्धांतिकी (थ्योरी) मौखिक (वाइवा-वोस) सहित 
विषय व्यावहारिक या नैदानिक परीक्षा 
अधिकतम अंक उत्तीर्णक | अधिकतम अंक उत्तीर्णाक 
प्रश्नपत्र- | होम्योपैथिक फॉर्मेसी के मूलभूत 400 50 200* 400* 
सिद्धांत (60+40) |(80+20) (समग्र 
प्रश्नपत्र-|| होम्योपैथिक फॉर्मेसी में नैदानिक 400 50 (समग्र मूल्यांकन-| मूल्यांकन- 80 
चिकित्सा के मूलभूत सिद्धांत 460 अंक) | अंक) (आंतरिक 
(आंतरिक | मूल्यांकन- 20 
मूल्यांकन- 40 अंक) 
अंक) 
प्रश्नपत्र-||| शोध प्रविधि एवं जैवसांख्यिकी 400 50 [eee tee al 


(प्रश्नपत्र) और TL ((00 अंक व्यावहारिक + 00 अंक मौखिक परीक्षा) के लिए एक सामान्य व्यावहारिक 
परीक्षा आयोजित की जाएगी; बीस प्रतिशत भारांक आंतरिक मूल्यांकन के लिए दिया जाएगा, जिसकी गणना 
केवल व्यावहारिक या मौखिक सहित नैदानिक परीक्षा के लिए की जाएगी। छ: महीने के प्रत्येक सत्र और औसतन 
दो सत्रों के के बाद 40 अंक के आंतरिक मूल्यांकन (20 अंक (व्यावहारिक या नैदानिक) + 20 अंक (मौखिक 
परीक्षा) पर विचार किया जाएगा। *अस्सी प्रतिशत भारांक समग्र मूल्यांकन के लिए दिया जाएगा)। 


(ड.) एम.डी. (होम्योपैथी) चिकित्सा का अभ्यास - 


सैद्धांतिकी (थ्योरी) मौखिक (वाइवा-वोस) सहित 
विषय व्यावहारिक या नैदानिक परीक्षा 
अधिकतम अंक उत्तीर्णाक | अधिकतम अंक उत्तीर्णांक 
चिकित्सा का अभ्यास के मूलभूत। 00 50 200* 400* 
सिद्धांत (460+40) (समग्र| (80+20) (समग्र 
प्रश्नपत्र-ा चिकित्सा का अभ्यास में होम्योपैथी। 00 50 मूल्यांकन- (60 |मूल्यांकन- 80 अंक) 
के मूलभंत सिद्धांत अंक) (आंतरिक [(आंतरिक मूल्यांकन- 
मूल्यांकन- 40 20 अंक) 
अंक) 
प्रश्नपत्र-त] शोध प्रविधि एवं जैवसांख्यिकी 400 50 5 ऊँ | 


(प्रश्नपत्र) और I (400 अंक व्यावहारिक + 400 अंक मौखिक परीक्षा) के लिए एक सामान्य व्यावहारिक 
परीक्षा आयोजित की जाएगी; बीस प्रतिशत भारांक आंतरिक मूल्यांकन के लिए दिया जाएगा, जिसकी गणना 
केवल व्यावहारिक या मौखिक सहित नैदानिक परीक्षा के लिए की जाएगी। छ: महीने के प्रत्येक सत्र और औसतन 
दो सत्रों के के बाद 40 अंक के आंतरिक मूल्यांकन (20 अंक (व्यावहारिक या नैदानिक) + 20 अंक (मौखिक 
परीक्षा) पर विचार किया जाएगा। *अस्सी प्रतिशत भारांक समग्र मूल्यांकन के लिए दिया जाएगा)। 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY 


[PART II—SEc.4] 


2 
(A) एम.डी. (होम्योपैथी) बाल चिकित्सा - 
सैद्धांतिकी (थ्योरी) मौखिक (वाइवा-वोस) सहित 
विषय व्यावहारिक या नैदानिक परीक्षा 
अधिकतम अंक उत्तीर्णाक | अधिकतम अंक उत्तीर्णांक 
प्रश्नपत्र-| बाल चिकित्सा के मूलभूत Fata | —00 50 200* 00* 
प्रश्नपत्र-|| बाल चिकित्सा में होम्योपैथी के 400 50 (60+40) | (80+20) (समग्र 
मूलभूत सिद्धांत (समग्र मूल्यांकन- | मूल्यांकन- 80 अंक) 
460 अंक) ((आंतरिक मूल्यांकन- 
(आंतरिक 20 अंक) 
मूल्यांकन- 40 
अंक) 
प्रश्नपत्र-||| शोध प्रविधि एवं जैवसांख्यिकी 400 50 pee ee ———-* | 


('प्रश्नपत्र- और I ((00 अंक व्यावहारिक + (00 अंक मौखिक परीक्षा) के लिए एक सामान्य व्यावहारिक 
परीक्षा आयोजित की जाएगी; बीस प्रतिशत भारांक आंतरिक मूल्यांकन के लिए दिया जाएगा, जिसकी गणना 
केवल व्यावहारिक या मौखिक सहित नैदानिक परीक्षा के लिए की जाएगी। छ: महीने के प्रत्येक सत्र और औसतन 
दो सत्रों के के बाद 40 अंक के आंतरिक मूल्यांकन (20 अंक (व्यावहारिक या नैदानिक) + 20 अंक (मौखिक 
परीक्षा) पर विचार किया जाएगा। *अस्सी प्रतिशत भारांक समग्र मूल्यांकन के लिए दिया जाएगा)। 


(छ) एम.डी. (होम्योपैथी) मनोचिकित्सा - 
सैद्धांतिकी (थ्योरी) मौखिक (वाइवा-वोस) सहित 
— व्यावहारिक या नैदानिक परीक्षा 
अधिकतम अंक उत्तीर्णांक अधिकतम अंक उत्तीर्णांक 
प्रश्नपत्र-ा मनोचिकित्सा के मूलभूत 400 50 200* 400* 
सिद्धांत (60+40) (समग्र| (80+20) (समग्र 
प्रश्नपत्र-ा मनोचिकित्सा में होम्योपैथी के। 00 50 मूल्यांकन- 760 | मूल्यांकन- 80 
मूलभूत सिद्धांत अंक) (आंतरिक | अंक) (आंतरिक 
मूल्यांकन- 40 | मूल्यांकन- 20 
अंक) अंक) 
प्रश्नपत्रत | शोध प्रविधि एवं 400 50 ca a 
जैवसांख्यिकी 


(प्रश्नपत्र) और TL ((00 अंक व्यावहारिक + 00 अंक मौखिक परीक्षा) के लिए एक सामान्य व्यावहारिक 
परीक्षा आयोजित की जाएगी; बीस प्रतिशत भारांक आंतरिक मूल्यांकन के लिए दिया जाएगा, जिसकी गणना 
केवल व्यावहारिक या मौखिक सहित नैदानिक परीक्षा के लिए की जाएगी। छ: महीने के प्रत्येक सत्र और औसतन 
दो सत्रों के के बाद 40 अंक के आंतरिक मूल्यांकन (20 अंक (व्यावहारिक या नैदानिक) + 20 अंक (मौखिक 
परीक्षा) पर विचार किया जाएगा। *अस्सी प्रतिशत भारांक समग्र मूल्यांकन के लिए दिया जाएगा)। 


(ज) एम.डी.(होम्योपैथी) सामुदायिक चिकित्सा - 
सैद्धांतिकी (थ्योरी) मौखिक (वाइवा-वोस) सहित 
अप व्यावहारिक या नैदानिक परीक्षा 
अधिकतम अंक उत्तीर्णाक | अधिकतम अंक उत्तीर्णांक 
प्रश्नपत्र-ा सामुदायिक चिकित्सा के 400 50 200* 00* 
मूलभूत सिद्धांत (460+40) | (80+20) (समग्र 


[भाग गा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 3 


प्रश्नपत्र-ा] सामुदायिक चिकित्सा में 400 50 (समग्र मूल्यांकन-| मूल्यांकन- 80 
होम्योपैथी के मूलभूत सिद्धांत 460 अंक) अंक) (आंतरिक 
(आंतरिक मूल्यांकन- 20 
मूल्यांकन- 40 अंक) 
अंक) 
प्रश्नपत्र-ात] शोध प्रविधि एवं जैवसांख्यिकी =00 50 a Pee 


(प्रश्नपत्र) और I ((00 अंक व्यावहारिक + (00 अंक मौखिक परीक्षा) के लिए एक सामान्य व्यावहारिक 
परीक्षा आयोजित की जाएगी; बीस प्रतिशत भारांक आंतरिक मूल्यांकन के लिए दिया जाएगा, जिसकी गणना 
केवल व्यावहारिक या मौखिक सहित नैदानिक परीक्षा के लिए की जाएगी। छ: महीने के प्रत्येक सत्र और औसतन 
दो सत्रों के के बाद 40 अंक के आंतरिक मूल्यांकन (20 अंक (व्यावहारिक या नैदानिक) + 20 अंक (मौखिक 
परीक्षा) पर विचार किया जाएगा। *अस्सी प्रतिशत भारांक समग्र मूल्यांकन के लिए दिया जाएगा)। 


(a) एम.डी. (होम्योपैथी) त्वचाविज्ञान - 


सैद्धांतिकी (थ्योरी) मौखिक (वाइवा-वोस) सहित 
विंग व्यावहारिक या नैदानिक परीक्षा 
अधिकतम अंक उत्तीर्णाक | अधिकतम अंक उत्तीर्णांक 
प्रश्नपत्र-ा त्वचाविज्ञान के मूलभूत सिद्धांत 400 50 200* 00* 
प्रश्नपत्र-ा] त्वचाविज्ञान में होम्योपैथी के| 00 50 (60+40) (समग्र| (80+20) (समग्र 
मूलभूत सिद्धांत मूल्यांकन- 760 | मूल्यांकन- 80 
अंक) (आंतरिक | अंक) (आंतरिक 
मूल्यांकन- 40 | मूल्यांकन- 20 
अंक) अंक) 
प्रश्नपत्र-ात] शोध प्रविधि एवं जैवसांख्यिकी 400 50 जि 


(प्रश्नपत्र) और IL ((00 अंक व्यावहारिक + 400 अंक मौखिक परीक्षा) के लिए एक सामान्य व्यावहारिक 
परीक्षा आयोजित की जाएगी; बीस प्रतिशत भारांक आंतरिक मूल्यांकन के लिए दिया जाएगा, जिसकी गणना 
केवल व्यावहारिक या मौखिक सहित नैदानिक परीक्षा के लिए की जाएगी। छ: महीने के प्रत्येक सत्र और औसतन 
दो सत्रों के के बाद 40 अंक के आंतरिक मूल्यांकन (20 अंक (व्यावहारिक या नैदानिक) + 20 अंक (मौखिक 
परीक्षा) पर विचार किया जाएगा। *अस्सी प्रतिशत भारांक समग्र मूल्यांकन के लिए दिया जाएगा)। 


(4) एम.डी. (होम्योपैथी) भाग-ा परीक्षा - परीक्षा उत्तीर्ण करने के लिए प्रत्येक विषय के लिए अधिकतम और न्यूनतम 
अंक निम्नानुसार होंगे, ATA: - 


विषय सैद्धांतिकी (थ्योरी) मौखिक  (वाइवा-वोस)5त्तीर्णांक अंक 
सहित व्यावहारिक य 
नैदानिक परीक्षा 
अधिकतम अंक उत्तीर्णांक अधिकतम अंक उत्तीर्णांक 
Gi) विशेषज्ञता विषय प्रश्नपत्र-| 200* 400* 
400 50 (60+40) (समग्र (80+20) (समग्र 
मूल्यांकन- 60 अंक) | मूल्यांकन- 80 अंक) 


]4 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 
(Gi) विशेषज्ञता विषय प्रश्नपत्र- (आंतरिक मूल्यांकन- 40 | (आंतरिक मूल्यांकन- 
I ‘a6 हो अंक) 20 अंक) 


(प्रश्नपत्र) और IL ((00 अंक व्यावहारिक + 400 अंक मौखिक परीक्षा) के लिए एक सामान्य व्यावहारिक 
परीक्षा आयोजित की जाएगी; बीस प्रतिशत भारांक आंतरिक मूल्यांकन के लिए दिया जाएगा, जिसकी गणना 
केवल व्यावहारिक या मौखिक सहित नैदानिक परीक्षा के लिए की जाएगी। छ: महीने के प्रत्येक सत्र और औसतन 
दो सत्रों के के बाद 40 अंक के आंतरिक मूल्यांकन (20 अंक (व्यावहारिक या नैदानिक) + 20 अंक (मौखिक 
परीक्षा) पर विचार किया जाएगा। *अस्सी प्रतिशत भारांक समग्र मूल्यांकन के लिए दिया जाएगा)। 


(5) परीक्षा के लिए दिशानिर्देश निम्न प्रकार होंगे, अर्थात:- 


(क) 


(च) 


सैद्धांतिकी/थ्योरी परीक्षा में लघु उत्तर वाले प्रश्नों के लिए चालीस प्रतिशत अंक होंगे और लंबे 
व्याख्यात्मक उत्तर वाले प्रश्नों के लिए चालीस प्रतिशत अंक होंगे जिसमें वर्णनात्मक, केस सिनेरियो और 
नैदानिक अनुप्रयोग-आधारित प्रश्न शामिल होंगे, और समस्या-आधारित प्रश्न के लिए बीस प्रतिशत अंक 
होंगे तथा ये प्रश्न विषय के पूरे पाठ्यविवरण/सिलेबस को कवर करेंगे। 


परीक्षा उत्तीर्ण करने के लिए सैद्धांतिकी घटक में आवश्यक न्यूनतम अंक पचास प्रतिशत और प्रैक्टिकल 
या क्लिनिकल घटक में (जिसमें प्रैक्टिकल, afta, वाइवा-वोस शामिल है) प्रत्येक विषय में पचास 
प्रतिशत अंक अलग से होंगे । 


प्रत्येक सैद्धांतिकी परीक्षा तीन घंटे की अवधि की होगी। 


प्रत्येक विशेषज्ञता वाले विषय में मौखिक परीक्षा या प्रैक्टिकल या नैदानिक परीक्षा और शोधनिबंध का 
मूल्यांकन, कम से कम चार परीक्षकों द्वारा किया जाएगा, जिनमें से दो बाह्य परीक्षक होंगे और दो 
आंतरिक परीक्षक होंगे। 


विश्वविद्यालय को परिणाम की अनुशंसा करने के लिए चार परीक्षक संयुक्त रूप से प्रत्येक छात्र के ज्ञान 
का मूल्यांकन करेंगे। छात्र के मूल्यांकन के लिए चार परीक्षकों के औसत अंकों पर विचार किया जाएगा। 


विश्वविद्यालय परिणाम घोषित होने के छह महीने के भीतर असफल छात्रों के लिए परीक्षा आयोजित 
करने की अनुमति देगा। 


(छ) विश्वविद्यालय किसी भी विषय के लिए एक वर्ष में दो से अधिक परीक्षाएं आयोजित नहीं करेगा, दोनों 


परीक्षाओं के बीच छह महीने से कम का अंतराल नहीं होगा। 


(ज) एम.डी. (होम्योपैथी) भाग-। परीक्षा एक वर्ष की अवधि की संस्थागत नौकरी (हाउस जॉब) पूरी होने के 


(झ) 


(ज) 


(2) 


अठारहवें महीने में आयोजित की जानी है। 

एम.डी. (होम्योपैथी) भाग-। पाठ्यक्रम के किसी एक विषय में परीक्षा उत्तीर्ण नहीं करने वाला छात्र उस 
विषय के सभी भागों की फिर से परीक्षा देगा, लेकिन उक्त परीक्षा के लिए केवल एक अवसर मिलेगा 
जिसमें विफल रहने पर उसे एम.डी. (होम्योपैथी) भाग-। पाठ्यक्रम के सभी विषयों (सभी भागों में) की 
परीक्षा दोबारा देनी होगी। 

विश्वविद्यालय द्वारा घोषित परिणाम सैद्धांतिकी या प्रैक्टिकल या क्लिनिकल या मौखिक परीक्षा तथा 
शोधनिबंध मूल्यांकन में प्राप्त अंकों के रूप में अलग से प्रदर्शित किए जाएंगे। 

एम.डी. (होम्योपैथी) परीक्षाओं के लिए किसी भी दिन क्लिनिकल या प्रैक्टिकल और मौखिक परीक्षा में 
छात्रों की अधिकतम संख्या दस से अधिक नहीं होगी। 


(6) प्रश्न पत्रों का मूल्यांकन निम्न प्रकार होगा, अर्थात:- 


(क) 


स्नातकोत्तर परीक्षाओं के लिए सभी पात्र परीक्षक उत्तर पुस्तिकाओं का मूल्यांकन कर सकते हैं। 


[भाग गा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 5 


(a) 


(77) 


(4) 


सभी उत्तर पुस्तिकाओं का संबंधित विश्वविद्यालय द्वारा दो मूल्यांकन किए जाएंगे। प्रश्नपत्र के लिए दो 
मूल्यांकनकर्ताओं द्वारा दिए गए कुल अंकों में से उच्चतम, जिसे निकटतम अंक तक पूर्णांकित किया जाना 
है, अंकों को परिणामों की गणना के लिए विचार किया जाएगा। 

सभी उत्तर पुस्तिकाओं, जहाँ दो मूल्यांकनों के बीच का अंतर प्रश्नपत्र के लिए निर्धारित कुल अंकों में से 
दस प्रतिशत से अधिक है, का तीसरा मूल्यांकन किया जा सकता है। 


प्रश्नपत्र के लिए तीन मूल्यांकनकर्ताओं द्वारा दिए गए अंकों में से, दो मूल्यांकनकर्ताओं द्वारा दिए गए 
सर्वोत्तम कुल अंकों, जिन्हें निकटतम अंक तक पूर्णांकित किया जाना है, को परिणामों की अंतिम गणना के 
लिए विचार किया जाएगा। 


(ड.) अंकों की गणना और परिणामों की घोषणा के बाद, किसी भी प्राधिकारी द्वारा किसी भी परिस्थिति में 


(च) 


पुनर्मूल्‍यांकन की अनुमति नहीं है। 


स्नातकोत्तर पाठ्यक्रम प्रदान करने वाले सभी स्वास्थ्य विश्वविद्यालय या संस्थान बार-कोडित डिजिटल 
मूल्यांकन के लिए एक प्लेटफॉर्म विकसित करेंगे। 


(7) एम.डी. (होम्योपैथी) भाग-। परीक्षा में प्रवेश चाहने वाले प्रत्येक उम्मीदवार को निम्नलिखित दस्तावेजों के साथ 
विश्वविद्यालय में आवेदन जमा करना होगा, अर्थात: - 


(क) 


(ख) 


संस्थान या महाविद्यालय (जहाँ पाठ्यक्रम प्रदान किया गया है) के प्राचार्य या प्रमुख से उन विषयों के 
पाठ्यक्रम को पूर्ण करने के बारे में एक प्रमाण पत्र जिस परीक्षा में उम्मीदवार प्रवेश चाहता है; और 


पाठ्यक्रम के अनिवार्य भाग के रूप में, होम्योपैथिक अस्पताल में एक वर्ष की संस्थागत नौकरी पूरी करने 
का प्रमाण पत्र। 


इन विनियमों में निर्दिष्ट समय के भीतर सिनोप्सिस प्रस्तुत करने के संबंध में गाइड से एक प्रमाण पत्र; 


एम.डी. (होम्योपैथी) भाग-। परीक्षाओं में उपस्थित होने के लिए पात्र बनने हेतु उपस्थिति न्यूनतम 
पचहत्तर प्रतिशत होगी। 


(ड.) किसी भी स्नातकोत्तर छात्र को इन विनियमों के अनुसार अनिवार्य कोर्स वर्क और आंतरिक मूल्यांकन पूरा 


किए बिना परीक्षा में बैठने की अनुमति नहीं दी जाएगी। 


(8) एम.डी. (होम्योपैथी) भाग-॥ परीक्षा में प्रवेश चाहने वाले प्रत्येक उम्मीदवार को निम्नलिखित दस्तावेजों के साथ 
विश्वविद्यालय में आवेदन जमा करना होगा, अर्थात: - 


(क) 


(ख) 


(ग) 


(घ) 


अंकतालिका या परीक्षाफल, जो यह दर्शाता हो कि छात्र ने एम.डी. (होम्योपैथी) भाग-। परीक्षा उत्तीर्ण 
की है; 

शोधनिबंध प्रस्तुत करने के समर्थन में और इन नियमों में निर्दिष्ट समय के भीतर गाइड द्वारा उसकी 
स्वीकारिता का प्रमाण पत्र; 


संस्थान या महाविद्यालय (जहाँ पाठ्यक्रम प्रदान किया गया है) के प्राचार्य या प्रमुख से उन विषयों के 
पाठ्यक्रम को पूर्ण करने के बारे में एक प्रमाण पत्र जिस परीक्षा में उम्मीदवार प्रवेश चाहता है; 

एम.डी. (होम्योपैथी) भाग-॥ परीक्षा में उपस्थित होने के लिए पात्र बनने हेतु स्नातकोत्तर छात्र की 
उपस्थिति न्यूनतम पचहत्तर प्रतिशत होगी; 


(ड.) किसी भी स्नातकोत्तर छात्र को इस विनियमन के अनुसार अनिवार्य कोर्स वर्क और आंतरिक मूल्यांकन पूरा 


किए बिना परीक्षा में बैठने की अनुमति नहीं दी जाएगी। 


(9) परीक्षकों के लिए निम्नलिखित शर्तों को ध्यान में रखा जाएगा, अर्थात:- 


(क) 
(ख) 
(ग) 


परीक्षकों के लिए मानदंड वही होंगे जो स्नातकोत्तर गाइड के लिए होंगे; 
दो आंतरिक परीक्षक होंगे; और 
कम से कम पचास प्रतिशत परीक्षक बाह्य परीक्षक होंगे। 


6 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


43. सामान्य अनिवार्य पाठ्यक्रम कार्य (कोर्स वर्क)- (4) एमडी (होम्योपैथी) भाग-। के लिए, निम्नलिखित पाठ्यक्रम कार्य 
यानी कोर्स वर्क विशेषज्ञता वाले विषय के बावजूद सभी सख्लरातकोत्तर छात्रों के लिए सामान्य और अनिवार्य होगा, 
अर्थात: - 


(क) 


(ख) 


बेसिक कार्डिएक लाइफ सपोर्ट स्किल्स में पाठ्यक्रम- 


(i) 


(ii) 
(iii) 


सभी सख्रातकोत्तर छात्रों को बेसिक कार्डिएक लाइफ सपोर्ट स्किल्स में एक कोर्स पूरा करना होगा 
जो केंद्र सरकार के मान्यता प्राप्त संस्थान से विधिवत प्रमाणित किया गया हो। यदि किसी छात्र 
ने पहले ही यह कोर्स कर लिया है और केंद्र सरकार के मान्यता प्राप्त संस्थान से प्रमाणपत्र प्राप्त 
कर लिया है, वह इस विनियम के खंड (3) में उल्लिखित ऐच्छिक की सूची में से कोई अन्य 
पाठ्यक्रम चुन सकता है। 


छात्रों को बैच शुरु होने के एक वर्ष के भीतर कोर्स कार्य पूरा करना होगा। 


किसी भी ख्लातकोत्तर छात्र को उपरोक्त प्रमाणीकरण के बिना एम.डी. (होम्योपैथी) भाग-| 
परीक्षाओं में बैठने की अनुमति नहीं दी जाएगी। 


बायोएशथिक्स में कोर्स- 


(i) 


(ii) 
(iii) 


सभी सख्लातकोत्तर छात्रों को बायोएथिक्स में गुड क्लिनिकल प्रैक्टिस सहित एक कोर्स पूरा करना 
होगा, जिसे संस्थानों द्वारा स्वयं या किसी अन्य विधि द्वारा संचालित किया जाना है। 


छात्रों को बैच शुरु होने के एक वर्ष के भीतर कोर्स पूरा करना होगा। 


किसी भी ख्लातकोत्तर छात्र को उपरोक्त कोर्स पूरा किए बिना एम.डी. (होम्योपैथी) भाग-। 
परीक्षा में बैठने की अनुमति नहीं दी जाएगी। 


(2) एमडी (होम्योपैथी) भाग-॥ के लिए निम्नलिखित कोर्स विशेषज्ञता-विषय के बावजूद सभी ख्लातकोत्तर 
छात्रों के लिए सामान्य और अनिवार्य होगा, अर्थात: - 


(क) 


(ख) 


सभी ख्लातकोत्तर छात्रों को चिकित्सा शिक्षा प्रौद्योगिकी में एक बेसिक कोर्स पूरा करना होगा जिसे केंद्र 
सरकार के मान्यता प्राप्त संस्थान द्वारा विधिवत प्रमाणित किया गया हो। 


सभी सख्लातकोत्तर छात्रों को वैज्ञानिक लेखन में एक पाठ्यक्रम पूरा करना होगा जो केंद्र सरकार के 
मान्यता प्राप्त संस्थान से विधिवत प्रमाणित हो। 


(3) संस्थानों को टेलीमेडिसिन, प्रभावी प्रस्तुतीकरणों, wads का उपयोग, चिकित्सा लेखापरीक्षा प्रबंधन में 
जागरुकता, स्वास्थ्य अर्थशास्त्र, स्वास्थ्य सूचना प्रणाली, सांख्यिकी के मूलभूत तत्व, मानव व्यवहार से 
एक्सपोजर और होम्योपैथिक फार्मेसी का अध्ययन एवं ज्ञान जैसे ऐच्छिक विषयों पर प्रशैक्षणिक कार्यक्रमों की 
व्यवस्था करनी होगी। प्रत्येक छात्र के लिए यह अनिवार्य है कि वह स्नातकोत्तर पाठ्यक्रम की पूरी अवधि में 
उपरोक्त ऐच्छिक विषयों में से किसी एक को पूरा करे। 


44. स्नातकोत्तर होम्योपैथिक चिकित्सा संस्थानों के लिए अतिरिक्त मूलभूत ढांचे की आवश्यकता और शर्तें - राष्ट्रीय 
होम्योपैथी आयोग (होम्योपैथिक महाविद्यालयों और संबद्ध अस्पतालों के लिए न्यूनतम आवश्यक मानक), विनियम, 
2024 में उल्लिखित स्नातक डिग्री कार्यक्रम के लिए न्यूनतम आवश्यक मानकों के अलावा, ख्रातकोत्तर होम्योपैथिक 
संस्थानों के लिए निम्नलिखित आवश्यकताएं अनिवार्य होंगी, अर्थात :- 

किसी मान्यता प्राप्त होम्योपैथिक महाविद्यालय को स्नातकोत्तर केंद्र के रूप में माना जाएगा जो होम्योपैथिक 

चिकित्सा एवं शल्यचिकित्सा डिग्री पाठ्यक्रम संचालित करने के लिए सभी निर्धारित न्यूनतम आवश्यकताओं, 

मानदंडों और मानकों को पूरा करता है, और लगातार पांच वर्षों तक सफलतापूर्वक होम्योपैथिक चिकित्सा 
एवं शल्यचिकित्सा डिग्री पाठ्यक्रम चला रहा है। 


() 


(2) 


(3) 


ऐसे प्रत्येक चिकित्सा संस्थान या शैक्षणिक अस्पताल में संबंधित विशेषज्ञता का एक विभाग होगा और इन 
नियमों में निर्दिष्ट अतिरिक्त सुविधाएं भी होंगी। 


स्नातकोत्तर पाठ्यक्रम में वार्षिक प्रवेश क्षमता अधिकतम दस सीटें होंगी, लेकिन सबसे पहले अनुमति किसी 
विशेषज्ञता वाले विषय में अधिकतम सात सीटों के लिए दी जाएगी। चिकित्सा संस्थान स्नातकोत्तर पाठ्यक्रम 


[भागवता--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण [7 


के लिए प्रवेश क्षमता में वृद्धि के लिए आवेदन, स्नातकोत्तर पाठ्यक्रम के पहले बैच को पूरा करने के बाद या 
अपने स्नातक पाठ्यक्रम के पहले बैच के पूरा होने के बाद स्नातकोत्तर पाठ्यक्रम शुरु करने के बाद कर सकता 
है। 

(4) अस्पताल की आवश्यकता निम्नलिखित अतिरिक्त आवश्यकताओं के साथ राष्ट्रीय होम्योपैथी आयोग 


(होम्योपैथिक महाविद्यालयों और संबद्ध अस्पतालों के लिए न्यूनतम आवश्यक मानक), विनियम-2024 में 
यथा निर्दिष्ट होगी, अर्थात: - 


(क) होम्योपैथिक चिकित्सा एवं शल्यचिकित्सा स्नातक पाठ्यक्रम चलाने वाले चिकित्सा संस्थान के 
अस्पताल में पिछले पांच कैलेंडर वर्षों के दौरान प्रतिदिन औसतन न्यूनतम तीन सौ रोगियों 
वाला बाह्य रोगी विभाग। 


(ख) प्रत्येक विशेषज्ञता वाले नैदानिक विषय के लिए प्रति छात्र एक बिस्तर अलग से रखा जाएगा, 
जो कि उसके एक वर्ष में औसतन शैक्षणिक (महाविद्यालयी) होम्योपैथिक अस्पताल में 
होम्योपैथिक चिकित्सा एवं शल्यचिकित्सा स्नातक पाठ्यक्रम के लिए आवश्यक बिस्तरों के 
अलावा, बिस्तरों की संख्या न्यूनतम 50% होगी। 


(ग) संबद्ध होम्योपैथिक अस्पताल के बाह्य रोगी विभाग और अंतरंग रोगी विभाग में उक्त 
उपस्थिति उस दिन उपलब्ध होनी चाहिए जब चिकित्सा संस्थान के अधिकारियों द्वारा राष्ट्रीय 
होम्योपैथी आयोग से मान्यता या अनुमोदन के लिए आवेदन किया जाता है। 


(5) राष्ट्रीय होम्योपैथी आयोग के पास ऐसी सूचना और विवरणिकाएं (रिटर्न) की मांग करने की शक्ति होगी जो 
वह विश्वविद्यालय और चिकित्सा संस्थानों से उचित समझे और वे राष्ट्रीय होम्योपैथी आयोग द्वारा यथा 
निर्दिष्ट सूचना प्रस्तुत करेंगे: 


बशर्ते कि यदि चिकित्सा संस्थान निर्दिष्ट समय सीमा के भीतर सूचना एवं विवरणिका प्रदान करने में विफल 
रहते हैं, तो आयोग अधिनियम की धारा 28 के अधीन संबंधित चिकित्सा संस्थान के खिलाफ यह मानते हुए 
कार्रवाई की सिफारिश करेगा कि संबंधित संस्थान विनियमन के प्रावधानों का अनुपालन नहीं कर रहा है। 


(6) प्रत्येक महाविद्यालय आयोग द्वारा नियुक्त निरीक्षकों को उनके कर्तव्यों और कार्यो के निर्वहन के लिए निरीक्षण 
के दौरान उनके द्वारा अपेक्षित सभी आवश्यक सूचना, दस्तावेज और रिकॉर्ड उपलब्ध करेगा। 


(7) प्रशासनिक क्षेत्र राष्ट्रीय होम्योपैथी आयोग (होम्योपैथिक महाविद्यालयों और संबद्ध अस्पतालों के लिए न्यूनतम 
आवश्यक मानक), विनियम-2024 में यथा अधिसूचित होगा। 


(8) व्याख्यानों, बैठकों, सेमिनारों, सम्मेलनों, संगोष्ठियों और परामर्श आदि के लिए महाविद्यालय परिसर में कम 
से कम दो सौ व्यक्तियों के बैठने की क्षमता वाला एक सेमिनार हॉल उपलब्ध होगा। हॉल में पर्याप्त विद्युतीय 
और बैठने की व्यवस्था, क्लोज सर्किट टेलीविजन, इंटरनेट सुविधाओं के साथ दृश्य-श्रव्य व्यवस्था होगी। 


(9) बायोमैट्रिक उपस्थिति के लिए निम्नलिखित शर्तें पूरी की जाएंगी, अर्थात: - 


(क) सभी चिकित्सा संस्थान मानव संसाधनों की उपस्थिति की नियमित रूप से उपस्थिति दर्ज करने के 
लिए समय-समय पर आयोग द्वारा यथा निर्देशित प्रक्रिया में आधार सक्रिय बायोमैट्रिक उपस्थिति 
मशीन स्थापित करेंगे जो शिक्षा के न्यूनतम आवश्यक मानकों की अक्षुण्णता को सुनिश्चित करने के 
लिए केंद्र सरकार, राज्य सरकार या संघ राज्य क्षेत्रों के प्रशासन और आयोग के लिए अनिवार्य रूप 
से ऐक्सेस योग्य होगी। 


(ख) आधार सक्रिय बायोमैट्रिक उपस्थिति चिकित्सा संस्थान की वेबसाइट के डैशबोर्ड पर और आयोग 
के निर्देशानुसार समर्पित पोर्टल पर होम्योपैथी में चिकित्सा आकलन एवं रेटिंग बोर्ड को उपलब्ध 
कराई जाएगी। आयोग शिक्षा के न्यूनतम आवश्यक मानकों के अनुपालन के लिए मूल्यांकन के 
दौरान या उसके बाद चिकित्सा संस्थान से उक्त उपस्थिति का रिकॉर्ड मांगेगा। 


(ग) आधार सक्रिय बायोमैट्रिक उपस्थिति प्रणाली की संस्थापना, रखरखाव और निरंतर सुचारू 
संचालन चिकित्सा संस्थानों की जिम्मेदारी होगी और बायोमैट्रिक प्रणाली के कामकाज में किसी 
भी तकनीकी समस्या को बायोमैट्रिक उपस्थिति प्रणाली के लिए नामित प्रभारी नोडल अधिकारी 


8 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


के माध्यम से तुरंत आयोग को सूचित की जानी चाहिए जिसे रिपोर्टिंग की तारीख से सात दिनों की 
अवधि के भीतर उसे ठीक किया जाएगा। 


(घ) आधार सक्रिय बायोमैट्रिक मशीनों द्वारा दर्ज की गई न्यूनतम एक वर्ष की उपस्थिति का रिकॉर्ड 
आयोग या मूल्यांकन टीम को उपलब्ध कराया जाना चाहिए और महाविद्यालय कम से कम एक 
वर्ष के लिए रिकॉर्ड कायम रखेगा। 


(40) प्रत्येक स्नातकोत्तर विभाग के लिए राष्ट्रीय होम्योपैथी आयोग की अनुमति से एक कैमरा. स्थापित 
किया जाएगा। 


(4) महाविद्यालय की वेबसाइट का रख-रखाव निम्न प्रकार होगा, अर्थातः- 


(क) प्रत्येक और हर चिकित्सा संस्थान की अपनी वेबसाइट होगी जिसमें प्रत्येक विषय में स्वीकृत 
सीटों के साथ स्नातकोत्तर छात्रों के संबंध में, वर्तमान वर्ष और पिछले शैक्षणिक सत्रों के लिए 
उनके मेरिट-वार, श्रेणी-वार विषय-वार सभी प्रासंगिक विवरणों के साथ हर वर्ष प्रवेश दिए 
गए छात्रों के सभी विवरण तथा उनके अखिल भारतीय आयुष स्नातकोत्तर प्रवेश परीक्षा स्कोर 
होंगे। 

(ख) बुनियादी ढांचे, स्टाफ (शैक्षणिक और अशैक्षणिक), पुस्तकालय, उपकरण, चार्ट या इलेक्ट्रॉनिक 
डिस्प्ले, नमूनों के संबंध में सभी विशेषज्ञता विषय के स्नातकोत्तर विभाग के विवरण वेबसाइट 
पर तस्वीरों के साथ अपलोड किए जाएंगे। 

(ग) अस्पताल से संबंधित सूचना, बाह्य रोगी विभाग और अंतरंग रोगी विभाग का डेटा हर महीने 
अपडेट किया जाएगा। 


45. स्टाफ की आवश्यकताएँ - (4) शैक्षणिक स्टाफ - एम.डी. (होम्योपैथी) के लिए पाठ्यक्रम के अनुसार न्यूनतम 
पूर्णकालिक शैक्षणिक स्टाफ होगा (राष्ट्रीय होम्योपैथी आयोग में निर्दिष्ट न्यूनतम शैक्षणिक स्टाफ के अतिरिक्त 
(होम्योपैथिक महाविद्यालयों और संबद्ध अस्पतालों के लिए न्यूनतम आवश्यक मानक) विनियम, 2024), नामत:- 


तालिका 

| क्र. | सं. विभाग का नाम प्रोफेसर एसोसिएट प्रोफेसर 
() होम्योपैथिक मटेरिया मेडिका 2 
(2) ऑर्गेनन ऑफ मेडिसिन और होमियोपैथिक फिलोसफी | 2 
(3) होम्योपैथिक रिपर्टरी और केस टेकिंग | 2 
(4) होम्योपैथिक फॉर्मेसी | 2 
(5) चिकित्सा अभ्यास 2 
(6) बाल चिकित्सा 2 
(7) मनोचिकित्सा 2 
(8) सामुदायिक चिकित्सा 2 
(9) त्वचारोग विज्ञान 2 
(0) शोध प्रविधि एवं जैवसांख्यिकी 


(2) सांख्यिकीय विश्लेषण हेतु शिक्षकों और छात्रों की सहायता के लिए एक पूर्णकालिक सांख्यिकीय सहायक 
नियुक्त किया जाएगा। 


46. विभाग एवं उनकी विशिष्ट आवश्यकताएँ - () होम्योपैथिक मटेरिया मेडिका विभाग - 


(क) चिकित्सा संस्थान ख्रातकपूर्व पाठ्यक्रम हेतु प्रत्येक विभाग के लिए आवश्यकतानुसार उपलब्ध कराए 
गए क्षेत्र के अतिरिक्त कम से कम नब्बे वर्ग मीटर क्षेत्र उपलब्ध करेगा। Sala छात्रों के लिए चर्चा 


[भाग ave 4] 


भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


9 


कक्ष, स्नातकोत्तर शैक्षणिक संकाय कक्ष और विभागीय पुस्तकालय के लिए स्थान ऑडियो-विजुअल और 
इंटरनेट सुविधाओं के प्रावधान के साथ उपलब्ध कराना होगा। 


ऑनलाइन सत्रों के दौरान बेहतर कनेक्टिविटी के लिए हाई स्पीड इंटरनेट सुविधा उपलब्ध करानी 


होगी। 


स्नातकोत्तर पाठ्यचर्या में अलग से अधिसूचित यथा निर्दिष्ट विभागीय पुस्तकों और पुस्तक सूची के 


भंडारण के लिए दो अलमारियाँ होंगी। प्रत्येक छात्र के लिए ई-पुस्तकालय सदस्यता अनिवार्य है। 


विभाग में न्यूनतम दो एसोसिएट प्रोफेसर और एक प्रोफेसर होगा या निचले संवर्ग के संकाय के विपरीत 
उच्च संवर्ग के अतिरिक्त संकाय पर विचार किया जाएगा। 


एक गैर-तकनीकी स्टाफ, जैसे कि सहायक या परिचारक उपलब्ध होगा। 


(च) उपकरण एवं सामग्री निम्नलिखित तालिका के अनुसार होगी:- 
तालिका 
| क्र.सं. | a उपकरण एवं सामग्रियां मात्रा 
() डेस्कटॉप या लैपटॉप 2 
(2) fortes क्रिस्टल डिस्प्ले (एलसीडी) प्रोजेक्टर 04 
(3) गोल या सेंटर टेबल (बैठने की बेहतर व्यवस्था के लिए) 07 
(4) कुर्सियां 20 
(5) सूचना TE 04 
(6) बाह्य हार्ड डिस्क 04 
(7) चार्ट और इलेक्ट्रॉनिक डिस्प्ले 5 
(8) पुस्तकें 5 सेट 
(9) एक्सरे व्यू बॉक्स 04 
(0) शोधनिबंधों पर पोस्टर प्रस्तुतीकरण पिछले तीन शैक्षणिक वर्षों के शोधप्रबंध 


(छ) चार्ट या इलेक्ट्रॉनिक डिस्प्ले की सूची,- 
6) साइंस और फिलोसफी ऑफ होम्योपैथिक मटेरिया मेडिका; 
0) होम्योपैथिक मटेरिया मेडिका का अध्ययन के भिन्न उपागम; 


(2) 


aii)  पीरियोडिक टेबल; 


(iv) Aree - तीन पॉलीक्रेस्ट - पौधे, पशु, खनिज पारिस्थितिकी प्रत्येक से एक-एक; 


(vy) नोडोजिज - कोई दो दवाएं; 

(vi) सारकोड- एक दवा; 

(vii) समूह लक्षण या अध्ययन - तीन समूह; 
(भा) Test तीन रोगों का उपचार। 


ऑर्गेनन ऑफ मेडिसिन और होम्योपैथिक फिलॉसफी विभाग - 


20 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


(क) चिकित्सा संस्थान स््रातकपूर्व पाठ्यक्रम के लिए उपलब्ध कराए गए क्षेत्र के अतिरिक्त, कम से 
कम नब्बे वर्ग मीटर क्षेत्र उपलब्ध करेगा। स््रातकोत्तर छात्रों के लिए चर्चा कक्ष, स्नातकोत्तर 
शैक्षणिक संकाय कक्ष और विभागीय पुस्तकालय के लिए स्थान ऑडियो-विजुअल और इंटरनेट 
सुविधाओं के प्रावधान के साथ उपलब्ध होगा। 

(ख) ऑनलाइन सत्र के दौरान बेहतर कनेक्टिविटी के लिए हाई-स्पीड इंटरनेट सुविधाएं उपलब्ध 
होंगी। 

(ग) अलग से अधिसूचित स्नातकोत्तर पाठ्यक्रम में यथा निर्दिष्ट विभागीय पुस्तकों और पुस्तक-सूची 
के भंडारण के लिए दो अलमारियाँ। प्रत्येक छात्र के लिए ई-पुस्तकालय सदस्यता अनिवार्य है। 

(घ) विभाग में न्यूनतम दो एसोसिएट प्रोफेसर और एक प्रोफेसर होगा या निचले संवर्ग के संकाय 
के विपरीत उच्च संवर्ग के अतिरिक्त संकाय पर विचार किया जाएगा। 


(ड.) एक गैर-तकनीकी स्टाफ, यानी सहायक या परिचारक उपलब्ध होगा। 
(च) उपकरण और सामग्रियां नीचे दी गई तालिका के अनुसार होंगी:- 


तालिका 
क्र. सं. उपकरण एवं सामग्रियां मात्रा 
() डेस्कटॉप या लैपटॉप 2 
(2) लिक्षिड क्रिस्टल डिस्प्ले (एलसीडी) प्रोजेक्टर 07 
(3) गोल या सेंटर टेबल (बैठने की बेहतर व्यवस्था के 04 
लिए) 
(4) कुर्सियां 20 
(5) सूचना We 04 
(6) बाह्य हार्ड डिस्क 04 
(7) चार्ट या इलेक्ट्रॉनिक डिस्प्ले 45 
(8) पुस्तकें 5 सेट 
(9) एक्सरे व्यू बॉक्स 04 
(0) शोधनिबंधों पर पोस्टर प्रस्तुतीकरण पिछले तीन शैक्षणिक वर्षों के शोधनिबंध 


(छ) चार्ट या इलेक्ट्रॉनिक डिस्प्ले की सूची - 
(i) भिन्न सिद्धांत; 
(ii) केस टेकिंग; 
Gi) रोग का वर्गीकरण; 
6५). ऑर्गेनन का ग्राउंड प्लान; 
(v) होम्योपैथी के कार्डिनल सिद्धांत; 
(vi) रोग विकास की अवधारणा; 
Wi) ऑर्गेनन ऑफ मेडिसिन का भिन्न संस्करण; 
(शा) रोग परिदृश्य - मियास्मस-प्सोरा, साइकोसिस, ट्यूबरकुलर, सिफलिस; 
(0. रोग का कारण; 
(x) मनुष्य की हैनिमैनियन अवधारणा; 


[भाग ave 4] 


भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 2] 


00). पोसोलॉजी पर प्रदर्शन; 

(it) संवेदनशीलता का निर्धारण; 

0४) सी.वॉन. बीओनिंगहौसेन द्वारा लक्षणों का मूल्यांकन; 
(xiv) जे.टी.केंट द्वारा लक्षणों का मूल्यांकन; और 

(xv) सी.एम. बोगर द्वारा लक्षणों का मूल्यांकन। 


(3) होम्योपैथिक रिपर्टरी और केस टेकिंग विभाग - 


(क) 


(ख) 


(ग) 


(घ) 


(ड.) 


चिकित्सा संस्थान स्नातकपूर्व पाठ्यक्रम के लिए उपलब्ध कराए गए क्षेत्र के अतिरिक्त कम से 
कम नब्बे वर्ग मीटर क्षेत्र उपलब्ध करेगा। स्नातकोत्तर छात्रों के लिए चर्चा कक्ष, स्नातकोत्तर, 
शैक्षणिक संकाय कक्ष और विभागीय पुस्तकालय के लिए स्थान ऑडियो-विज़ुअल और इंटरनेट 
सुविधाओं के प्रावधान के साथ उपलब्ध होगा। 

ऑनलाइन सत्र के दौरान बेहतर कनेक्टिविटी के लिए हाई स्पीड इंटरनेट सुविधा उपलब्ध 
होगी। 

अलग से यथा निर्दिष्ट अधिसूचित स््रातकोत्तर पाठ्यक्रम में विभागीय पुस्तकों और पुस्तक-सूची 
के भंडारण के लिए दो अलमारियाँ। कार्ड रिपर्टरी या मॉडल प्रदर्शन और चर्चा के लिए उपलब्ध 
किया जाना चाहिए। प्रत्येक छात्र के लिए ई-पुस्तकालय सदस्यता अनिवार्य है। 


विभाग में न्यूनतम दो एसोसिएट प्रोफेसर और एक प्रोफेसर होगा या निचले संवर्ग के संकाय के 
विपरीत उच्च संवर्ग के अतिरिक्त संकाय पर विचार किया जाएगा। 


एक गैर-तकनीकी स्टाफ, यानी सहायक या परिचारक उपलब्ध होगा। 


(च) उपकरण और सामग्रियां नीचे दी गई तालिका के अनुसार होंगी:- 
तालिका 
| ma | a उपकरण एवं सामग्रियां मात्रा 
() डेस्कटॉप या लैपटॉप 5 
(2) fetes क्रिस्टल डिस्प्ले (एलसीडी) 04 
प्रोजेक्टर 
(3) गोल या सेंटर टेबल 04 
(4) कुर्सियां 20 
(5) सूचना Te 04 
(6) बाह्य हार्ड डिस्क 04 
(7) चार्ट या इलेक्ट्रॉनिक डिस्प्ले 45 
(8) होम्योपैथी रिपर्टरी सॉफ्टवेयर 5 
(अधिमानत: बहुउपयोगी) 
(9) WRAL OL बॉक्स 07 
(0) शोधनिबंधों पर पोस्टर प्रस्तुतीकरण पिछले तीन शैक्षणिक वर्षों के शोधनिबंध 
(4) पुस्तकें 5 सेट 


(छ) चार्ट या इलेक्ट्रॉनिक डिस्प्ले की सूची - 


(i) 


रिपर्टरीज़ का उद्धव; 


22 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


ii) 9 रेपर्टोरियल उपागम (एप्रोचिज) - जे.टी.केंट; 
#)  रेपर्टोरियल उपागम - सी.वॉन.बोएनिंगहौसेन; 
iv) रेपर्टोरियल उपागम - सी.एम.बोगर; 

v) की-नोट लक्षणों की अवधारणा; 

५) गैर रिपोर्टोरियल उपागम - संरचनाकरण; 

vii) कार्ड रिपर्टरीज़; 

शा) रेपर्टोरियल सिंड्रोम और संभावित भिनन्‍नात्मक क्षेत्र; 
ix) रूब्रिक और सब रूब्रिक का अर्थ; 

x) < रेपर्टोरिज़ेशन की सामान्य अवधारणाएँ; 

xi) Ree और रिपर्टरीज़ेशन; 

xii) क्षेत्रीय रिपर्टरीज़; 

xiii) FEET सॉफ्टवेयर; 

xiv) केस- टेकिंग और रिपर्टरी; 

2५) लक्षणों का विश्लेषण और मूल्यांकन; 

(xvi) रिपर्टरी का वर्गीकरण। 


(4) होम्योपैथिक फार्मेसी विभाग - 


(क) चिकित्सा संस्थान स्नातकोत्तर छात्रों के लिए ऑडियो-विजुअल और इंटरनेट सुविधाओं के प्रावधान के 
साथ चर्चा कक्ष, स्नातकोत्तर, शैक्षणिक संकाय कक्ष और विभागीय पुस्तकालय सहित कम से कम नब्बे 
वर्ग मीटर क्षेत्र उपलब्ध करेगा। 


(ख) ऑनलाइन सत्र के दौरान बेहतर कनेक्टिविटी के लिए हाई स्पीड इंटरनेट सुविधा उपलब्ध होगी। 


(ग) ख्लातकोत्तर पाठ्यचर्या में अलग से यथा अधिसूचित विभागीय पुस्तकों और पुस्तक सूची के भंडारण के 
लिए दो अलमारियाँ। प्रत्येक छात्र के लिए ई-पुस्तकालय सदस्यता अनिवार्य है। 


(घ) विभाग में न्यूनतम दो संयुक्त प्रोफेसर और एक प्रोफेसर होगा या निचले संवर्ग के संकाय के विपरीत 
उच्चु संवर्ग के अतिरिक्त संकाय पर विचार किया जाएगा। 


(ड.) एक गैर-तकनीकी स्टाफ, यथा सहायक या परिचारक उपलब्ध होगा। 
(च) उपकरण और सामग्रियां नीचे दी गई तालिका के अनुसार होंगी:- 


तालिका 
| क्र. | सं. उपकरण एवं सामग्री मात्रा 
() डेस्कटॉप या लैपटॉप 2 
(2) लिक्वकिड क्रिस्टल डिस्प्ले (एलसीडी) 04 
प्रोजेक्टर 
(3) गोल या सेंटर टेबल (बैठने की बेहतर 04 
व्यवस्था के लिए) 


[भाग गा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 23 


(4) कुर्सियां 20 
(5) सूचना Te 04 
(6) बाह्य हार्ड डिस्क 04 
(7) चार्ट या इलेक्ट्रॉनिक डिस्प्ले 6 
(8) हर्बेरियम शीटें 20 
(9) एक्सरे व्यू बॉक्स 04 
(0) शोधनिबंधों पर पोस्टर प्रस्तुतीकरण पिछले तीन शैक्षणिक वर्षों के शोधनिबंध 
() पुस्तकें 5 सेट 


(छ) चार्ट या इलेक्ट्रॉनिक डिस्प्ले की सूची - 
(i) होम्योपैथिक फार्माकोपिया; 


(ii) दवाओं का मानकीकरण - ऑर्गेनोलेप्टिक मूल्यांकन; 
(ii) दवाओं का मानकीकरण - सूक्ष्मदर्शी मूल्यांकन; 

(iv) दवाओं का मानकीकरण - भौतिक मूल्यांकन; 

(v) दवाओं का मानकीकरण - रासायनिक मूल्यांकन; 
(vi) दवाओं का मानकीकरण - जैविक मूल्यांकन; 

(vii) औषधियों और उनकी प्रभावकारिता का संरक्षण; 


(शा). होम्योपैथिक दवाओं का निर्माण - हैनिमैनियन विधि; 
(ix) होम्योपैथिक दवाओं का निर्माण - नई विधि; 
(x) पोटेंशियलाइजेशन (प्रभावकारिता) के पैमाने; 
(xi) पोटेंशियलाइजेशन की विधियाँ; 
(xii) पोसोलॉजी के सिद्धांत; 
(xiii) «= फार्माकोनॉमी; 
(iv) . होम्योपैथिक फार्मेसी अधिनियम और नियम; 
(xv) विभिन्न प्रकार की औषधि क्रियाएं; 
avi) भारतीय औषधियाँ और उनके स्थानीय नाम। 
(ज) संबद्ध औषधि अधिनियम विधियां एवं विधायन प्रत्येक चिकित्सा संस्थान में रखे जाएंगे। 


(5) चिकित्सा अभ्यास विभाग - 


(क) चिकित्सा संस्थान दृश्य-श्रव्य और इंटरनेट सुविधाओं के प्रावधान के साथ स्नातकोत्तर छात्रों के लिए चर्चा 
कक्ष, स्नातकोत्तर शैक्षणिक संकाय कक्ष और विभागीय पुस्तकालय के लिए स्थान सहित कम से कम नब्बे 
वर्ग मीटर क्षेत्र उपलब्ध करेगा। 


(ख) ऑनलाइन सत्र के दौरान बेहतर कनेक्टिविटी के लिए हाई-स्पीड इंटरनेट सुविधाएं उपलब्ध होंगी। 


(ग) अलग से अधिसूचित स्नातकोत्तर पाठ्यक्रम में यथा निर्दिष्ट विभागीय पुस्तकों और पुस्तक-सूची के भंडारण 
के लिए दो अलमारियाँ। प्रत्येक छात्र के लिए ई-पुस्तकालय सदस्यता अनिवार्य है। 


(a) विभाग में न्यूनतम दो संयुक्त प्रोफेसर और एक प्रोफेसर होगा या निचले संवर्ग के संकाय के विपरीत उच्च 


24 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY 


[PART III—SEc.4] 


संवर्ग के अतिरिक्त संकाय पर विचार किया जाएगा। 


(ड) एक गैर-तकनीकी स्टाफ, यानी सहायक या परिचारक उपलब्ध होगा। 
(च) उपकरण और सामग्रियां नीचे दी गई तालिका के अनुसार होगी:- 


तालिका 
mace सं उपकरण एवं सामग्रियां मात्रा 
() डेस्कटॉप या लैपटॉप 2 
(2) fortes क्रिस्टल डिस्प्ले (एलसीडी) 07 
प्रोजेक्टर 
(3) गोल या सेंटर टेबल (बैठने की बेहतर 04 
व्यवस्था के लिए) 
(4) कुर्सियां 20 
(5) सूचना पट्ट 04 
(6) ale] हार्ड डिस्क 04 
(7) चार्ट या इलेक्ट्रॉनिक डिस्प्ले 45 
(8) नैदानिक प्रशैक्षणिक के लिए चिकित्सा | आवश्यकता के अनुसार 
उपकरण 
(9) THI व्यू बॉक्स 04 
(0) पुस्तकें 5 सेट 
(44) शोधनिबंधों पर पोस्टर प्रस्तुतीकरण पिछले तीन शैक्षणिक वर्षों के शोधनिबंध 


(छ) चार्ट या इलेक्ट्रॉनिक डिस्प्ले की सूची - 


(i) 
(u) 
(iil) 
(iv) 
(v) 
(vl) 
(vii) 
(viii) 
(ix) 
(x) 
(xi) 
(xii) 
(xiii) 


(xiv) 


पेरीफेरल नर्व इवेल्युएशन एक्सिस (पीएनई) अक्ष और उनके घटक; 


ब्रोन्‍्कोपल्मोनरी सीक्बैस्ट्रेशन (बीपीएस) मॉडल और कारणता की अवधारणा; 


डर्माटोम्स और परिधीय तंत्रिका आपूर्ति; 

संवेदनशीलता और विभिन्न पैरामीटर; 

हार्मोनल ऐस्से और इनकी व्याख्या; 

रुमेटॉइड गठिया के निदान के लिए अमेरिकन एसोसिएशन ऑफ रुमेटोलॉजी 
विभिन्न कार्डियोवेस्कुलर में असामान्य ईसीजी खोजें; 

मियाज़्म और इसकी विशिष्ट अभिव्यक्तियाँ; 

मधुमेह मेलिटस का विश्व स्वास्थ्य वर्गीकरण; 

प्राथमिक और माध्यमिक त्वचा घाव; 

कार्डिएक और रिस्पाइरेटरी डिसनिया के बीच अंतर; 
अतिसंवेदनशीलता प्रतिक्रियाओं के प्रकार; 

गुर्दे के दर्द का मटेरियामेडिका (भेषजगुणविज्ञान) चिकित्सा विधान; 
सांस की तकलीफ (डिस्पेनिया) का मेटेरियामेडिका चिकित्सा विधान; 


क्राइटेरिया; 


[भाग Wave 4] 


भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


25 


(xv) बुखार का मटेरिया मेडिका चिकित्सा विधान 


(6) बाल चिकित्सा विभाग:- 


(क) चिकित्सा संस्थान कम से कम aed वर्ग मीटर जमीन उपलब्ध कराएगा जिसमें स्नातकोत्तर छात्रों के लिए 
स्थान, चर्चा के लिए कक्ष, स्नातकोत्तर शैक्षणिक संकाय के लिए कक्ष और ऑडियो-विज़ुअल (श्रव्य-दृश्य) और 
इंटरनेट सुविधाओं के प्रावधान के साथ विभागीय पुस्तकालय शामिल हैं। 

(ख) ऑनलाइन सत्रों के दौरान बेहतर कनेक्टिविटी के लिए हाई-स्पीड इंटरनेट सुविधाएं उपलब्ध होंगी। 

(ग) विभागीय पुस्तकों और अलग से अधिसूचित स्नातकोत्तर पाठ्यक्रम में यथा उल्लिखित बुकलिस्ट (पुस्तकों की 
सूची) के भंडारण के लिए दो अलमारी। प्रत्येक छात्र के लिए ई-लाइब्रेरी की सदस्यता अनिवार्य है। 

(घ) विभाग में कम से कम दो एसोसिएट प्रोफेसर और एक प्रोफेसर होगा या निचले संवर्ग (कैडर) संकाय की 
तुलना में उच्च संवर्ग (कैडर) के अतिरिक्त संकाय पर विचार किया जाएगा। 

(ड) एक गैर-तकनीकी कर्मचारी जैसे सहायक या परिचारक उपलब्ध होंगे। 

(च) उपकरण और सामग्रियां नीचे दी गई तालिका के अनुसार होंगी:- 

तालिका 
wa. उपकरण और सामग्रियां मात्रा 
() डेस्कटॉप या लैपटॉप 2 
(2) लिक्षिड क्रिस्टल डिस्प्ले (एलसीडी) प्रोजेक्टर 04 
(3) राउंड या सेंटर टेबल (बैठने की बेहतर व्यवस्था के 04 
लिए) 
(4) कुर्सियां 20 
(5) सूचना बोर्ड 04 
(6) एक्सटर्नल हार्ड डिस्क 04 
(7) चार्ट या इलेक्ट्रॉनिक डिस्प्ले 43 
(8) बाल चिकित्सा में नैदानिक प्रशैक्षणिक के लिए आवश्यकतानुसार 
चिकित्सा उपकरण एवं औजार 
(9) एक्स-रे व्यू बॉक्स 04 
(0) पुस्तकें 5 सेट 
(44) शोध प्रबंधों पर पोस्टर प्रस्तुतियां पिछले तीन शैक्षणिक वर्षों के शोध प्रबंध 


(छ) मॉडल और चार्ट या इलेक्ट्रॉनिक डिस्प्ले की सूची - 


() मॉडल:- 
(क) स्तन (ब्रेस्ट) मॉडल; 
ख) पोषण मॉडल; 
ग) विकासात्मक मॉडल; 
घ) प्रशैक्षणिक पुतले या डमी; 


कैनुला इन्सर्शन। 
( चार्ट या इलेक्ट्रॉनिक डिस्प्ले - 


ड) प्रशैक्षणिक के लिए पुतले या डमी - कार्डियोपल्मोनरी पुनर्जीवन (रिससिटेशन), इंट्रावेनस 


26 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


(7) मनोचिकित्सा विभाग:- 


a 


शशि | 4 33 Se | 


(ड) 


सामान्य अल्पता चार्ट या इलेक्ट्रॉनिक डिस्प्ले - मैक्रो और माइक्रोन्यूट्रिएंट्स - प्रोटीन ऊर्जा 
कुपोषण, मोटापा, रिकेट्स, स्कर्वी; 


पूरक आहार चार्ट; 

चित्रों के साथ सामान्य जन्मजात विसंगतियां चार्ट; 

वंशावली चार्ट ; 

विश्व स्वास्थ्य संगठन विकास चार्ट या इलेक्ट्रॉनिक डिस्प्ले; 

मुखाकृति, TA, मुखविरूपता, कार्यकलाप और श्वसन स्कोर; 

पानी की कमी के ग्रेड; 

डिस्पेनिया के ग्रेड; 

इलेक्ट्रोलाइट असंतुलन; 

बाल चिकित्सा में सामान्य एंग्रोपोमेट्री सूत्र; 

किन्हीं तीन संकेतों के साथ बच्चों के सामान्य संवैधानिक उपचार के चित्र; 


दो होम्योपैथिक चिकित्सा उपचार के साथ चित्रों के साथ बच्चों में रोग की सामान्य स्थिति - 
खसरा, चिकन पॉक्स, गल गण्ड रोग, कृमि संक्रमण, दस्त रोग इत्यादि; 


विस्तृत क्लिनिकोपैथोलॉजिकल वर्णन और विकास के साथ दो नैदानिक स्थितियां। 


(क) चिकित्सा संस्थान कम से कम aed वर्ग मीटर जमीन उपलब्ध कराएगा जिसमें स्नातकोत्तर छात्रों के लिए 
स्थान, चर्चा के लिए कक्ष, स्नातकोत्तर शैक्षणिक संकाय के लिए कक्ष और ऑडियो-विज़ुअल (श्रव्य-दृश्य) और 
इंटरनेट सुविधाओं के प्रावधान के साथ विभागीय पुस्तकालय शामिल हैं। 

(ख) ऑनलाइन सत्रों के दौरान बेहतर कनेक्टिविटी के लिए हाई-स्पीड इंटरनेट सुविधाएं उपलब्ध होंगी। 

(ग) विभागीय पुस्तकों और अलग से अधिसूचित स्नातकोत्तर पाठ्यक्रम में यथा उल्लिखित बुकलिस्ट (पुस्तकों की 
सूची) के भंडारण के लिए दो अलमारी। प्रत्येक छात्र के लिए ई-लाइब्रेरी की सदस्यता अनिवार्य है। 

(घ) विभाग में कम से कम दो एसोसिएट प्रोफेसर और एक प्रोफेसर होगा या निचले संवर्ग (कैडर) संकाय की 
तुलना में उच्च संवर्ग (कैडर) के अतिरिक्त संकाय पर विचार किया जाएगा। 


(ड) एक गैर-तकनीकी कर्मचारी जैसे सहायक या परिचारक उपलब्ध होंगे। 


(च) उपकरण और सामग्रियां नीचे दी गई तालिका के अनुसार होंगी:- 


तालिका 
| ma | उपकरण और सामग्रियां मात्रा 
() डेस्कटॉप या लैपटॉप 2 
(2) fortes क्रिस्टल डिस्प्ले (एलसीडी) प्रोजेक्टर 07 
(3) राउंड या सेंट्रल टेबल (बैठने की बेहतर व्यवस्था के लिए) 04 
(4) कुर्सियां 20 
(5) सूचना बोर्ड 04 
(6) एक्सटर्नल हार्ड डिस्क 04 
(7) चार्ट या इलेक्ट्रॉनिक डिस्प्ले 45 


[aT WI—ave 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 27 


(8) 


एक्स-रे व्यू बॉक्स 04 


(9) 


साइकोमेट्रिक मूल्यांकन उपकरण >> 
4. इंटेलीजेंस का परीक्षण-व्हिसलर इंटेलीजेंस स्केल फॉर चिल्ड्रेन 
2. सोशल कोशंट का परीक्षण - विनेलैंड सोशल मैचुरिटी स्केल्स 
3. वस्तुनिष्ठ व्यक्तित्व परीक्षण 

(क) मिलन क्लिनिकल मल्टीएक्सियल इन्वेंटरी 

(ख) मिनेसोटा मल्टीफेसिक परसोनेलिटी इन्वेंटरी 
4. प्रोजेक्टिव परीक्षण 

(क) रोर्शचैच टेस्ट 

(ख) टर्नएराउंड टाइम 

(ग) टर्नएराउंड एक्सियल टोमोग्राफी 
5. रेटिंग स्केल: प्रकार और उनके उपयोग 


(0) 


पुस्तकें 5 सेट 


(4) 


शोध प्रबंधों पर पोस्टर प्रस्तुतियां पिछले तीन शैक्षणिक वर्षों के शोध प्रबंध 


(छ) चार्ट या इलेक्ट्रॉनिक डिस्प्ले की सूची - 


(i) 
(ii) 
(iii) 
(iv) 
(v) 
(vi) 


(vii) 


(viii) 
(ix) 
(x) 
(xi) 
(xii) 
(xiii) 
(xiv) 
(xv) 


(xvi) 


मस्तिष्क संरचना और इसका कार्य; 

मानसिक स्वास्थ्य के मॉडल; 

सुलिवन का पारस्परिक संबंधों का सिद्धांत; 

मानसिक रोगों के हैनिमैनियन वर्गीकरण को प्रदर्शित करने वाला चार्ट।; 
मानसिक बीमारी का आधुनिक वर्गीकरण; 

व्यक्तित्व विकारों का क्लस्टर वर्गीकरण; 


संज्ञानात्मक, भावनात्मक या व्यक्तित्व मूल्यांकन से संबंधित चर्चा और सीखने के लिए विभिन्न साइकोमेट्रिक 
परीक्षण; 


मानसिक स्थिति की जांच; 

मिनी मानसिक स्थिति जांच; 

सीसीए (अनुभूति, इच्छाशक्ति और प्रभाव); 
चिंता विकारों का वर्गीकरण और अभिव्यक्ति; 
मनोलैंगिक और मनो-सामाजिक विकास (तुलना); 
बाल मनोचिकित्सा नैदानिक स्थितियां; 
भावात्मक विकार और उनका वर्गीकरण; 
स्किज़ोफ्रेनिया स्पेक्ट्रम विकार; 

मॉडल (कोई दो) 


(क) मास्लो का मॉडल; 


28 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


(ख) एरिकसन मनोसामाजिक मॉडल; 
(ग) जीन पियागेट का संज्ञानात्मक विकास का सिद्धांत. 
(8) सामुदायिक चिकित्सा विभाग- 


(क) चिकित्सा संस्थान कम से कम नब्बे वर्ग मीटर जमीन उपलब्ध कराएगा जिसमें स्नातकोत्तर छात्रों के लिए 
स्थान, चर्चा के लिए कक्ष, स्नातकोत्तर शैक्षणिक संकाय के लिए कक्ष और ऑडियो-विज़ुअल (श्रव्य-दृश्य) 
और इंटरनेट सुविधाओं के प्रावधान के साथ विभागीय पुस्तकालय शामिल हैं। 


(ख) ऑनलाइन सत्रों के दौरान बेहतर कनेक्टिविटी के लिए हाई-स्पीड इंटरनेट सुविधाएं उपलब्ध होंगी। 


(ग) विभागीय पुस्तकों और अलग से अधिसूचित स्नातकोत्तर पाठ्यक्रम में यथा उल्लिखित बुकलिस्ट (पुस्तकों 
की सूची) के भंडारण के लिए दो अलमारी। प्रत्येक छात्र के लिए ई-लाइब्रेरी की सदस्यता अनिवार्य है। 


(घ) विभाग में कम से कम दो एसोसिएट प्रोफेसर और एक प्रोफेसर होगा या निचले संवर्ग (कैडर) संकाय की 
तुलना में उच्च संवर्ग (कैडर) के अतिरिक्त संकाय पर विचार किया जाएगा। 


(ड) एक गैर-तकनीकी कर्मचारी जैसे सहायक या परिचारक उपलब्ध होंगे। 
(च) उपकरण और सामग्रियां नीचे दी गई तालिका के अनुसार होंगी:- 


तालिका 

a उपकरण और सामग्रियां मात्रा 
() डेस्कटॉप या लैपटॉप 5 
(2) लिक्षिड क्रिस्टल डिस्प्ले (एलसीडी) प्रोजेक्टर 04 
(3) राउंड या सेंटर टेबल (बैठने की बेहतर व्यवस्था के लिए) 04 
(4) कुर्सियां 20 
(5) सूचना बोर्ड 04 
(6) एक्सटर्नल हार्ड डिस्क 04 
(7) चार्ट अथवा इलैक्ट्रॉनिक डिस्प्ले 6 
(8) एक्स-रे व्यू बॉक्स 04 
(9) पुस्तकें 5 सेट 
(0) शोध प्रबंधों पर पोस्टर प्रस्तुतियां जो भी उपलब्ध हो 


(छ) चार्ट अथवा इलैक्ट्रॉनिक डिस्प्ले और चित्रों की सूची - 


()स्वास्थ्य और बीमारी की अवधारणा; 

Gi)  संचारी रोगों का महामारी विज्ञान; 

(0) टीकाकरण और टीकाकरण अनुसूची; 

60९) होमियोपैथिक रोकथाम; 

(0 जनसांख्यिकी और परिवार नियोजन; 

(vi) स्वास्थ्य जानकारी और बायोस्टैटिस्टिक्स; 


[भाग Wave 4] 


भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 29 


(vii) 
(viii) 
(ix) 
(x) 
(xi) 
(xii) 
(xiii) 
(xiv) 
(xv) 


(xvi) 


आहार, पोषण और पोषण संबंधी समस्याएं और कार्यक्रम; 

राष्ट्रीय स्वास्थ्य कार्यक्रम; 

अंतर्राष्ट्रीय स्वास्थ्य एजेंसियां; 

पानी और सीवेज उपचार; 

चिकित्सा कीटविज्ञान; 

व्यावसायिक स्वास्थ्य; 

धूम्रपान, शराब और नशीली दवाओं की लत; 

स्वास्थ्य प्रशासन और स्वास्थ्य देखभाल वितरण प्रणाली; 

रोगों की जांच; 

संचारी रोगों, आहार, रोगनिरोधी, राष्ट्रीय स्वास्थ्य कार्यक्रमों से संबंधित अन्य सामग्री। 


(9) त्वचाविज्ञान विभाग, 


(क) चिकित्सा संस्थान कम से कम नब्बे वर्ग मीटर जमीन उपलब्ध कराएगा जिसमें स्नातकोत्तर छात्रों के लिए 
स्थान, चर्चा के लिए कक्ष, स्नातकोत्तर शैक्षणिक संकाय के लिए कक्ष और ऑडियो-विज़ुअल (श्रव्य-दृश्य) और 
इंटरनेट सुविधाओं के प्रावधान के साथ विभागीय पुस्तकालय शामिल हैं। 

(ख) ऑनलाइन सत्रों के दौरान बेहतर कनेक्टिविटी के लिए हाई-स्पीड इंटरनेट सुविधाएं उपलब्ध होंगी। 

(ग) विभागीय पुस्तकों और अलग से अधिसूचित स्नातकोत्तर पाठ्यक्रम में यथा उल्लिखित बुकलिस्ट (पुस्तकों की 
सूची) के भंडारण के लिए दो अलमारी। प्रत्येक छात्र के लिए ई-लाइब्रेरी की सदस्यता अनिवार्य है। 

(a) विभाग में कम से कम दो एसोसिएट प्रोफेसर और एक प्रोफेसर होगा या निचले संवर्ग (कैडर) संकाय की 
तुलना में उच्च संवर्ग (कैडर) के अतिरिक्त संकाय पर विचार किया जाएगा। 

(ड). एक गैर-तकनीकी कर्मचारी जैसे सहायक या परिचारक उपलब्ध होंगे। 

(च) उपकरण और सामग्रियां नीचे दी गई तालिका के अनुसार होंगी:- 

तालिका 
| a उपकरण और सामग्री मात्रा 
() डेस्कटॉप या लैपटॉप 2 
(2) fortes क्रिस्टल डिस्प्ले (एलसीडी) प्रोजेक्टर 07 
(3) राउंड या सेंटर टेबल (बैठने की बेहतर व्यवस्था के 07 
लिए) 
(4) कुर्सियां 20 
(5) सूचना बोर्ड 04 
(6) एक्सटर्नल हार्ड डिस्क 04 
(7) चार्ट अथवा इलैक्ट्रॉनिक डिस्प्ले 43 
(8) स्लाइड्स 30 नैदानिक स्थितियां (सबसे आम) 
(9) एक्स-रे व्यू बॉक्स 04 
((0) पुस्तकें 5 सेट 


30 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


(47) शोध प्रबंधों पर पोस्टर प्रस्तुतियां जो भी उपलब्ध हो 


(छ). विभाग में चार्ट अथवा इलैक्ट्रॉनिक डिस्प्ले अथवा एल्बम की सूची - 
(i) गंजापन; 
Gi) = मस्सा; 
(४). एटोपिक डर्मेटाइटिस एक्जिमा और इसके प्रकार; 
60०). पेम्फिगस (जलपीटिका रोग); 
(vy) सल्यूकोप्लाकिया; 
(vi) 9 मोलस्कमकंटेजियोसा; 
(vii) सोराइसिस (छालरोग); 
(शा) खुजली; 
(Gx)  टीनियाक्रूरिस; 
(x) लाइकेन प्लेनस; 
(xi) पित्ती; 
(xii) Whe दाग; 
(xiii) सेबोरिक डर्मेटाइटिस (त्वचा वसा स्राव)। 
(40) शोध प्रविधि और जैव सांख्यिकी विभाग- 

(क) इस विभाग के लिए चिकित्सा संस्थान कम से कम नब्बे वर्ग मीटर जमीन उपलब्ध कराएगा जिसमें 
स्नातकोत्तर छात्रों के लिए स्थान, चर्चा के लिए कक्ष, स्नातकोत्तर शैक्षणिक संकाय के लिए कक्ष और ऑडियो- 
विज़ुअल (श्रव्य-दृश्य) और इंटरनेट सुविधाओं के प्रावधान के साथ विभागीय पुस्तकालय शामिल हैं। 

(ख) ऑनलाइन सत्रों के दौरान बेहतर कनेक्टिविटी के लिए हाई-स्पीड इंटरनेट सुविधाएं उपलब्ध होंगी। 

(ग) विभागीय पुस्तकों और अलग से अधिसूचित स्नातकोत्तर पाठ्यक्रम में यथा उल्लिखित बुकलिस्ट (पुस्तकों की 
सूची) के भंडारण के लिए एक अलमारी। प्रत्येक छात्र के लिए ई-लाइब्रेरी की सदस्यता अनिवार्य है। 

(घ) विभाग में एक एसोसिएट प्रोफेसर और एक प्रोफेसर होगा। 

(ड) उपकरण और सामग्रियां नीचे दी गई तालिका के अनुसार होंगी:- 


तालिका 
क्र.सं. उपकरण और सामग्री मात्रा 
() डेस्कटॉप या लैपटॉप 
(2) लिक्षिड क्रिस्टल डिस्प्ले (एलसीडी) प्रोजेक्टर 07 
(3) राउंड या सेंटर टेबल (बैठने की बेहतर व्यवस्था के लिए) 04 
(4) कुर्सियां 40 
(5) सूचना बोर्ड 0 
(6) एक्सटर्नल हार्ड डिस्क 04 
(7) चार्ट अथवा इलैक्ट्रॉनिक डिस्प्ले 05 


[भाग गा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 3] 


(8) पुस्तकें पुस्तकों के 5 सेट,प्रत्येक सेट अनुसंधान पद्धति और 
बायोस्टैटिस्टिक्स पर 


(A) चार्ट अथवा इलैक्ट्रॉनिक डिस्प्ले की सूची- 
60) केयर केस रिपोर्ट दिशानिर्देश चेक लिस्ट; 
Gi) नैदानिक परीक्षण रजिस्ट्रियों के लिए अंतर्राष्ट्रीय मानक; 
(ii) नैदानिक अध्ययन रिपोर्ट; 


6५) होम्योपैथी की बेहतर नैदानिक पद्धतियां; 
(७) फार्माको सतर्कता। 
47. शैक्षणिक और अशैक्षणिक कर्मचारी - (4) शैक्षणिक कर्मचारियों का वेतन राष्ट्रीय होम्योपैथी आयोग (होम्योपैथिक 


महाविद्यालयों और संबद्ध अस्पतालों के लिए न्यूनतम आवश्यक मानक), विनियम, 2024 के अनुसार विनिर्दिष्ट किया 
जाएगा। 


(2) स्नातकोत्तर होम्योपैथिक महाविद्यालय और संबद्ध अस्पताल के अशैक्षणिक और अस्पताल कर्मचारियों के लिए 
योग्यताएं राष्ट्रीय होम्योपैथी आयोग (होम्योपैथिक महाविद्यालयों और संबद्ध अस्पतालों के लिए न्यूनतम 
आवश्यक मानक) विनियम, 2024 की तृतीय अनुसूची के अनुसार विनिर्दिष्ट होंगी। 


(3) शैक्षणिक कर्मचारियों की नियुक्ति के लिए निम्नलिखित सामान्य प्रावधान लागू होंगे, अर्थात्‌:- 


(क) इन विनियमों की अधिसूचना से पूर्व संबंधित निर्धारित विनियम को पूरा करने वाले महाविद्यालयों में 
नियमित शैक्षणिक स्टाफ के रूप में नियुक्त व्यक्तियों के संबंधित विषय में शैक्षणिक अनुभव को इन 
विनियमों में विनिर्दिष्ट शैक्षणिक कर्माचारी की नियुक्ति के लिए ध्यान में रखा जाएगा। 


स्पष्टीकरण - इस विनियमन के प्रयोजनार्थ किसी शिक्षक के उस विषय में शैक्षणिक अनुभव, जिस विषय 
के लिए उसे नियुक्त किया गया है, केवल उसी विषय के लिए गिना जाएगा। 


(ख) शैक्षणिक कर्मचारी की नियुक्ति के लिए पैंतालीस वर्ष की आयु से पहले मान्यता प्राप्त स्नातकोत्तर योग्यता 
प्राप्त की जाएगी: 


परंतु यह कि पैंतालीस वर्ष का यह आयु मानदंड इन विनियमों की अधिसूचना जारी किए जाने से पहले 
नियुक्त मौजूदा कर्मचारियों पर लागू नहीं होगा। 
(ग). किसी मान्यता प्राप्त होम्योपैथिक मेडिकल कॉलेज या चिकित्सा संस्थान में शैक्षणिक के अनुभव की गणना 
की जाएगी। 
(4) सत्रातकोत्तर चिकित्सा संस्थान के शैक्षणिक कर्मचारी के लिए योग्यता निम्न प्रकार होंगी, अर्थातः- 


4. प्रोफेसर: - होम्योपैथिक विषय अर्थात्‌ होम्योपैथिक मटेरिया मेडिका, ऑर्गेनन ऑफ मेडिसिन और होम्योपैथिक 
फिलॉसफी, होम्योपैथिक फार्मेसी और होम्योपैथिक रिपर्टरी और केस टेकिंग - 
(क) अनिवार्य योग्यता: अभ्यर्थी के पास हो - 

(i) होम्योपैथी में मान्यता प्राप्त खातकोत्तर योग्यता के साथ एसोसिएट प्रोफेसर के रूप में 
संबंधित विषय में कम से कम पांच वर्ष का शैक्षणिक अनुभव या किसी मान्यता प्राप्त 
होम्योपैथिक चिकित्सा संस्थान में संबंधित विषय में कम से कम दस वर्ष का नियमित 
शैक्षणिक अनुभव होना चाहिए; 


(0). किसी सूचीबद्ध या विषय-विशेषज्ञों के संपादकीय बोर्ड द्वारा संपादित पत्रिका में प्रमुख या 
सह-लेखक के रूप में दो मूल लेख प्रकाशित हुए हों। 


(ख) वांछनीय योग्यता: अभ्यर्थी के पास हो - 


32 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


(i) होम्योपैथी में स्नातकोत्तर कार्यक्रम में पर्यवेक्षक या गाइड के रूप में कम से कम पांच वर्ष 
का अनुभव; अथवा 


(ii) होम्योपैथिक मेडिकल कॉलेज या अस्पताल में कम से कम तीन वर्ष का प्रशासनिक 
अनुभव; अथवा 
(iii) संबंधित विश्वविद्यालय और या राज्य सरकार या केंद्र सरकार या केंद्र शासित प्रदेश प्रशासन 


से मान्यता प्राप्त अनुसंधान संस्थान में अनुसंधान में या क्लिनिकल ट्रायल रजिस्ट्री-इंडिया से 
पंजीकृत किसी परियोजना में अनुसंधान का अनुभव। 


2. प्रोफेसर:- चिकित्सा का अभ्यास, बाल चिकित्सा, मनोचिकित्सा, सामुदायिक चिकित्सा और त्वचाविज्ञान | 
(क) अनिवार्य योग्यता: अभ्यर्थी के पास हो- 


(i) 


(ii) 


होम्योपैथी में मान्यता प्राप्त स्नातकोत्तर योग्यता के साथ एसोसिएट प्रोफेसर के रूप में संबंधित विषय में कम 
से कम पांच वर्ष का शैक्षणिक अनुभव या डिग्री स्तर के किसी मान्यता प्राप्त होम्योपैथिक चिकित्सा संस्थान में 
संबंधित विषय में कम से कम दस वर्ष का नियमित शैक्षणिक अनुभव हो या चिकित्सा अभ्यास विभाग में 
उपर्युक्त अनुभव रखने वाले शिक्षकों को इस विनियम के प्रकाशन की तारीख से दस वर्ष की अवधि के लिए 
त्वचाविज्ञान विभाग में नियुक्ति के लिए विचार किया जाएगा; अथवा 


संबंधित विषय में एसोसिएट प्रोफेसर के रूप में कम से कम पांच वर्ष के शैक्षणिक अनुभव के साथ संबंधित 
विषय में भारतीय चिकित्सा परिषद या राष्ट्रीय आयुर्विज्ञान आयोग से मान्यता प्राप्त स्नातकोत्तर चिकित्सा 
डिग्री या राज्य अथवा केंद्र सरकार से अनुमति प्राप्त किसी होम्योपैथिक कॉलेज या किसी मेडिकल कॉलेज में 
संबंधित विषय में नियमित शैक्षणिक का दस वर्ष का अनुभव हो; और 


किसी सूचीबद्ध या विषय-विशेषज्ञों के संपादकीय बोर्ड द्वारा संपादित पत्रिकाओं में प्रमुख या सह-लेखक के 
रूप में दो मूल लेख प्रकाशित हुए हों। 


(ख) वांछनीय योग्यता: अभ्यर्थी के पास हो- 


(i) 


(ii) 
(iii) 


होम्योपैथी में स्नातकोत्तर कार्यक्रम में पर्यवेक्षक या गाइड के रूप में कम से कम पांच वर्ष का 
अनुभव; अथवा 
होम्योपैथिक मेडिकल कॉलेज या अस्पताल में कम से कम तीन वर्ष का प्रशासनिक अनुभव; अथवा 


संबंधित विश्वविद्यालय और या राज्य सरकार या केंद्र सरकार से मान्यता प्राप्त अनुसंधान संस्थान 
में या क्लिनिकल ट्रायल रजिस्ट्री-इंडिया से पंजीकृत किसी परियोजना में अनुसंधान का अनुभव। 


3. प्रोफेसर: शोध प्रविधि और जैव सांख्यिकी 


(क) 


अनिवार्य योग्यता: अभ्यर्थी ने - 


होम्योपैथी में मान्यता प्राप्त स्नातकोत्तर योग्यता के साथ एसोसिएट प्रोफेसर के रूप में संबंधित विषय में कम 
से कम पांच वर्ष का शैक्षणिक अनुभव हो या किसी मान्यता प्राप्त होम्योपैथिक चिकित्सा संस्थान में संबंधित 
विषय में कम से कम दस वर्ष का नियमित शैक्षणिक अनुभव हो किसी सूचीबद्ध अथवा विषय-विशेषज्ञों के 
संपादकीय बोर्ड द्वारा संपादित पत्रिका में प्रमुख या सह-लेखक के रूप में न्यूनतम दो लेख प्रकाशित हुए हों; 
अथवा 

मेडिकल स्टैटिस्टिक्स (चिकित्सा सांखियकी) या बायोस्टैटिस्टिक्स (जैव सांखियकी) या महामारी विज्ञान 
(एपिडेमियोलॉजी) या अनुसंधान पद्धति (रिसर्च मेथडोलॉजी) या मेडिकल स्टैटिस्टिक्स के अन्य प्रासंगिक 
विषय में स्नातकोत्तर डिग्री के साथ संबंधित विश्वविद्यालय या राज्य सरकार या केंद्र सरकार या केंद्र शासित 
प्रदेश प्रशासन से मान्यता प्राप्त अनुसंधान संस्थान में समूह "क" पद में नियमित सेवा में रहते हुए दस वर्ष का 
पूर्णकालिक शोध अनुभव और किसी सूचीबद्ध या विशेषज्ञ द्वारा संपादित पत्रिका में प्रमुख या सह-लेखक के 
रूप में कम से कम चार मूल लेख प्रकाशित हुए हों और इसके प्रचालन में आने की तारीख से पहले राष्ट्रीय 
शिक्षक पात्रता परीक्षा पास कर ली हो। 


(a) वांछनीय योग्यता: अभ्यर्थी के पास हो - 


[भाग गा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 33 


(i) 


(ii) 


(ili) 


होम्योपैथी में स्नातकोत्तर कार्यक्रम में पर्यवेक्षक या गाइड के रूप में कम से कम पांच वर्ष का अनुभव; 
अथवा 
होम्योपैथिक चिकित्सा महाविद्यालय या अस्पताल में कम से कम तीन वर्ष का प्रशासनिक अनुभव; 
अथवा 


संबंधित विश्वविद्यालय और या राज्य सरकार या केंद्र सरकार, केंद्र शासित प्रदेश प्रशासन से मान्यता 
प्राप्त अनुसंधान संस्थान में या क्लिनिकल ट्रायल रजिस्ट्री-इंडिया से पंजीकृत किसी परियोजना में 
अनुसंधान का अनुभव। 


4. एसोसिएट प्रोफेसर: होम्योपैथिक फिलॉसफी, होम्योपैथिक मटेरिया मेडिका, होम्योपैथिक फार्मेसी और 
होम्योपैथिक रिपर्टरी। 


(क) 


अनिवार्य योग्यताएं: अभ्यर्थी के पास हो - 


किसी मान्यता प्राप्त होम्योपैथिक चिकित्सा संस्थान में संबंधित विषय में कम से कम पांच वर्ष के शैक्षणिक 
अनुभव के साथ होमियोपैथी में मान्यता प्राप्त स्नातकोत्तर योग्यता हो। किसी सूचीबद्ध अथवा विषय-विशेषज्ञों 
के संपाकीय बोर्ड द्वारा संपादित पत्रिका में प्रमुख या सह-लेखक के रूप में कम-से-कम एक लेख प्रकाशित हुआ 
हो; अथवा 

केंद्र सरकार या राज्य सरकार या केंद्र शासित प्रदेश प्रशासन या विश्वविद्यालय या राष्ट्रीय संस्थान से मान्यता 
प्राप्त अनुसंधान संस्थान में नियमित सेवा में रहते हुए कम-से-कम पांच वर्ष के पूर्णकालिक शोध अनुभव के 
साथ संबंधित विषय में होम्योपैथी में मान्यता प्राप्त स्नातकोत्तर योग्यता हो और किसी सूचीबद्ध अथवा 
विषय-विशेषज्ञों के संपादकीय बोर्ड द्वारा संपादित पत्रिका में कम-से-कम तीन लेख प्रकाशित हुए हों और 
आयोग द्वारा आयोजित राष्ट्रीय शिक्षक पात्रता परीक्षा उत्तीर्ण की हो; या 


संबंधित विषय में स्नातकोत्तर योग्यता प्राप्त करने के बाद केंद्र सरकार की स्वास्थ्य सेवाओं या राज्य सरकार 
की स्वास्थ्य सेवाओं, आयुष मंत्रालय में नियमित सेवा में कम से कम पांच वर्ष का अनुभव या संबंधित विषय 
में स्नातकोत्तर योग्यता प्राप्त करने के बाद मान्यता प्राप्त होम्योपैथी चिकित्सा संस्थान में नियमित सेवा में 
चिकित्सा अधिकारी के रूप में पूर्णकालिक पांच वर्ष का अनुभव हो और आयोग द्वारा आयोजित राष्ट्रीय 
शिक्षक पात्रता परीक्षा उत्तीर्ण की हो। 


(ख) वांछनीय योग्यता: अभ्यर्थी के पास हो- 


60) होम्योपैथी में स्नातकोत्तर कार्यक्रम में पर्यवेक्षक या गाइड के रूप में कम से कम पांच वर्ष का 


अनुभव; अथवा 


Gi) संबंधित विश्वविद्यालय या राज्य सरकार या केंद्र सरकार या केंद्र शासित प्रदेश प्रशासन से मान्यता 


प्राप्त अनुसंधान संस्थान में या क्लिनिकल ट्रायल रजिस्ट्री-इंडिया से पंजीकृत किसी परियोजना में 
अनुसंधान का अनुभव। 


5. एसोसिएट प्रोफेसर : चिकित्सा का अभ्यास और सामुदायिक चिकित्सा - 


(क) 


अनिवार्य योग्यता : अभ्यर्थी के पास हो- 


होम्योपैथी में मान्यता प्राप्त स्नातकोत्तर योग्यता के साथ किसी मान्यता प्राप्त होम्योपैथिक चिकित्सा संस्थान 
में संबंधित विषय में कम से कम पांच वर्ष का शैक्षणिक अनुभव और किसी सूचीबद्ध अथवा विषय-विशेषज्ञों 
के संपादकीय बोर्ड द्वारा संपादित पत्रिका में प्रमुख या सह-लेखक के रूप में कम-से-कम एक लेख प्रकाशित 
हुआ हो; अथवा 


संबंधित विषय में मेडिकल काउंसिल ऑफ इंडिया (भारतीय चिकित्सा परिषद) या राष्ट्रीय आयुर्विज्ञान 
आयोग से मान्यता प्राप्त स्नातकोत्तर चिकित्सा डिग्री के साथ डिग्री स्तर के किसी होम्योपैथिक चिकित्सा 
संस्थान में या केंद्र सरकार या राष्ट्रीय आयुर्विज्ञान आयोग द्वारा अनुमत मेडिकल कॉलेज में संबंधित विषय में 
पांच वर्ष का शैक्षणिक अनुभव और किसी सूचीबद्ध अथवा विषय-विशेषज्ञों के संपादकीय बोर्ड द्वारा संपादित 
पत्रिका में प्रमुख या सह-लेखक के रूप में कम-से-कम एक लेख प्रकाशित हुआ हो; अथवा 


34 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


केंद्र सरकार या राज्य सरकार या केंद्र शासित प्रदेश प्रशासन या विश्वविद्यालय या राष्ट्रीय संस्थानों की 
अनुसंधान परिषदों में नियमित सेवा में कम से कम पांच साल के पूर्णकालिक अनुसंधान अनुभव के साथ 
संबंधित विषय में होम्योपैथी में मान्यता प्राप्त स्नातकोत्तर योग्यता और किसी सूचीबद्ध अथवा विषय- 
विशेषज्ञों के संपादकीय बोर्ड द्वारा संपादित पत्रिका में प्रमुख या सह-लेखक के रूप में कम-से-कम तीन लेख 
प्रकाशित हुए हों और आयोग द्वारा आयोजित राष्ट्रीय शिक्षक पात्रता परीक्षा उत्तीर्ण की हो; अथवा 


संबंधित विषय में स्नातकोत्तर योग्यता प्राप्त करने के बाद, केंद्र सरकार की स्वास्थ्य सेवाओं या राज्य सरकार 
की स्वास्थ्य सेवाओं, आयुष मंत्रालय में नियमित सेवा का कम से कम पांच वर्ष का अनुभव या मान्यता प्राप्त 
होम्योपैथी चिकित्सा संस्थान में संबंधित विषय में स्नातकोत्तर योग्यता प्राप्त करने के बाद नियमित सेवा में 
चिकित्सा अधिकारी के रूप में पूर्णकालिक पांच वर्ष का अनुभव और आयोग द्वारा आयोजित राष्ट्रीय शिक्षक 
पात्रता परीक्षा उत्तीर्ण की हो। 


(ख) वांछनीय योग्यता: अभ्यर्थी के पास हो- 


()होम्योपैथी में स्नातकोत्तर कार्यक्रम में पर्यवेक्षक या गाइड के रूप में कम से कम पांच वर्ष का अनुभव; अथवा 


(ii) 


संबंधित विश्वविद्यालय या राज्य सरकार या केंद्र सरकार या केंद्र शासित प्रदेश प्रशासन से मान्यता प्राप्त 
अनुसंधान संस्थान में या क्लिनिकल ट्रायल रजिस्ट्री-इंडिया से पंजीकृत किसी परियोजना में अनुसंधान 
का अनुभव। 


6. एसोसिएट प्रोफेसर: त्वचाविज्ञान, बाल रोग और मनोचिकित्सा - 


(क) 


(ख) 


अनिवार्य योग्यता: अभ्यर्थी के पास हो - 


होम्योपैथी में मान्यता प्राप्त खातकोत्तर योग्यता के साथ डिग्री स्तर के किसी होम्योपैथिक चिकित्सा संस्थान 
में संबंधित विषय में कम से कम पांच वर्ष का शैक्षणिक अनुभव और किसी सूचीबद्ध अथवा विषय-विशेषज्ञों 
के संपादकीय बोर्ड द्वारा संपादित पत्रिका में प्रमुख या सह-लेखक के रूप में कम-से-कम एक लेख प्रकाशित 
हुआ हो या चिकित्सा अभ्यास में स्नातकोत्तर डिग्री और चिकित्सा अभ्यास विभाग में पांच वर्ष का शैक्षणिक 
अनुभव रखने वाले शिक्षकों को भी इस अधिसूचना के प्रकाशन की तारीख से दस वर्ष की अवधि के लिए 
त्वचाविज्ञान या बाल रोग या मनोचिकित्सा विभाग में नियुक्ति के लिए विचार किया जाएगा; अथवा 


संबंधित विषय में मेडिकल काउंसिल ऑफ इंडिया (भारतीय चिकित्सा परिषद) या राष्ट्रीय आयुर्विज्ञान आयोग 
से मान्यता प्राप्त स्नातकोत्तर चिकित्सा डिग्री के साथ डिग्री स्तर के किसी होम्योपैथिक चिकित्सा संस्थान में या 
केंद्र सरकार या राष्ट्रीय आयुर्विज्ञान आयोग द्वारा अनुमत महाविद्यालय में संबंधित विषय में कम-से-कम पांच 
वर्ष का शैक्षणिक अनुभव और किसी सूचीबद्ध अथवा विषय-विशेषज्ञों के संपादकीय बोर्ड द्वारा संपादित 
पत्रिका में प्रमुख या सह-लेखक के रूप में कम-से-कम एक लेख प्रकाशित हुआ हो; अथवा 


केंद्र सरकार या राज्य सरकार या केंद्र शासित प्रदेश प्रशासन या विश्वविद्यालय या राष्ट्रीय संस्थानों की 
अनुसंधान परिषदों में नियमित सेवा में कम से कम पांच वर्ष के पूर्णकालिक अनुसंधान अनुभव के साथ 
संबंधित विषय में होम्योपैथी में मान्यता प्राप्त स्नातकोत्तर योग्यता और किसी सूचीबद्ध अथवा विषय- 
विशेषज्ञों को संपादकीय बोर्ड द्वारा संपादित पत्रिका में प्रमुख या सह-लेखक के रूप में कम-से-कम तीन लेख 
प्रकाशित हुए हों और इसके प्रचालन में आने की तारीख से पहले आयोग द्वारा आयोजित राष्ट्रीय शिक्षक 
पात्रता परीक्षा उत्तीर्ण की हो; अथवा 


केंद्र सरकार की स्वास्थ्य सेवाओं या राज्य सरकार की स्वास्थ्य सेवाओं, आयुष मंत्रालय में नियमित सेवा 
(संबंधित विषय में स्नातकोत्तर योग्यता प्राप्त करने के बाद) का कम से कम पांच वर्ष का अनुभव या किसी 
मान्यता प्राप्त होम्योपैथी मेडिकल कॉलेज में पूर्णकालिक चिकित्सा अधिकारी के रूप में कम-से-कम पांच वर्ष 
का अनुभव (संबंधित विषय में स्नातकोत्तर योग्यता प्राप्त करने के बाद) और किसी सूचीबद्ध अथवा विषय- 
विशेषज्ञों के संपादकीय बोर्ड द्वारा संपादित पत्रिका में प्रमुख या सह-लेखक के रूप में कम-से-कम तीन लेख 
प्रकाशित हुए हों तथा इसके प्रचालन में आने की तारीख से पहले आयोग द्वारा आयोजित राष्ट्रीय शिक्षक 
पात्रता परीक्षा उत्तीर्ण की हो। 


वांछनीय योग्यता: अभ्यर्थी के पास हो - 
6) होम्योपैथी में स्नातकोत्तर कार्यक्रम में पर्यवेक्षक या गाइड के रूप में कम से कम पांच वर्ष का 


[भाग गा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 35 


अनुभव; अथवा 
(0) संबंधित विश्वविद्यालय या राज्य सरकार या केंद्र सरकार या केंद्र शासित प्रदेश प्रशासन से 


मान्यता प्राप्त अनुसंधान संस्थान में या क्लिनिकल ट्रायल रजिस्ट्री-इंडिया से पंजीकृत किसी 
परियोजना में अनुसंधान का अनुभव। 


7. एसोसिएट प्रोफेसर: शोध प्रविधि और जैव सांख्यिकी - 
(क) अनिवार्य योग्यता: अभ्यर्थी के पास हो - 


होम्योपैथी में मान्यता प्राप्त स्नातकोत्तर योग्यता के साथ होम्योपैथिक मेडिकल कॉलेज में कम से कम पांच वर्ष 
का शैक्षणिक अनुभव हो और शोध प्रविधि भी पढ़ाई हो और किसी सूचीबद्ध अथवा विषय विशेषज्ञ द्वारा 
संपादित पत्रिका में प्रमुख या सह-लेखक के रूप में कम-से-कम एक लेख प्रकाशित हुआ हो; अथवा 


होम्योपैथी में मान्यता प्राप्त स्नातकोत्तर योग्यता या मेडिकल स्टैटिस्टिक्स (चिकित्सा सांख्यिकी) या 
बायोस्टैटिस्टिक्स (जैव सांख्यिकी) या महामारी विज्ञान (एपिडेमियोलॉजी) या शोध प्रविधि (रिसर्च 
मेथडोलॉजी) या चिकित्सा सांख्यिकी (मेडिकल स्टैटिस्टिक्स) के अन्य प्रासंगिक विषय में स्नातकोत्तर डिग्री के 
साथ संबंधित विश्वविद्यालय या राज्य सरकार या केंद्र सरकार या केंद्र शासित प्रदेश प्रशासन से मान्यता प्राप्त 
अनुसंधान संस्थान में नियमित सेवा में रहते हुए कम-से-कम पांच वर्ष का पूर्णकालिक शोध अनुभव हो और 
किसी सूचीबद्ध या विषय-विशेषज्ञ द्वारा संपादितपत्रिका में प्रमुख या सह-लेखक के रूप में कम से कम चार 
मूल लेख प्रकाशित हुए हों और इसके प्रचालन में आने की तारीख से पहले राष्ट्रीय शिक्षक पात्रता परीक्षा 
उत्तीर्ण की हो। 
(ख) वांछनीय योग्यता: अभ्यर्थी के पास हो - 
6) होम्योपैथी में स्नातकोत्तर कार्यक्रम में पर्यवेक्षक या गाइड के रूप में कम से कम तीन वर्ष का 
अनुभव; अथवा 
Gi) संबंधित विश्वविद्यालय या राज्य सरकार या केंद्र सरकार या केंद्र शासित प्रदेश प्रशासन से 
मान्यता प्राप्त अनुसंधान संस्थान में या क्लिनिकल ट्रायल रजिस्ट्री-इंडिया से पंजीकृत किसी 
परियोजना में अनुसंधान का अनुभव। 
डॉ. तारकेश्वर जैन, अध्यक्ष 
[विज्ञापन-ा/4/असा./843/2023-24] 
परिशिष्ट क 


(विनियम 5 का उप-विनियम (5) देखें) 


दिव्यांग जन अधिकार अधिनियम, 206 (20/6 का 49) की धारा 2 के खंड (यग) में उल्लिखित "विनिर्दिष्ट 
दिव्यांगता" से संबंधित अनुसूची में प्रावधान निम्नानुसार हैं:- 
4. शारीरिक दिव्यांगता- 
(क) लोकोमोटर दिव्यांगता (मस्कुलोस्केलेटल या तंत्रिका तंत्र या दोनों की पीड़ा के परिणामस्वरूप स्वयं और वस्तुओं की 
गति से जुड़े विशिष्ट कार्यकलापों को निष्पादित करने में किसी व्यक्ति की असमर्थता), जिसमें शामिल हैं- 
() "कुष्ठ रोग से ठीक होने वाले व्यक्ति" का अर्थ है एक व्यक्ति जो कुष्ठ रोग से ठीक हो गया है लेकिन उसमें 
निम्नलिखित के कारण काम करने की कमी है- 
(क) हाथों या पैरों में संवेदना की हानि के साथ-साथ आंख और पलकों में संवेदना और पैरेसिस की हानि लेकिन 
कोई प्रत्यक्ष विकृति नहीं; 
(ख) प्रत्यक्ष विकृति और पैरेसिस लेकिन उनके हाथों और पैरों में पर्याप्त गतिशीलता होने से वे सामान्य आर्थिक 
कार्यकलाप में संलग्न हो सकें; 


(ग) अत्यधिक शारीरिक विकृति के साथ-साथ बढ़ी हुई उम्र जो उसे कोई भी लाभकारी व्यवसाय करने से रोकती है 
AT "HPS रोग से ठीक होने वाले" शब्द का तदनुसार अर्थ लगाया जाएगा। 


36 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


(ii) ॒इस्‍'सेरेब्रल पाल्सी" का अर्थ है शरीर की गतिशीलता और मांसपेशियों के समन्वय को प्रभावित करने वाली नॉन- 
प्रोगेसिव न्यूरोलॉजिकल स्थिति का एक समूह, जो मस्तिष्क के एक या अधिक विशिष्ट क्षेत्रों को नुकसान के 
कारण होता है, जो आमतौर पर जन्म से पहले, जन्म के दौरान या उसके तुरंत बाद होता है। 

(iii) "बौनापन" का अर्थ है एक ऐसी चिकित्सा या आनुवंशिक स्थिति जिसके परिणामस्वरूप वयस्क की लंबाई 4 
फीट 40 इंच (447 सेंटीमीटर) या उससे कम होती है। 


(५) "मस्कुलर डिस्ट्रॉफी" का अर्थ है वंशानुगत आनुवंशिक मांसपेशी रोग का एक ऐसा समूह जो मानव शरीर को 
चलाने वाली मांसपेशियों को कमजोर करता है और मल्टीपल डिस्ट्रोफी वाले व्यक्तियों के जीन में गलत और 
जानकारी का अभाव होता है, जो उन्हें मांसपेशियों के स्वास्थ्य के लिए आवश्यक प्रोटीन बनाने से रोकती है। 
यह प्रोगेसिव chet मसल (कंकाल की मांसपेशियों) की कमजोरी, मांसपेशियों के प्रोटीन में दोष और 
मांसपेशियों की कोशिकाओं और ऊतकों की मृत्यु के रूप में परिलक्षित होता है। 

(४) "एसिड हमला पीड़ित" का अर्थ है एसिड या इसी तरह के क्षयकारी पदार्थ फेंककर हिंसक हमले किए जाने के 
कारण विकृत हुआ व्यक्ति। 

(ख) gear 
() "अंधापन" का अर्थ है एक ऐसी स्थिति जिसमें किसी व्यक्ति में सर्वोत्तम सुधार के बाद भी निम्नलिखित में से 
कोई भी स्थिति होती है- 
(क) पूर्ण दृष्टि हानि, या 
(ख) सर्वोत्तम संभव सुधार के साथ बेहतर आंखों A 3/60 से कम या 0/200 (aera) से कम दृष्टि तीक्ष्णता, 
या 
(ग) 0 डिग्री से कम का कोण अंतरित करने वाले दृष्टि क्षेत्र की सीमा 
(ii) "कम-दृष्टि" का अर्थ है एक ऐसी स्थिति जिसमें किसी व्यक्ति में निम्नलिखित में से कोई भी स्थिति हो अर्थात्‌:- 
(क) सर्वोत्तम संभव सुधार के साथ बेहतर आंख में दृश्य तीक्ष्णता 6/8 से अधिक नहीं होना या 20/60 से 
3/60 तक या 40/200 (acta) से कम होना; या 
(ख) 40 डिग्री से कम के कोण को 0 डिग्री तक अंतरित करने वाले दृष्टि क्षेत्र की सीमा। 
(ग) श्रवण हानि - 
(i) "बधिर" का अर्थ है दोनों कानों में बोलने की आवृत्ति में 70 डेसीबल्स (डीबी) श्रवण हानि वाले व्यक्ति; 
(ii) -“"भुनने में कठिनाई" का अर्थ है वह व्यक्ति जिसके दोनों कानों में बोलने की आवृत्ति में 60 डेसीबल्स 
(डीबी) की श्रवण हानि हो, 


(घ) "वाक्‌ और भाषा दिव्यांगता" का अर्थ है जैविक या तंत्रिका संबंधी कारणों से बातचीत और भाषा के एक या 
अधिक घटकों को प्रभावित करने वाली लेरिंजेक्टोमी या वाचाघात जैसी स्थितियों से उत्पन्न होने वाली 
स्थायी दिव्यांगता; 


(=) बौद्धिक दिव्यांगता एक ऐसी स्थिति है जो बौद्धिक कामकाज (तर्क करने, सीखने, समस्या को सुलझाने) और 
मूल व्यवहार दोनों में महत्वपूर्ण सीमा को दर्शाती है जिसमें दिन-प्रतेदिन के अनेक सामाजिक और 
व्यावहारिक कौशल आते है, जिसमें निम्नलिखित शामिल हैं- 


(i) "सीखने से संबंधित विशिष्ट अक्षमताएं" का अर्थ है स्थितियों का एक ऐसा विषम समूह जिसमें बोली जाने 
वाली या लिखित भाषा को संसाधित करने की कमी होती है, जो समझने, बोलने, पढ़ने, लिखने, वर्तनी, या 
गणितीय गणना करने में कठिनाई के रूप में प्रकट हो सकती है और इसमें स्थायी दिव्यांगता, डिस्लेक्सिया, 
डिस्ग्राफिया, डिस्केल्कुलिया, डिस्प्रेक्सिया और विकासात्मक वाचाघात जैसी स्थितियां शामिल हैं। 


(ii) "ऑटिज्म स्पेक्ट्रम डिसऑर्डर" का अर्थ है आमतौर पर जीवन के पहले तीन वर्षों में दिखाई देने वाली न्यूरो- 
डेवलपमेंट संबंधी स्थिति जो किसी व्यक्ति की संवाद करने, रिश्तों को समझने और दूसरों के साथ संबंध को 


[भागवता--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 37 


समझने की क्षमता को महत्वपूर्ण रूप से प्रभावित करती है और यह अक्सर पारंपरिक या रूढ़िवादी रिवाजों 
या व्यवहारों से जुड़ी होती है, 

2. "मानसिक बीमारी" का अर्थ है सोच, मनोदशा, धारणा, अभिविन्यास या स्मृति में पर्याप्त विकार जो निर्णय, व्यवहार, 
वास्तविकता को पहचानने की क्षमता या जीवन की सामान्य मांगों को पूरा करने की क्षमता को बाधित करता 
है, लेकिन इसमें मंदता शामिल नहीं है जो किसी व्यक्ति के मस्तिष्क के अवरुद्ध या अधूरे विकास की स्थिति 
होती है, 

3. निम्नलिखित के कारण दिव्यांगता- 

(क) पुरानी न्यूरोलॉजिकल स्थितियां जैसे - 

(i) "मल्टीपल स्केलेरोसिस" का अर्थ है एक इन्फ्लेमेटरी, तंत्रिका तंत्र रोग जिसमें मस्तिष्क और रीढ़ की हड्डी की 
तंत्रिका कोशिकाओं के अक्षतंतु के चारों ओर माइलिन आवरण क्षतिग्रस्त हो जाते हैं, जिससे विघटन होता है 
और मस्तिष्क तथा रीढ़ की हड्डी की तंत्रिका कोशिकाओं की एक दूसरे के साथ संवाद करने की क्षमता 
प्रभावित होती है। 

(ii) "पार्किसंस रोग" का अर्थ है तंत्रिका तंत्र की एक उत्तरोत्तर बढ़ने वाली बीमारी जो कंपकंपी, मांसपेशियों की 
कठोरता और धीमी, गलत गति के रूप में चिहिनत होती है, जो मुख्य रूप से मस्तिष्क के बेसल गैन्ग्लिया 
विकार और न्यूरोट्रांसमीटर डोपामाइन की कमी वाले मध्यम आयु वर्ग और बुजुर्ग लोगों को प्रभावित करती 
है। 

(a) रक्त विकार- 


(i) "हीमोफिलिया" का अर्थ है एक विरासत में मिली बीमारी, जो आमतौर पर केवल पुरुष को प्रभावित करती 
है, लेकिन महिलाओं के माध्यम से उनके AT Tal में प्रेषित होती है जिससे रक्त का सामान्य ART जमने की 
क्षमता के नुकसान या हानि के रूप में परिलक्षित होता है जिसके कारण एक मामूली घाव घातक रक्तस्राव में 
बदल सकता है, 

(ii) "थैलेसीमिया" का अर्थ है विरासत में मिले विकारों का एक समूह जो हीमोग्लोबिन की कमी या अनुपस्थिति 
को परिलक्षित करता है, 

(iii) "सिकल सेल रोग" का अर्थ है एक हेमोलिटिक विकार जो पुरानी एनीमिया (खून की कमी), दर्दनाक घटनाओं 
और संबंधित ऊतक व अंग क्षति के कारण विभिन्न जटिलताओं के रूप में परिलक्षित होती है "हेमोलिटिक" 
लाल रक्त कोशिकाओं की कोशिका झिल्ली के विकार को दर्शाता है जिसके परिणामस्वरूप हीमोग्लोबिन का 
स्राव होता है। 

4.  बहरा, अंधापन सहित ae दिव्यांगता (ऊपर निर्दिष्ट दिव्यांगताओं में से एक से अधिक) जिसका अर्थ है एक ऐसी 
स्थिति जिसमें किसी व्यक्ति को श्रवण और दृश्य हानि दोनों हो सकता है जिसके कारण गंभीर संचार, विकास 
और शैक्षणिक समस्याएं होती हैं। 

5. केंद्र सरकार द्वारा समय-समय पर अधिसूचित की जाने वाली कोई अन्य श्रेणी। 

परिशिष्ट ख 
(विनियम 5 का उप-विनियमन (5) देखें) 


होम्योपैथी स्नातकोत्तर डिग्री पाठ्यक्रम-डॉक्टर ऑफ मेडिसिन इन होम्योपैथी में दिव्यांग जन अधिकार 
अधिनियम, 20/6 (20/6 का 49) के तहत "विनिर्दिष्ट दिव्यांगता" वाले छात्रों के प्रवेश के संबंध में दिशानिर्देश। 
CQ) "दिव्यांगता प्रमाण पत्र" दिव्यांग जन अधिकार नियमावली, 207 के अनुसार जारी किया जाएगा। 
(2) किसी व्यक्ति की "विनिर्दिष्ट दिव्यांगता" की सीमा का मूल्यांकन दिव्यांग जन अधिकार अधिनियम, 2046 (2046 का 


49) के तहत दिनांक 4 जनवरी, 20(8 को संख्या एस.ओ. 76 (ई) द्वारा भारत के राजपत्र, असाधारण, भाग I, 
धारा 3, उप-धारा (ii) A प्रकाशित दिशा-निर्देशों के अनुसार किया जाएगा। 


(3) दिव्यांगता की न्यूनतम डिग्री चालीस प्रतिशत होनी चाहिए। विनिर्दिष्ट दिव्यांगता वाले व्यक्तियों द्वारा आरक्षण का 
लाभ उठाने के पात्र होने के लिए (बेंचमार्क दिव्यांगता)। 


38 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY 


[PART III—SEc.4] 


(4) 'शारीरिक रूप से दिव्यांग' (पीएच) शब्द के बजाय "दिव्यांग जन (पीडब्ल्यूडी) शब्द का प्रयोग किया जाएगा। 


तालिका 
क्रम | श्रेणी दिव्यांगता का | विनिर्दिष्ट दिव्यांगता दिव्यांगता की सीमा 
संख्या प्रकार 
(5) 
(4) | (2) (3) (4) होम्योपैथी होम्योपैथी पाठ्यक्रम के लिए 
स्नातकोत्तर डिग्री स्नातकोत्तर डिग्री पात्र नहीं 
कोर्स के लिए पात्र- | कोर्स के लिए पात्र- 
होम्योपैथी में डॉक्टर | होम्योपैथी में डॉक्टर 
ऑफ मेडिसिन, ऑफ मेडिसिन, 
Rromtn लि के लिए दिव्यांग जन कोटा के 
पात्र नहीं लिए पात्र 
4, | शारीरिक (क) विनिर्दिष्ट | (क) कुष्ठ रोग से ठीक | 40% से कम 40-80% 80% से अधिक 
दिव्यांगता | दिव्यांगताओं सहित हुआ व्यक्ति* दिव्यांगता दिव्यांगता- 
लोकोमोटर दिव्यांगता, |(ख)सेरेब्रल पाल्सी** 80 see से अधिक 
(क से च). (ग) बौनापन कक 
(घ) मस्कुलर मामला-दर-मामला 
डिस्ट्राफीव आधार पर अनुमति 
(मांसपेशीय दुर्विकास) दी जा सकती है और 
(=) एसिड हमला के उनकी कार्य 
AR अक्षमता में सहायक 
— उपकरणों की 
सहायता ली जाएगी, 
“* जैसे PPT, इनका उपयोग यह 
पोलियोमाइलाइटिस, देखने के लिए किया 
इत्यादि। जाएगा कि क्‍या 
इससे दिव्यांगता 
80% से नीचे आ 
गई है और क्‍या 
उनके 
पास इस पाठ्यक्रम 
को संतोषजनक ढंग 
से आगे बढ़ाने और 
पूरा करने के लिए 
आवश्यक पर्याप्त 
मोटर, क्षमता है। 
५ उंगलियों और हाथों में संवेदनाओं के नुकसान, विच्छेदन तथा आंखों 
के योगदान और संबंधित सिफारिशों पर ध्यान दिया जाना चाहिए। 
** दृष्टि, श्रवण, संज्ञानात्मक कार्य आदि की हानि पर ध्यान दिया जाना 
चाहिए और संबंधित सिफारिशों को भी ध्यान में रखा जाना चाहिए। 
*** होम्योपैथी पोस्ट-ग्रेजुएट डिग्री कोर्स - डॉक्टर ऑफ मेडिसिन इन 
होम्योपैथी के लिए पात्र माने जाने के लिए दोनों हाथ सही-सलामत 
होना, उनमें पूरी संवेदना, पर्याप्र ताकत और पूरी तरह गति का होना 
आवश्यक है। 


[भाग ave 4] 


भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 39 


(ख) gear (क) अंधापन 40% से कम 40% के बराबर 
(*) (ख) कम दिखाई देना | दिव्यांगता (अर्थात या इससे अधिक 
श्रेणी दिव्यांगता 
'0(0%)' | (अर्थात श्रेणी 
(20%)' Ill और इससे 
॥ (30%) ऊपर) 
(ग) श्रवण हानि&) (क) बहरापन 40% से कम 40% के बराबर 
(ख) कम सुनाई देना दिव्यांगता या इससे अधिक 
दिव्यांगता 


(*)40% से अधिक दृश्य हानि/दृश्य दिव्यांगता वाले व्यक्तियों को होम्योपैथी में 
पोस्ट ग्रेजुएट डिग्री कोर्स-डॉक्टर ऑफ मेडिसिन करने के लिए पात्र बनाया जा 
सकता है और आरक्षण दिया जा सकता है बशर्ते कि दृश्य दिव्यांगता को 
दूरबीन/मैग्नरिफायर जैसे कम दृष्टि के लिए उन्नत उपकरणों की सहायता से 40% के 
बेंचमार्क से कम के स्तर पर लाया जाए। 
@ 40% से अधिक श्रवण दिव्यांगता वाले व्यक्तियों को होम्योपैथी में बैचलर ऑफ 
होम्योपैथी, स्नातकोत्तर डिग्री कोर्स- डॉक्टर ऑफ मेडिसिन करने के लिए पात्र 
बनाया जा सकता है और उन्हें आरक्षण दिया जा सकता है, बशर्ते कि श्रवण 
दिव्यांगता को सहायक उपकरणों की सहायता से 40% के बेंचमार्क से कम स्तर पर 
लाया जाए। 
इसके अलावा, व्यक्ति के पास 60% से अधिक स्पीच डिस्क्रिमिनेशन (बातचीत 
विभेदन) स्कोर होना चाहिए। 


(घ) ऑर्गेनिक/न्यूरोलॉजिकल 40% से कम बराबर या उससे 
बातचीत और भाषा कारण अधिक 
दिव्यांगता दिव्यांगता 40% दिव्यांगता 


होम्योपैथी पोस्ट-ग्रेजुएट डिग्री कोर्स- डॉक्टर ऑफ मेडिसिन इन होम्योपैथी में प्रवेश के लिए स्पीच 
इंटेलिजिबिलिटी अफेक्टेड स्कोर 3 (जो 40% से कम के सदृश होगा) से अधिक नहीं होगा। इस स्कोर से 
अधिक स्कोर वाले व्यक्ति होम्योपैथी पोस्ट-ग्रेजुएट डिग्री कोर्स- डॉक्टर ऑफ मेडिसिन इन होम्योपैथी 
कोर्स में प्रवेश के लिए पात्र नहीं होंगे। 


40% तक अपासिया कोशंट (एक्यू) वाले व्यक्ति होम्योपैथी पोस्ट-ग्रेजुएट डिग्री कोर्स-डॉक्टर ऑफ 
मेडिसिन इन होम्योपैथी करने के लिए पात्र हो सकते हैं, लेकिन इससे अधिक होने पर वे न तो 
होम्योपैथी पोस्ट-ग्रेजुएट डिग्री कोर्स- डॉक्टर ऑफ मेडिसिन इन होम्योपैथी करने के लिए पात्र होंगे और 
न ही उन्हें कोई आरक्षण मिलेगा। 


बौद्धिक 
दिव्यांगता 


(क) सीखने की विशिष्ट # फिलहाल, एसएलडी की गंभीरता का आकलन करने के लिए 


अक्षमता (अवधारणात्मक| कोई गणना पैमाना उपलब्ध नहीं है; इसलिए 40% का कट- 
दिव्यांगता, डिस्लेक्सिया,, ऑफ मनमाना है तथा इसके लिए और अधिक खसबूतों की 
डिस्क्लेकुलिया, डिस्प्रेक्सिया | आवश्यकता है। 
और विकासात्मक अपासिया) 40% से कम | 40% के बराबर या 
दिव्यांगता उससे अधिक 
दिव्यांगता लेकिन 

विशेषज्ञ पैनल द्वारा 

उपचारात्म/सहायक 

प्रौद्योगिकी/सहायक 


40 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY 


[PART II—SEc.4] 


उपकरणों (एड्स)/ 


अवसंरचनात्मक 
परिवर्तनों की 
सहायता से मूल्यांकन 
की गई सीखने की 
योग्यता के आधार 
पर चयन होगा। 
(ख) ऑटिज्म स्पेक्ट्रम | जिन मामलों में |फिलहाल, वस्तुनिष्ठ 60% के बराबर 
विकार किसी व्यक्ति को |पद्धति की कमी के या इससे अधिक 
किसी विशेषज्ञ | कारण अनुशंसित दिव्यां या 
पैनल द्वारा | नहीं है। पंज्ञानात्मक/बौद्धि 
होम्योपैथी पोस्ट- ertray P दिव्यांगता 
ग्रेजुएट डिग्री cule की वेहतर (erm यदि किसी 
कोर्स- डॉक्टर पद्धति विकसित करने व्यक्ति को किसी 
ऑफ मेडिसिन के बाद आरशग कोटा विशेषज्ञ पैनल 
इन होम्योपैथी के लाभ पर भविष्य |? होम्योपैथी 
कोर्स के लिए में विचार किया हो पें डॉक्टर ऑफ 
योग्य माना जाता सकता है। पेडिसिन-.. पोस्ट 
है, उन मामलों में ग्रिजुएट डिग्री कोर्स 
दिव्यांगता, न हो व के लिए 
या कम अयोग्य माना 
दिव्यांगता हो, जाता है। 
एस्परसर सिंड्रोम 
(आईएसएए के 
अनुसार 40- 
60% दिव्यांगता) 
मानसिक मानसिक रोग दिव्यांगता न होना फिलहाल, मानसिक | 40% के बराबर 
व्यवहार या हल्का होना: बीमारी होने और | या उससे अधिक 
40% से कम पकी सीमा की पुष्टि दिव्यांगता या यदि 
(आईडीईएएस के A की वस्तुनिष्ठ |व्यक्ति को अपने 
तहत) पद्धति नहीं होने के दिायित्वों के निर्वहन 
कारण अनुशंसित नहीं | के लिए अयोग्य 
| तथापि, दिव्यांगता | माना जाता है। 
आकलन की बेहतर योग्यता” के मानक 
पद्धति विकसित करने | तैयार किए जा 
के बाद आरक्षण/कोटा | सकते हैं। 
कि लाभ पर भविष्य में 
विच किया जा 
THAT el 
4. | के कारण (क) क्रोनिक (i) मल्टिपल 40% से 40% 80% |80% से अधिक 
दिव्यांगता न्यूरोलॉजिकल स्क्‍लेरोसिस कम दिव्यांगता 


[भाग एा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 4] 


स्थितियां (ii) पार्किसनिज़्म [दिव्यांगता दिव्यांगता 

(ख) रक्त विकार (i) हीमोफीलिया | 40% से 40%80% [80% से अधिक 

(अधिक रक्तस्राव) कम oe दिव्यांगता 

(iy Saree 
(iii) Fret सेल रोग 

5. | बहरापन, ऊपर विनिर्दिष्ट. व्यक्तिगत मामलों में उपर्युक्त में से किसी की भी 
अंधापन दिव्यांगताओं में से एक अर्थात्‌, दृश्य, श्रवण, बातचीत और भाषा 
सहित से अधिक दिव्यांगता, बौद्धिक दिव्यांग और मानसिक 
विविध बीमारी उपस्थिति के संबंध में सिफारिशों पर 
दिव्यांगता निर्णय लेते समय विविध दिव्यांगता के घटक के रूप 


में उपर्युक्त सभी पर विचार किया जाना चाहिए। 


भारत सरकार द्वारा जारी संबंधित राजपत्र 
अधिसूचना द्वारा अधिसूचित सूत्र का संयोजन: 


क+ख (90-क) 
90 


(जहां विभिन्न दिव्यांगताओं के लिए की गई गणना बे 
अनुसार क = दिव्यांगता का उच्च % मूल्य और | = 
दिव्यांगता का कम % मूल्य) की अनुशंसा उस 
दिव्यांगता की गणना करने के लिए की गई है जब 
किसी व्यक्ति में एक से अधिक दिव्यांगता होती है। 


Taal का उपयोग विविध दिव्यांगता वाले 
मामलों में किया जा सकता है, और किसी व्यक्ति में 
: विशिष्ट दिव्यांगताओं के अनुसार प्रवेश 
और/या आरक्षण के बारे में सिफारिशें की जा सकती 
i 
नोट 4: दिव्यांग जन (पीडब्ल्यूडी) श्रेणी के तहत चयन के लिए अभ्यर्थी को भारत सरकार के संबंधित प्राधिकरण 
द्वारा नामित दिव्यांगता मूल्यांकन बोर्डों द्वारा काउंसलिंग की निर्धारित तिथि से पहले जारी दिव्यांगता 

प्रमाण पत्र प्रस्तुत करना आवश्यक होगा। 


नोट 2: किसी भी श्रेणी में पात्र उम्मीदवारों की अनुपलब्धता के मामले में, खाली सीटों को अखिल भारतीय कोटा 
सीटों या राज्य कोटा सीटों, जैसा भी मामला हो, की सामान्य श्रेणी में परिवर्तित कर दिया जाएगा | 


अनुलग्नक 
सारांश सल्यांकन प्रोफार्सा 
(विनियम 8 का उप-विनियम (॥) देखें) 
क्र.सं. प्रस्तुत शीर्षक और सारांश का विवरण 

Al; कॉलेज: कॉलेज का कोड 

कॉलेज का नाम 
2. पाठ्यक्रम: विषय/विशेषता के साथ पीजी डिग्री कोर्स का नाम 

छात्र का नाम 

3. छात्र: (पहला नाम ___ सध्य नाम ___ अंतिम नाम) 


42 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY 


[PART II—SEc.4] 


विभाग की पात्रता (पत्र की तारीख और संदर्भ संख्या) 


संपर्क नंबर: ई-मेल आईडी: 
4. बैच: शैक्षणिक वर्ष जिसमें छात्र को प्रवेश दिया गया - 
प्रवेश की तारीख (तारीख/माह/वर्ष) 
5. गाइड/सुपरवाइजर: गाइड/सुपरवाइजर का नाम: 
संपर्क नंबर: ई-मेल आईडी:: 
पीजी मान्यता की स्थिति: 
ian . पात्रता: संबद्ध विश्वविद्यालय द्वारा छात्र को जारी किया गया अनुमति पत्र और कोर 


7. शोध प्रविधि कार्यशाला: क्या उपस्थित हुआ: हाँ/नहीं 


भागीदारी प्रमाण पत्र संलग्न है: हॉँ/नहीं 


यदि हां, तो उपस्थिति की तारीख (तारीख/माह/वर्ष) 


| 8. | सारांश का शीर्षक: (विश्वविद्यालय में प्रस्तुत कर दिया गया) 
छात्र का नाम: विषय विशेषज्ञता: प्रवेश का वर्ष: 
सारांश प्रस्तुत करने की तारीख: स्नातकोत्तर गाइड से अनुमोदन की तारीख: 


संस्थान में भर्ती प्रत्येक विषय विशेषज्ञता में प्रत्येक छात्र के सारांश का मूल्यांकन करने के लिए सभी होम्योपैथी 


स्नातकोत्तर संस्थानों के लिए सारांश मूल्यांकन जांच-सूची (चेकलिस्ट)। 


सभी छात्रों की संकलित जानकारी नीचे उल्लिखित चेकलिस्ट में अनुमोदन के लिए विश्वविद्यालय को भेजी जाएगी 


सारांश मूल्यांकन जांच-सूची 
| मद iL 4 हां नहीं उण्न० टिप्पणी, यदि कोई 
हो 

a: शीर्षक fi स्पष्ट और संक्षिप्त 

2. उल्लिखित महत्वपूर्ण 

वेरिएबल 

3. रोगी/प्रतिभागी 

4. कार्यकलाप 

5. कंपैरेटर 

6. परिणाम 

7. अध्ययन डिजाइन को 

दर्शाता है 

8. प्राथमिक उद्देश्यों को 

दर्शाता है 

9. लक्षित जनसंख्या 

शामिल है 


[भाग lave 4] 


भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


40. क्या शीर्षक/अध्ययन 
दोहराया गया है 


2. रिसर्च गैप 


. अब तक किए गए 
अनुसंधान में अंतराल की 
पहचान की गई है 


3. अनुसंधान प्रश्न 


Is व्यवहार्य 


रोचक 


अभिनव 


BR) ७ | ० 


नैतिकतापूर्ण 


5. प्रासंगिक 


6. सामाजिक रूप 
से प्रासंगिक 


4. प्राककल्पना 


4. स्पष्ट रूप से बताया गया 


2. दो या दो से अधिक 
वैरिएबल के बीच संबंध को 
दर्शाता है 


5. प्रस्तावना 


4. अध्ययन का औचित्य 


2. प्रासंगिक महामारी विज्ञान 
डेटा 


3. मौजूदा ज्ञान की कमी और 
इस तरह की कमी को कैसे 
दूर किया जाए 


ह ४ साहित्य की 
समीक्षा 


4. वर्तमान अध्ययन के लिए 
प्रासंगिक हाल में किए गए 
शोध अध्ययन शामिल हैं 


2. बताई गई समस्या के बारे 
में ज्ञान कमी को प्रस्तुत 
करता है 


3. अनुसंधान प्रश्न को सही 
ठहराता है 


4. निम्नलिखित स्रोतों से संदर्भ 
लिए गए: -पत्रिकाएं, 
पाठ्यपुस्तकें, सरकारी रिपोर्ट, 
शास्त्रीय पाठ्यपुस्तकें, संदर्भ 
पुस्तकें, डेटाबेस, वेबसाइटें 
इत्यादि। 


7. उद्देश्य: 


स्मार्ट मानदंडों को पूरा करता 
है? 
विशिष्ट -सुधार के लिए एक 


44 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY 


[PART II—SEc.4] 


विशिष्ट क्षेत्र को लक्षित करें। 


मापने योग्य - मात्रा या कम से 
कम प्रगति का एक संकेतक 
सुझाएं। 

असाइनेबल (निर्धार्य) - निर्दिष्ट 
करें कि यह कौन करेगा 


यथार्थवादी-बताएं कि 
उपलब्ध संसाधनों को देखते 
हुए वास्तव में क्‍या परिणाम 
प्राप्त किए जा सकते हैं। 

समय से संबंधित-बताएं कि 
परिणाम कब प्राप्त किए जा 
सकते हैं। 


पद्धति 


4. अध्ययन डिजाइन 
का प्रकार 


2. सेटिंग (अध्ययन का स्थान) 


3. अध्ययन की अवधि 


4. अध्ययन विषयों के चयन 
की विधि (पात्रता मानदंड) 


- समावेशन मानदंड 


- बहिर्वेषण मानदंड 


5. तुलना/नियंत्रण समूह के 
चयन की विधि 


6. मिलान मानदंड 


7. प्रचालन परिभाषाएं 


8. उपकरणों और संबंधित 
मापों की विशिष्टता 


आंकड़ा संग्रह के 
लिए निर्दिष्ट और 
बताई गई शोध 
प्रविधि 


{. नमूना आकार 


2. नमूना तैयार करने की 
तकनीक 


3. उद्देश्यों के लिए प्रासंगिक 
संग्रह की विधि 


4. अध्ययन उपकरण 
या आंकड़ा संग्रह 
उपकरण 


5. आंकड़ा प्रबंधन. और 
विध्लेषण प्रक्रिया 
(कोर्डिंग और 
कंप्यूटर का उपयोग) 


[भाग ave 4] 


भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


45 


. सांख्यिकीय विश्लेषण 


की योजना 


0. 


नैतिक मंजूरी 


4. 


संदर्भ शैली: 


4.वैंकूबर 


2. 


ATTA: 


. अध्ययन में उपयोग किया 


जाने वाला केस रिकॉर्ड 
फॉर्म या प्रश्नावली या 
WHat aT कोई अन्य 
अध्ययन उपकरण 


. रोगी का सूचना पत्र और 


सूचित सहमति फॉर्म 
(स्थानीय भाषा सहित) 


. मान्य और प्रामाणिक 


संक्षिप्त नाम 


. अध्ययन परिणामों के 


मूल्यांकन के मानदंड 


. सहयोगी शोध कार्य के 


प्रामाणिक दस्तावेज, यदि 
कोई हो ढ(बुनियादी 
अवसंरचना, मानव 
संसाधन इत्यादि का 
उपयोग) 


. परिशिष्ट “क' (सारांश 


प्रस्तुत करने के पत्र का 
शीर्षक) 


. परिशिष्ट @ (आचार 


समिति का अनुमोदन) 


. छात्र द्वारा भाग ली गई 


शोध प्रविधि कार्यशाला का 
प्रमाण पत्र 


3. 


मूल्यांकनकर्ता 
द्वारा समापन 
टिप्पणी: 


4. स्वीकार किया गया 
. संशोधनों के साथ स्वीकार 


किया गया 


. खारिज कर दिया गया 


4. 


सुझाए गए 
संशोधन: 


दिनांक: 


हस्ताक्षर 


मूल्यांकनकर्ता का नाम, पदनाम और पता 


46 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


NATIONAL COMMISSION FOR HOMOEOPATHY 
NOTIFICATION 
New Delhi, the l8th March, 2024. 


F. No. 3-42/202/NCH/HEB/PG.Reg.—In exercise of the powers conferred by sub-section (l) and clause (r) 
of sub-section (2) of section 55 read with section l6 and section 26 of the National Commission for Homoeopathy 
Act, 2020 (I5 of 2020) and in supersession of the Homoeopathy (Post Graduate Degree Course) 
M.D.(Hom.) Regulations, 989, except as respect things done or omitted to be done before such supersession, 
the Commission hereby makes the following regulations, namely: - 


l.Short title and commencement. (l) These regulations may be called the National Commission for 
Homoeopathy (Homoeopathy Post-Graduate Degree Course- Doctor of Medicine in Homoeopathy) Regulations, 
2024. 


(2) They shall come into force from the date of their publication in the Official Gazette. 
2. Definitions.— () In these regulations, unless the context otherwise requires- 
(a) “Act” means the National Commission for Homoeopathy Act, 2020 (I5 of 2020); 
(b) “annexure” means an annexure appended to these regulations; 
(c) “appendix” means an appendix appended to these regulations; 


(d) “electives” means an optional course of studies devised to enrich the educational expression of the 
student; 


(e) “M.D. (Homoeopathy)” means a post-graduate degree in Homoeopathy (Doctor of Medicine in 
Homoeopathy); 


(f) “syllabus” includes the curriculum for study as specified by the National Commission for 
Homoeopathy under these regulations. 


(2) The words and expressions used in these regulations and not defined, but defined in the Act shall have the 
same meanings as respectively assigned to them in the Act. 


3. Objective of homoeopathy post-graduate training programme.— The objective of homoeopathy post-graduate 
training programme are as follows, namely :— 


(a) recognise the importance of Homoeopathy in context with National priorities and health needs of 
the community; 


(b) practice Homoeopathy ethically and in step with the principles of the system; 


(c) develop skills as a self-directed learner, recognise continuing education needs, select and use 
appropriate learning resources; 


(d) demonstrate competence in basic concepts of research methodology and epidemiology and be able to 
critically analyse relevant published research literature; 


(e) identify social, economic, environmental, biological and emotional determinants of health in a given 
case, and take them into account while planning therapeutic, rehabilitative, preventive and promotive 
measures or strategies; 


(f) diagnose health problems and manage as per the scope of homoeopathy on the basis of clinical 
assessment, investigations etc; 


(g) demonstrate scientific acumen by undertaking dissertation or research project using proper research 
methodology; 


(h) play the assigned role in the implementation of national health programmes with homoeopathy, 
effectively and responsibly; 


(i) organise and supervise the chosen or assigned health care services demonstrating adequate 
managerial skills in the AYUSH clinic or hospital or in the field; and 


G) develop skills in using educational methods and techniques applicable to the teaching of 
homoeopathy medical students. 


4. Components of the post-graduate curriculum.— The post-graduate curriculum shall be set in a competency based 
integrated framework based on the outcomes defined for each speciality subject. Among other specific 
constituents, it shall comprise the following, namely:- 


[भागवता--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 47 


(a) theoretical and applied knowledge; 
(b) practical, clinical, community and management related skills pertaining to the speciality subject; 
(c) completion of dissertation work; 


(d) publication or submission of a research article in a peer- reviewed scientific journal or presentation 
of the paper in the National Conference of the concerned society; 


(e) soft skills and attributes including interpersonal and communication skills; 
(f) training in Research Methodology, Medical Ethics and Medicolegal aspects; and 


(g) professionalism and commitment to continued learning throughout professional life. 


5. Eligibility criteria for admission and manner of admission— (l) The eligibility for admission to M.D. 
(Homoeopathy) course shall be the following, namely: - 


(2) 


(3) 


(4) 


(5) 


(a) No candidate shall be admitted to M.D./Homoeopathy) course unless he possesses the degree of:- 


(i) Bachelor of Homoeopathic Medicine and Surgery or equivalent qualification in Homoeopathy 
included in the Schedule or medical qualification recognition list under the provisions of the 
Act, after undergoing a course of study of not less than five years and six months duration 
including one-year compulsory rotatory internship; or 


(it) Bachelor of Homoeopathic Medicine and Surgery (Graded Degree) or equivalent 
qualification in Homoeopathy included in the Second Schedule of The Homoeopathy 
Central Council Act, 973 (59 of 973), after undergoing a course of study of not less than two 
years duration; 


(b) The candidate has registered himself with the State Board or Council, as the case may be. 


There shall be a uniform entrance examination for all Homoeopathic graduates, namely, All India AYUSH 
Post-Graduate Entrance Test examination for admission to the post-graduate course in medical institution 
in each academic year and shall be conducted by an authority designated by the National Commission for 
Homoeopathy: 


Provided that for foreign national candidates, any other equivalent qualification approved by 
the Central Government may be allowed for admission and above provision of this sub-regulation shall 
not be applicable. 


No candidate obtaining less than 50" percentile in the All-India AYUSH Post-graduate Entrance Test for 
post-graduate course conducted for the said academic year shall be considered for such admission: 


Provided that the candidates belonging to the Scheduled Castes, the Scheduled Tribes and the 
Other Backward Classes obtain marks not less than 40" percentile and the candidates with the disability 
as specified under the Rights of Persons with Disabilities Act, 20l6 (49 of 206) obtain the marks not less 
than 45" percentile in case of General category and not less than 40" percentile in case of the Scheduled 
Castes, the Scheduled Tribes and the Other Backward Classes shall be considered for admission: 


Provided further that when sufficient number of candidates in the respective categories fail to 
secure minimum marks in the All India AYUSH Post-graduate Entrance Test as specified above, held for 
any academic year for admission to post-graduate courses, the Commission may, in consultation with the 
Central Government, lower the marks required for admission to post-graduate course for candidates 
belonging to respective category and marks so lowered by the Commission shall be applicable for that 
academic year only. 


An All-India common merit list as well as State-wise merit list of the eligible candidates shall be prepared 
by the designated authority based on the marks obtained in the All-India AYUSH Post-graduate Entrance 
Test conducted for the academic year and the candidate within the respective category shall be considered 
for admission to post-graduate course from the said merit list. 


The seat matrix for admission in the Government institution, Government- aided institution and private 
institutions shall be fifteen per cent. for All- India quota and eighty-five per cent. for the State quota and 
the Union territory quota as the case may be: 


Provided that, - 


(a) the All-India quota for the purpose of admission to the Deemed to be University, both 
Government and private shall be one hundred per cent.; 


48 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


6. 


(6) 


(7) 


(8) 


(9) 


(0) 


(l) 


(2) 


(3) 


(/4) 


(b) the University and institute having more than fifteen per cent. all India quota seat shall continue to 
maintain that quota; 


(c) five per cent. of the annual sanctioned intake capacity in the Government and Government aided 
institutions shall be filled up by candidates with disability as specified under the provisions of the 
Rights of Persons with Disabilities Act, 206 (49 of 206). 


Explanation.- For the purposes of this regulation, the specified disability contained in the 
Schedule to the Rights of Persons with Disabilities Act, 206 (49 of 206) specified in Appendix 
“A”’ and the eligibility of candidates to pursue a course in Homoeopathy with specified disability 
shall be in accordance with the guidelines specified in Appendix “B”’. If the seats reserved for the 
persons with disabilities in a particular category remain unfilled on account of unavailability of 
candidates, the seats shall be included in the annual sanctioned seats for the respective category. 


The designated authority for counseling of eighty-five per cent., State and Union territory quota for 
admissions to post-graduate course in all Homoeopathic educational institutions in the States and Union 
territories including institutions established by the State Government, University, Trust, Society, 
Minority Institution, Corporation or Company shall be the respective State or Union territory in 
accordance with the relevant rules and regulations of the concerned State Government or Union territory 
Administration, as the case may be. 


The counseling for all admissions to the post-graduate course for seats under all India quota as well as for 
all Homoeopathy educational institutions established by the Central Government shall be conducted by 
the authority designated by the Central Government. 


The admission shall be done,— 
(a) through counseling as per sub-regulation (b) of regulation 5 except for foreign nationals; 


(b) by any manner other than the manner specified in these regulations shall not be approved and any 
institution found admitting the students in contravention of the provisions of regulation 5 of these 
regulations shall be denied permission for taking admission for subsequent academic year; 


The medical institutions shall have to submit the list of all admitted students in the format decided by the 
Commission on or before six p.m. on the cutoff date for admission decided by it from time to time; 


The medical institutions shall also provide the list of the admitted students who have been allotted seats 
through the counseling authority (Central, State or Union territory, as the case may be) except foreign 
nationals. 


The candidate who fails to obtain the minimum eligibility marks as referred to under sub- regulation (3), 
shall not be admitted to the post-graduate course in the said academic year. 


No authority or medical institution shall admit any candidate to the post-graduate course in 
contravention of the criteria or procedure specified in these regulations and any admission made in 
contravention of these regulation shall be cancelled by the Commission forthwith. 


The authority or medical institution which grants admission to any student in contravention of the 
provisions of these regulations shall be dealt within the manner as specified under the clause (f) of sub- 
regulation () of regulation 28 of the Act. 


The medical institution shall send the final list of admitted students to the Commission within one month 
of closure of admissions and the Commission shall verify the medical institution to ensure the compliance 
of the provisions of the regulations at any time. 


Course of study.—(l ) Subjects of specialisation for Homoeopathy post-graduate degree course shall be the 
following, namely: - 


(a) Homoeopathic Materia Medica; 

(b) Organon of Medicine and Homoeopathic Philosophy; 
(c) Homoeopathic Repertory and Case Taking; 

(d) Homoeopathic Pharmacy; 

(e) Practice of Medicine; 

(f) Pediatrics; 

(g) Psychiatry; 


(h) Community Medicine; 


[भाग गा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 49 


(i) Dermatology. 
(2) The Course shall be regular, full time and for a duration of three years. 


(3) The student shall be regular and will be resident during one year of house-job in the campus and shall be 
given training as per the provisions of regulation 7: 


Provided that a student shall complete the course of M.D.cHomoeopathy) in a speciality subject within 
the duration of maximum six years from the date of his admission. 


(4) Each programme shall be divided into two parts comprising of eighteen month each in 
M.D.(Homoeopathy) Part-I and M.D.(Homoeopathy) Part-II respectively. 


(5) The Courses under Part-I of each programme shall be as follows:- 
(a) M.D. (Homoeopathy) Homoeopathic Materia Medica,— 
(i) Fundamentals of Homoeopathic Materia Medica; 
(ii) Fundamentals of Clinical Medicine in Homoeopathic Materia Medica; and 
(iii) | Research Methodology and Biostatistics. 
(b) M.D. (Homoeopathy) Organon of Medicine and Homoeopathic Philosophy,— 
(i) Fundamentals of Organon of Medicine and Homoeopathic Philosophy; 


(ii) Fundamentals of Clinical Medicine in Organon of Medicine and Homoeopathic 
Philosophy; and 


(iii) Research Methodology and Biostatistics. 
(c) M.D. (Homoeopathy) Homoeopathic Repertory and Case Taking,— 
(i) Fundamentals of Repertory and Case Taking; 
(ii) Fundamentals of Clinical Medicine in Homoeopathic Repertory and Case Taking; and 
(iii) Research Methodology and Biostatistics. 
(d) M.D. (Homoeopathy) Homoeopathic Pharmacy ,— 

(i) Fundamentals of Homoeopathy Pharmacy; 
(ii) Fundamentals of Clinical Medicine in Homoeopathic Pharmacy; and 
(iii) Research Methodology and Biostatistics. 

(e) M.D. (Homoeopathy) Practice of Medicine,— 
(i) Fundamentals of Practice of Medicine; 
(ii) Fundamentals of Homoeopathy in Practice of Medicine; and 
(iii) Research Methodology and Biostatistics. 

(f) M.D. (Homoeopathy) Pediatrics,— 
(i) Fundamentals of Pediatrics; 
(ii) Fundamentals of Homoeopathy in Pediatrics; and 
(iii) Research Methodology and Biostatistics. 

(g) M.D. (Homoeopathy) Psychiatry,— 
(i) Fundamentals of Psychiatry; 
(ii) Fundamentals of Homoeopathy in Psychiatry; and 
(iii) Research Methodology and Biostatistics. 

(h) M.D. (Homoeopathy) Community Medicine,— 
(i) Fundamentals of Community Medicine; 
(ii) Fundamentals of Homoeopathy in Community Medicine; and 


(iii) Research Methodology and Biostatistics. 


50 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


(i) M.D. (Homoeopathy) Dermatology,— 
(i) Fundamentals of Dermatology; 
(ii) Fundamentals of Homoeopathy in Dermatology; and 
(iii) Research Methodology and Biostatistics. 
(6) For M.D. (Homoeopathy) Part-II examination, there shall be main specialty subject only with two papers. 


7. Pattern of training— () The period of training for obtaining Homoeopathy post- graduate degree in speciality 
subject shall be three completed years including the period of examination. 


(2) In the beginning of post-graduate training, there shall be an induction programme for seven days which 
will comprise of — 


(a) orientation about post-graduate course; and 
(b) workshop in concerned subject specialty with subject experts. 


(3 


wm 


The post-graduate students shall be called Junior Resident in M.D.(Homoeopathy) Part-I and senior 
resident in M.D.(Homoeopathy) Part-II, in all speciality subjects of Homoeopathy post-graduate degree 
course. 


(4 


wa 


During the post-graduate course, the emphasis shall be more on clinical training and less on didactic 
lectures. 


(5 
(6 
(7 


wm 


The student should take part in seminars, group discussions, clinical meetings and journal club meetings. 


wm 


The student shall be required to write a dissertation as mentioned in regulation 8. 


wm 


The student shall be given graded responsibility in the hospital campus in the management and treatment of 
patients entrusted to his care as per duty roaster. 


(8 
(9 


wm 


The student shall participate in teaching and training of under-graduate students or interns. 


Ne 


The students shall maintain an e-Log Book or Log book and do the laboratory or clinical work keeping in 
view the needs of each speciality subject. 


(40) A student pursuing M. D. (Homoeopathy) Course shall study in the concerned Department of the institution 
for the entire period as a regular student. No student is permitted to work in any laboratory or college or 
industry or pharmacy, while pursuing the Homoeopathy post-graduate degree programme. No student shall 
join any other regular degree program in any other University in India or Abroad during the period of 
Homoeopathy post-graduate degree course. 


(.l) University Grants Commission approved Certificate or Diploma courses through open distance learning or 
online mode may be allowed for post- graduate students for improving various skills with permission of the 
Head of the institute without disturbing the work or duties assigned for 


M.D. (Homoeopathy) course. 
(2) Each year shall be taken as a unit for the purpose of calculating attendance. 


((3) Every student shall mandatorily attend symposia, seminars, conferences, journal club meetings and lectures 
during each year as prescribed by the Department or college or University and not remain absent without 
any valid reasons and prior permission of the Head of the Institute. 


(/4) A student who has secured a minimum of seventy five per cent. of attendance and shows satisfactory 
progress, shall be permitted to appear at M.D. (Homoeopathy) Part-I and Part-I examinations respectively. 


(5) Any student who fails to complete the course in the manner stated above shall not be permitted to appear at 
the University examinations. A certificate to this effect shall be sent to University by the Principal of the 
concerned college. 


(6) Every student shall maintain an e-Log Book or Logbook (separately Part-I and part-ID) for M.D. 
(Homoeopathy) and record his participation in the training programmes conducted by the Department such 
as journal reviews, clinical presentations, seminars. 


({7) The work diary shall be scrutinised and certified by the Head of the Department and Head of the Institution 
and presented in the University at the time of practical examination, if called for. 


(8) Special mention shall be made of the presentations by the student as well as details of experiments or 
laboratory procedures conducted by the student. 


[भाग Wave 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 5] 


(9) The presentations shall be assessed by the faculty members and peers and assessed on numeric rating scale 


from | to 0. 


8. Synopsis and dissertation— (l) Every student shall submit to the competent authority of the University in the 
prescribed proforma given at Annexure, a synopsis containing particulars of proposed research study within a 
period of nine months from the date of commencement of the course or before the date notified by the University. 
The synopsis shall be submitted through the Guide, Head of Department of concerned speciality and counter 
signed by the Head of the institution. 


(2) 


(3) 


(4) 


(5) 


(6) 


(7) 


(8) 


(9) 


(I0) 


Every post-graduate students shall write dissertation about his research study in the format specified by the 
University, under the supervision of his Guide, and submit to the University. It includes identification of 
the problem, formulation of research question, hypothesis, review of literature, research methodology 
including the study design, discussing results and methods of conducting research study, collection of data, 
statistical analysis and drawing conclusions. 


Every student pursuing M.D.(Homoeopathy) degree course is required to submit six printed copies of 
dissertation or as required by the concerned University and soft copies, if required, of not less than ten 
thousand words embodying his own research study to the University for approval, not later than six months 
prior to holding of M.D.(Homoeopathy) Part-II examination. 


In case of rejection of synopsis, the student has to resubmit the synopsis to the University concerned 
through his Guide, in any case three months prior to the 


M.D. (Homoeopathy) Part-I examination. 


The synopsis of the proposed study has to be registered with clinical trials registry of India after obtaining 
ethical approval from Institutional ethical committee. 


The dissertation should be written under the following headings, namely:- 
(a) abstract; 
(b) introduction; 
(०) aim and objectives of study; 
(d) review of literature; 
(e) material and methods; 
(f) observation and result; 
(g) discussion; 
(h) conclusion; 
(i) references; and 
(j) annexures or appendices. 


The written text of dissertation shall not be less than fifty pages and shall not exceed two hundred pages, 
excluding references, tables, figures and annexures. It should be neatly typed with double line spacing on 
one side of the bond paper (A4 size, 8.27” x .69”) and bound properly. Spiral binding should be avoided. 
The dissertation shall be certified by the guide and Co-guide (if any), Head of the Department and Head of 
the Institution. 


A student shall adhere to plagiarism policy and the Copyright Act, !957(4 of 957) as amended from time 
to time, and give an undertaking in writing for the same. 


The dissertation shall be submitted to the guide at least three months before the time fixed for submitting it 
to the University. The guide or supervisor shall certify that the contents of the dissertation are the original 
work of the candidate and has not been submitted to any other University for the award of any degree or 
diploma. The student, whose dissertation has not been accepted by the University may be permitted to 
resubmit the same within a period of three months prior to 


M.D. (Homoeopathy) part-II examination. 


The student is expected to write a research paper on the basis of his dissertation and submit to a peer- 
reviewed scientific journal or present in National level seminar. 


9. Eligibility for post-graduate guide or examiner— (l) A person shall possess the following qualifications and 
experience for being eligible to become a guide or examiner, namely: - 


(a) M.D. (Homoeopathy) included in the Second Schedule of the Homoeopathy Central Council 


52 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


(b) 


Act, 973 (59 of 973) or Medical qualification recognition list of the National Commission for 
Homoeopathy Act, 2020 (5 of 2020); and 


A teacher in a homoeopathy medical institution who is in post of Associate professor or 
Professor in concerned specialty subject after obtaining post-graduate degree in concerned 
subject: Provided that teachers who are already approved as post-graduate guide shall 
continue to remain post-graduate guide. 


Provided further that in the newly instituted speciality subjects like Dermatology and 
Community Medicine, teachers from under- graduate Department of Practice of Medicine 
and Community Medicine with post-graduate qualification in Homoeopathy and who are 
posted as Associate Professor or Professor shall be eligible for becoming post- graduate guide 
or examiner respectively. These provisions shall remain in force up to ten years from the date 
of notification of these regulations: 


Provided also that the guide or supervisor of a post-graduate speciality shall 
remain the guide or supervisor for that speciality only and he cannot become guide or 
supervisor for more than one speciality 


subject. 


(2) Educational qualification and experience for selection of Co-guide- post-graduate degree qualification in 


(3) 


the speciality subject as stated in clause (a) or seven years teaching in a college recognised by the 
National Commission for Homoeopathy: 


The teaching faculty of a particular medical institution are only eligible to become guide or supervisor 
of post-graduate students of that institution. The subject wise guide list shall be approved by the 
concerned University. 


0. Student guide ratio— (l) The student — guide ratio shall be 3:] if the guide is of Professor cadre. 


(2) The student - guide ratio shall be 2:] if the guide is of Associate Professor cadre. 


ll. Migration.— Under no circumstances, migration or transfer of student undergoing Homoeopathy post-graduate 
degree course from one college to other shall be permitted by any University or Authority. 


2. Scheme of assessment.— (l) The Assessment for each programme shall be formative and summative type. The 
details of the formative assessment shall be worked out separately for each specialty in the framework of 
competency based assessment framework. A record of these would be maintained and due weightage may be 
accorded to these. The candidate shall be required to perform satisfactorily in formative assessment before being 
eligible to appear for the summative assessment. This will hold true for M.D. (Homoeopathy) Part-I as well 
as M.D. (Homoeopathy) Part-II and the summative assessment would comprise of:- 


(a) written paper; and 
(b) clinical or practical and Viva-Voce examination. 
(2) Schedule of assessment:- Schedule of assessment shall be as following table, namely:- 
Table 
Formative Assessment Summative Assessment 
(Internal Assessment) (University Examination) 
M.D.(Hom.) Part-I | * term test - During sixth month of training During eighteenth month of 
27९ term test :- During twelfth month of training training 
M.D.(Hom.) Part-II] I‘ term test - Duringtwenty fourth month of During thirty sixth month of 
training training 
2704 term test :- During 
thirtieth month of training 


(3) M.D. (Homoeopathy) Part-I examination —Maximum marks for each subject and minimum marks 


required to pass shall be as follows, namely: - 


(a) M.D. (Homoeopathy) Homoeopathic Materia Medica:— 


Theory Practical or 
Subjects Clinical examination 
including Viva- Voce 
Maximum Pass | Maximum Pass 
marks marks marks marks 
Paper-I Fundamentals of Homoeopathic Materia Medica 00 50 200* 00* 


[भाग गा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 53 
Paper-II [Fundamentals of Clinical Medicine in Homoeopathic 00 50 (60+40) (80+20) 
IMateria Medica [Summative | [Summative 
assessment- | assessment- 
60 marks] 80 marks] 
[Internal [Internal 
assessment- | assessment- 
40 marks] 20 marks] 
Paper-III Research Methodology and 00 50 LC 4 La 4 
Biostatistics 


(*A common practical exam for paper I and II (00 marks practical + !00 marks viva voce) shall be 
conducted; twenty per cent. weightage shall be for internal assessment, which shall be calculated for practical 
or clinical including viva voce only. One internal assessment of 40 marks [20 marks (practical or clinical) + 
20 marks (viva voce)] after each term of six months and average of two terms shall be considered. *eighty 
per cent. weightage shall be for summative assessment). 


(b) M.D. (Homoeopathy) Organon of Medicine and Homoeopathic Philosophy:— 
Theory Practical or 
Subjects Clinical examination 
including Viva-Voce 
Maximum Pass | Maximum Maximum 
marks marks marks marks 
Paper- I Fundamentals of 00 50 200* 00* 
जाती (60+40) (80+20) 
Medicine and Homoeopathic वजह ©, uta ye 
assessment- | assessment- 
philosophy 60 marks] | 80 marks] 
[Internal [Internal 
assessment- | assessment- 
40 marks] 20 marks] 
Paper- II | Fundamentals of Clinical Medicine in Organon 00 50 » - 
of 
Medicine and Homoeopathic 
philosophy 
Paper- III Research Methodology and 00 50 [Fi [= 
Biostatistics 


(*A common practical exam for paper I and II (00 marks practical + !00 marks viva) shall be conducted; 
twenty per cent. weightage shall be for internal assessment, which shall be calculated for practical or clinical 
including viva voce only. One internal assessment of 40 marks [20 marks (practical or clinical) + 20 marks 
(viva voce)] after each term of six months and average of two terms shall be considered. “eighty per cent. 
weightage shall be for summative assessment). 


(c) M.D. (Homoeopathy) Homoeopathic Repertory and Case Taking:— 
Theory Practical or 
Subjects Clinical examination including 
Viva-Voce 
Maximum | Pass /Maximum marks Pass marks 
marks mark 
s 
Paper- I) Fundamentals of Homoeopathic Repertory and 00 50 200* 00* 
Case Taking (60+40) (80+20) 
Paper- Fundamentals of Clinical Medicine in 00 50 [Summative [Summative 
I Homoeopathic Repertory and assessment- assessment- 
Case Taking 60 marks] 80 marks] 
[Internal [Internal 


54 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEC.4] 
assessment- assessment- 
40 marks] 20 marks] 
Paper- Research Methodology and 00 50 os | (ns 
I Biostatistics 
(*A common practical exam for paper I and II (00 marks practical + !00 marks viva) shall be conducted; 
twenty per cent. weightage shall be for internal assessment, which shall be calculated for practical or clinical 
including viva voce only. One internal assessment of 40 marks [20 marks (practical or clinical) + 20 marks 
(viva voce)] after each term of six months and average of two terms shall be considered. *eighty per cent. 
weightage shall be for summative assessment). 
(d) M.D. (Homoeopathy) Homoeopathic Pharmacy:— 
Theory Practical or 
Clinical examination including 
Subjects Viva- Voce 
Maximum Pass | Maximum marks Pass marks 
marks marks 
Paper- I Fundamentals of Homoeopathic 00 50 200* 00* 
Pharmac (60+40) (80+20) 
Paper- II Fundamentals of Clinical 00 50 [Summative [Summative 
Medicine in Homoeopathic assessment- assessment- 
Pharmacy 60 marks] 80 marks] 
[Internal [Internal 
assessment- assessment- 
40 marks] 20 marks] 
Paper- III Research Methodology and 00 50 Li ed fof od 
Biostatistics 
(*A common practical exam for paper I and II (00 marks practical + !00 marks viva) shall be conducted; 
twenty per cent. weightage shall be for internal assessment, which shall be calculated for practical or clinical 
including viva voce only. One internal assessment of 40 marks [20 marks (practical or clinical) + 20 marks 
(viva voce)] after each term of six months and average of two terms shall be considered. *eighty per cent. 
weightage shall be for summative assessment). 
(e) M.D. (Homoeopathy) Practice of Medicine:— 
Theory Practical or 
Subjects Clinical examination including Viva-Voce 
Maximum Pass Maximum marks Pass marks 
marks marks 
Paper-I Fundamentals 00 50 200* 00* 
of Practice of Medicine (60+40) (80+20) 
Paper- II Fundamentals of 00 50 [Summative [Summative 
Hi | assessment- l60 assessment- 80 
SEDAN marks] [Internal marks] [Internal 
in Practice of Medicine assessment- 
assessment- 40 
marks] 20 marks] 
Paper- III | Research Methodology and 00 50 Lf i 
Biostatistics 


(*A common practical exam for paper I and II (00 marks practical + !00 marks viva) shall be conducted; 
twenty per cent. weightage shall be for internal assessment, which shall be calculated for practical or clinical 
including viva voce only. One internal assessment of 40 marks [20 marks (practical or clinical) + 20 marks 
(viva voce)] after each term of six months and average of two terms shall be considered. *eighty per cent. 
weightage shall be for summative assessment). 


(f) M.D. (Homoeopathy) Pediatrics:— 


[भाग ave 4] 


भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


55 


Theory Practical or 
Clinical examination including 
Subjects Viva-Voce 
Maximum | Pass |Maximum marks Pass marks 
marks marks 
Paper- I Fundamentalsof Pediatrics 00 50 200* 00* 
60+40 80+20 
Paper- If | Fundamental of Homoeopathy in Pediatrics 00 50 ( ) ( ) 
[Summative [Summative 
assessment- assessment- 
60 marks] 80 marks] 
[Internal [Internal 
assessment- assessment- 
40 marks] 20 marks] 
Paper- III Research Methodology and Biostatistics 00 50 Eee =e 


(*A common practical exam for paper I and II (00 marks practical + !00 marks viva) shall be conducted; 
twenty per cent. weightage shall be for internal assessment, which shall be calculated for practical or clinical 
including viva voce only. One internal assessment of 40 marks [20 marks (practical or clinical) + 20 marks 
(viva voce)] after each term of six months and average of two terms shall be considered. “eighty per cent. 
weightage shall be for summative assessment). 


(g) M.D. (Homoeopathy) Psychiatry:— 
Theory Practical or 
Subjects Clinical examination including 
Viva-Voce 
Maximum Pass {Maximum marks Pass marks 
marks marks 
Paper-I Fundamentals 00 50 200* 00* 
of Psychiatry (60+40) (80+20) 
Paper- II Fundamentals of Homoeopathy in 00 50 [Summative [Summative 
Psychiatry assessment- assessment- 
60 marks] 80 marks] 
[Internal [Internal 
assessment- assessment- 
40 marks] 20 marks] 
Paper-III Research Methodology and 00 50 Ll a 
Biostatistics 


(*A common practical exam for paper I and II (00 marks practical + !00 marks viva) shall be conducted; 
twenty per cent. weightage shall be for internal assessment, which shall be calculated for practical or clinical 
including viva voce only. One internal assessment of 40 marks [20 marks (practical or clinical) + 20 marks 
(viva voce)] after each term of six months and average of two terms shall be considered. *eighty per cent. 


weightage shall be for summative assessment). 


(h) M.D. (Homoeopathy) Community Medicine:— 
Theory Practical or 
Subjects Clinical examination including Viva- Voce 
Maximum Pass Maximum marks Pass marks 
marks marks 
Paper-I | Fundamentals of 00 50 200* 00* 
Community (60+40) (80+20) 
Medicine [Summative assessment- [Summative assessment- 
Paper- II | Fundamentals of 00 50 60 marks] [Internal 80 marks] [Internal 


56 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEC.4] 
Homoeopathy in assessment- 40 marks] assessment- 20 marks] 
Community Medicine ____ _ ee _ 
Paper- III Research 00 50 जि | | 
Methodology 


and Biostatistics 


(*A common practical exam for paper I and IT (00 marks practical + !00 marks viva) shall be conducted; 
twenty per cent. weightage shall be for internal assessment, which shall be calculated for practical or 
clinical including viva voce only. One internal assessment of 40 marks [20 marks (practical or clinical) + 20 
marks (viva voce)] after each term of six months and average of two terms shall be considered. *eighty per 
cent. weightage shall be for summative assessment). 


(i) M.D. (Homoeopathy) Dermatology:— 
Theory Practical or 
Subjects Clinical examination including Viva- Voce 
Maximum Pass Maximum marks Pass marks 
marks marks 
Paper- Fundamentals of 00 50 200* 00* 
I Dermatolog (60+40) (80+20) 

Paper- IT | Fundamentals रण 00 50 [Summative assessment- [Summative assessment- 
Homoeopathy कया 60 marks] [Internal 80 marks] [Internal 
Dermatolog assessment- 40 marks] assessment- 20 marks] 

Paper- III Research 00 50 

Methodology pe po 
and Biostatistics 


(*A common practical exam for paper I and II (00 marks practical + !00 marks viva) shall be conducted; 
twenty per cent. weightage shall be for internal assessment, which shall be calculated for practical or clinical 
including viva voce only. One internal assessment of 40 marks [20 marks (practical or clinical) + 20 marks 
(viva voce)] after each term of six months and average of two terms shall be considered. *eighty per cent. 
weightage shall be for summative assessment). 


(4) M.D. (Homoeopathy) Part-II examination -Maximum marks for each subject and minimum marks 
required to pass shall be as follows, namely:- 


Practical or clinical exams Pass marks 
; including Viva-Voce and 
Subjects ४ थे 
dissertation 
Theory 
Maximum | Pass Maximum marks Pass marks 
marks 
marks 
(i) Speciality Subject 200* (60+40) 00* 
Pepe! 00 50 [Summative assessment-l60] (80+20) [Summative assessment- 
marks] 80 marks] [Internal assessment- 
[Internal assessment- 40 हल 
marks] 
(ii) Speciality Subject 00 50 
Paper-II 


(*A common practical exam for paper I and II (00 marks practical + l00 marks viva) shall be conducted; 
twenty per cent. weightage shall be for internal assessment, which shall be calculated for practical or 
clinical including viva voce only. One internal assessment of 40 marks [20 marks (practical or clinical) + 
20 marks (viva voce)] after each term of six months and average of two terms shall be considered. *eighty 
per cent. weightage shall be for summative assessment). 


(5) Guidelines for examination shall be as follows, namely:- 


(a) the theory examination shall have forty per cent. marks for short answer questions and forty 
per cent. marks for long explanatory answer questions that includes descriptive, case scenario 
and clinical application-based questions and twenty per cent. marks for problem- based 
question and these questions shall cover the entire syllabus of the subject; 


[भागवता--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 57 


(09)... minimum marks required for passing the examination shall be fifty per cent. in theory 
component and fifty per cent. in practical or clinical component (that include practical, 
clinical, Viva-Voce) separately in each subject; 


(c) each theory examination shall be of three hours duration; 


(d) viva-voce or practical or clinical examination and assessment of dissertation in each 
specialty subject, to be held by not less than four examiners together, out of whom two shall 
be external examiners and two shall be internal examiners; 


(e) four examiners shall jointly assess the knowledge of each student for recommending the 
result to the University. Average marks of four examiners shall be considered for assessment 
of the student; 


(f) the University shall allow to conduct the examination for failed students within six months 
from declaration of the results; 


(g) 06 University shall conduct not more than two examinations in a year, for any subject, with 
an interval of not less than six months between the two examinations; 


(h) M.D. (Homoeopathy) Part-I examination is to be held in eighteenth month after completion 
of house job of one year duration; 


(i) a student not passing examination in a subject of M.D. (Homoeopathy) Part-I course shall re- 
appear in all parts of that subject but only one chance to re-appear in that subject of 
examination shall be provided failing which he has to re-appear in examination in all the 
subjects (in all parts) of M.D. (Homoeopathy) Part-I course; 


Qj) results declared by the University shall be displayed as marks obtained in theory or practical 
or clinical or Viva-Voce examination as well as dissertation assessment separately; 


(k) The maximum number of students to be examined in clinical or practical and Viva-Voce 
examinations on any day shall not exceed ten for M.D. (Homoeopathy) examinations. 


(6) Valuation of examination papers shall be as follows, namely:- 


(a) all eligible examiners for post-graduate examinations can perform the valuation of the 
answer scripts; 


(b) all the answer scripts shall be subjected for two valuations by the concerned University. The 
highest of the total marks awarded by the two evaluators for the paper, which is rounded off 
to the nearest value, shall be considered for computation of the results; 


(c) थी the answer scripts, where the difference between two valuations is more than ten per cent. 
of the total marks prescribed for the paper, may be subjected to third valuation; 


(d) the highest of the best two total marks, awarded by the three valuators for the paper, rounded 
off to the nearest value, shall be considered for final computation of the results; 


(e) after the computation and declaration of the results, re-valuation is not permitted by any 
authority under any circumstances; 


(f) थी the Health Universities or Institutions imparting post-graduate courses shall develop a 
platform for bar-coded digital valuation. 


(7) Every candidate seeking admission to M.D. (Homoeopathy) Part-I of the examination shall submit 
application to the University with the following documents, namely: - 


(a) A Certificate from the Principal or Head of the institution or college (where course is imparted) 
about the completion of the course of studies in the subjects in which the candidate seeks 
admission to the examination; 


(b) A Certificate of having completed one year house job in a Homoeopathic hospital as an essential 
part of the course; 


(c) A Certificate from the Guide regarding submission of synopsis within the time specified in these 
regulations; 


(d) minimum seventy-five per cent. attendance is required to become eligible for appearing in 
M.D.(Homoeopathy) Part — I examinations; 


(९) no post-graduate student shall be permitted to appear in the examination without completing 
the mandatory course work and internal assessment as per these regulation. 


58 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


(8) Every candidate seeking admission to M.D. (Homoeopathy) Part-II examination shall submit application 
to the University with the following documents, namely: - 


(a) A mark sheet or result showing that the student has passed M.D. (Homoeopathy) Part-I 
examinations; 


(b) A certificate from the guide in support of submission of the dissertation and accepted by the 
guide within the time specified in these regulations; 


(c) A certificate from the Principal or Head of the Institution or College (where course is 
imparted) about the completion of the course of studies in the subject in which the candidate 
seeks admission to the examination; 


(d) there shall be minimum of seventy-five per cent. attendance of post- graduate student to 
become eligible for appearing in M.D. (Homoeopathy) Part-II examination; 


(९) no post-graduate student shall be permitted to appear in the examination without completing the 
mandatory course work and internal assessment as per this regulation. 


(9) For the examiners, the following conditions shall be taken into consideration, namely:- 
(a) the criteria for examiners shall be the same as in the post-graduate guide; 
(b) there shall be two internal examiners; and 
(c) atleast fifty per cent. of the examiners shall be external examiners. 


3. Common mandatory course work- () For the MD (Homoeopathy) Part-I, the following course work shall be 
common and mandatory for all post-graduate students irrespective of specialty, namely:- 


(a) Course in Basic Cardiac Life Support Skills,- 


(i) all post-graduate students shall complete a course in Basic Cardiac Life Support skills and get 
duly certified from recognised institute of the Central Government. If any student has already 
done this course and obtained certificate from recognised institute of the Central Government, 
he may choose any other course from the list of electives mentioned in clause (3) of this 
regulation. 


(ii) the students must complete the course work within one year of the commencement of the 
batch. 


(iii) no post-graduate student shall be permitted to appear in the M.D.(Homoeopathy) Part-I 
examinations without the above certification. 


(b) Course in Bioethics,- 


(i) all post-graduate students shall complete a course in Bioethics including Good Clinical 
Practices, to be conducted by the Institutes themselves or by any other method. 


(ii) the students must complete the course within one year of the commencement of the batch. 


(iii) no post-graduate student shall be permitted to appear in the M.D. (Homoeopathy) Part-I 
examination without completing the above course. 


(2) For the MD (Homoeopathy) Part-II the following course work shall be common and mandatory for all 
post-graduate students irrespective of specialty, namely: - 


(a) all post-graduate students shall complete a basic course in medical education technology and be 
duly certified by the recognised Institute of the Central Government. 


(b) all post-graduate students shall complete a course in scientific writing and be duly certified from the 
recognised Institute of the Central Government. 


(3) The institutions shall arrange training programmes on electives such as Telemedicine, Making effective 
presentations, use of PubMed, Awareness in medical audit management, Health economics, Health 
information system, basics of statistics, exposure to human behavior and study and knowledge of 
homoeopathic pharmacy. It is mandatory for each student to complete any one of the above electives in the 
entire duration of post-graduate course. 


4. Additional infrastructure requirement and conditions for the post-graduate Homoeopathic Medical Institutions. — 
In addition to the minimum essential standards for graduate degree program as mentioned in the National 
Commission for Homoeopathy (Minimum Essential Standards for Homoeopathic Colleges and Attached 
Hospitals) Regulations, 2024, the following requirements shall be mandatory for the post-graduate homoeopathic 


[भाग गा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 59 


institutions, namely :- 


(.) A recognised Homoeopathic College shall be treated as post-graduate center which meets all the prescribed 


(2) 


(3) 


(4) 


minimum requirements, norms, and standards for conducting Bachelor of Homoeopathic Medicine and 
Surgery degree course, and has been running Bachelor of Homoeopathic Medicine and Surgery degree 
course successfully for five consecutive years. 


Every such medical institution or teaching hospital shall have a Department of the concerned speciality 
and shall also have the additional facilities as specified in these regulations. 


The annual intake capacity in post-graduate course shall be maximum ten seats but first permission shall be 


granted for maximum seven seats in a specialty subject. A medical institution may apply for an increase in 
the intake capacity for post-graduate course, only after completing first batch of post-graduate course or 
starting of post- graduate course only after completion of first batch of its under-graduate course. 


Requirement of hospital shall be as specified in the National Commission for Homoeopathy (Minimum 
Essential Standards for Homoeopathic Colleges and Attached Hospitals) Regulations, 2024 along with the 
following additional requirements, namely: - 


(a) out-patient Department with minimum of three hundred patients on an average per day during 
last five calendar years in the hospital of the medical institution running Bachelor of 
Homoeopathic Medicine and Surgery course. 


(b) one bed shall be earmarked per student for each clinical subject of specialty, in addition to the 
beds required for Bachelor of Homoeopathic Medicine and Surgery course in its teaching 
(collegiate) Homoeopathic Hospital, with a minimum 50% bed occupancy. 


(c) the said attendance in the Out-patient Department and In-patient Department of the attached 
Homoeopathic Hospital has to be available on the day when an application is moved by the 
medical institution authorities seeking recognition or approval from National Commission for 
Homoeopathy. 


(5) The National Commission for Homoeopathy shall have the power to call for such information and returns 


as it may deem fit from University and medical institution and they shall furnish the information as 
specified by the National Commission for Homoeopathy: 


Provided that if the medical institutions fail to provide the information and return to Commission 
within the specified time limit, the Commission shall recommend for action against the concerned 
medical institution under section 28 of the Act, assuming that the concerned college is not complying with 
the provisions of these regulation. 


(6) Every college shall provide all necessary information, documents and records to the Inspectors appointed 


by the Commission to discharge their duties and functions, required by them during the inspection. 


(7) The administrative area shall be as notified in the National Commission for Homoeopathy (Minimum 


Essential Standards for Homoeopathic Colleges and Attached Hospitals) Regulations, 2024. 


(8) A seminar hall with sitting capacity for a minimum of two hundred persons shall be available within the 


college premises for lectures, meetings, seminars, conferences, symposia, and counseling etc. The hall 
shall have adequate electrical and sitting arrangement, closed circuit television, and audio-visual system 
with internet facilities. 


(9) The following conditions shall be fulfilled for biometric attendance, namely:- 


(a) all medical institutions shall install aadhar enabled biometric attendance machine as directed by 
the Commission from time to time for regular capturing of the attendance of human resources in 
the manner as specified and shall be essentially accessible to the Central Government, State 
Government or Union territories Administration and Commission to ensure maintenance of the 
minimum essential standards of education. 


(b) the aadhar enabled biometric attendance shall be made available on the dashboard of medical 
institution website and to Medical Assessment and Rating Board for Homoeopathy on dedicated 
portal as directed by the Commission. The Commission shall seek such record of attendance from 
medical institution during or after assessment for compliance of minimum essential standards of 
education. 


(c) the installation, maintenance and continuous smooth functioning of aadhar enabled biometric 
attendance system shall be the responsibility of medical institutions and any technical problem in 
the functioning of biometric system should be immediately reported to the Commission through 
nodal officer in-charge designated for the biometric attendance system and shall be rectified 
within a period of seven days from the date of reporting. 


60 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


(I0) 


()) 


minimum one year attendance record by aadhar enabled biometric machine should be made 


available to the commission or assessment team and the college shall maintain record for at least one 


year. 


One camera shall be installed for each post-graduate Department permitted by the National 


Commission for Homoeopathy. 


College Website shall be maintained as follows, namely;- 


(a) 


(b 


wm 


(c) 


each and every medical institution shall have its own website containing all the details with 
regard to information of post-graduate students with intake capacity sanctioned in each subject, 
subject-wise students admitted every year with all relevant details, merit-wise, category-wise, 
for current year and previous academic sessions along with their All India AYUSH Post-graduate 
Entrance Test scores. 


all speciality subject post-graduate Department details with regard to infrastructure, staff 
(teaching and non- teaching), library, equipment, charts or electronic display, specimens to be 
uploaded on the website along with the photographs. 


Hospital information, Out-patient Department and In-patient Department data shall be updated 
every month. 


5. Staff requirements.—(l) Teaching staff, There shall be minimum full time teaching staff for 
M.D.(Homoeopathy) (Additional to minimum teaching staff specified in the National Commission for 
Homoeopathy (Minimum Essential Standards for Homoeopathic Colleges and Attached Hospitals) Regulations, 


2024 course as per the following table, namely: Table 


SI. No. Name of Department Professor Associate 
Professor 
() Homoeopathic Materia Medica | 2 
(2) Organon of Medicine and ॥ 2 
Homoeopathic Philosophy 
(3) Homoeopathic Repertory and Case 2 
Taking 
(4) Homoeopathic Pharmacy 2 
(5) Practice of Medicine ॥ 2 
(6) Pediatrics | 2 
(7) Psychiatry 2 
(8) Community Medicine | 2 
(9) Dermatology 2 
(40) Research Methodology and 
Biostatistics 


(2) One Full-time Statistical Assistant shall be appointed to assist the teachers and students for statistical 


analysis. 
6. Departments and their specific requirements. — (l) Department of Homoeopathic Materia Medica,— 
(a) Medical institution shall provide at least ninety square meter area in addition to the area 


which is provided for undergraduate course for each Department as required. The space for 
post-graduate student discussion rooms, post-graduate teaching faculty room and departmental 
library shall be available with the provision of audio-visual facilities. 


(b) High speed internet facility shall be available for good connectivity during online sessions. 


Two cupboards for storage of departmental books and booklist as specified in separately 
notified post-graduate curriculum. E-Library subscription is mandatory for each student. 


(d) There shall be minimum two Associate Professor and one Professor in the Department or 


(९) 
(f) 


additional faculty of higher cadre shall be considered against the lower cadre faculty. 


One non-technical staff such as Assistant or Attendant shall be available. 


Equipment and material shall be as per following table:- 


[भाग ave 4] 


भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


6l 


Table 

S. No. Equipment and Materials Quantity 
(i) Desktop or Laptop 2 

(2) Liquid-crystal display Projector Ol 

(3) Round or Center table (for good Ol 

seating arrangements) 

(4) Chairs 20 

(5) Notice board Ol 

(6) External hard disc Ol 

(7) Charts or Electronic Display 5 

(8) Books 5 sets 
(9) X- Ray View Box Ol 
((0) Poster presentations on Dissertations Dissertations of last three academic years 


(g) List of Charts or Electronic Display,— 


(2) Department of Organon of Medicine and Homoeopathic Philosophy,- 


(i) Science and Philosophy of Homoeopathic Materia Medica; 


(ii) Different approaches to study Homoeopathic Materia Medica; 


(ut) Periodic table; 


(iv) Pictorial — Three polychrest — one each from Plant, Animal, Mineral kingdom; 


(v) Nodoses — Any two medicines; 


(vi) Sarcode-One medicine; 


(vii) Group symptoms or study — Three groups ; 


(viii) Therapeutic of any three illness. 


(a) Medical institution shall provide at least ninety square meter in addition to the area which 
is provided for under-graduate course. The space for post- graduate students’ discussion 
rooms, post-graduate teaching faculty room and departmental library shall be available with 


the provision of audio-visual facilities. 


(b) High-speed internet facilities shall be available for good connectivity during online sessions. 


(c) Two cupboards for storage of departmental books and booklist as specified in separately 
notified post-graduate curriculum. E-Library subscription is mandatory for each student. 


(d 


wm 


There shall be minimum two Associate Professor and one Professor in the Department or 


additional faculty of higher cadre shall be considered against the lower cadre faculty. 


(e) One non-technical staff such as assistant or attendant shall be available. 


(f) | Equipment and materials shall be as per the Table given below :— 


Table 
S. No. Equipment and Materials Quantity 
(i) Desktop or Laptop 2 
(2) Liquid-crystal display Ol 
Projector 
(3) Round or Center table Ol 
(for good seating arrangements) 
(4) Chairs 20 
(5) Notice board Ol 
(6) External hard disc Ol 
(7) Charts or Electronic 5 


62 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 

Display 

(8) Books 5 sets 

(9) X- Ray View Box Ol 

(0) Poster presentations on Dissertations of last three academic 

Dissertations years 
(g) List of Charts or Electronic Display,— 
(i) Different philosophies; 
(it) Case Taking; 
(ii) Classification of disease; 
(iv) Ground plan of Organon; 
(v) Cardinal principles of homoeopathy; 
(vi) Concept of disease evolution; 
(vii) Different edition of Organon of Medicine; 
(viti) Disease Phenomenon-Miasmas-psora, sycosis, tubercular, syphilis; 
(ix) Causation of disease; 
(x) Hahnemannian Concept of Man; 
(xi) Display on posology; 
(xii) Assessment of susceptibility; 
(xii) Evaluation of symptoms by C.Von.Beonninghausen; 
(xiv) Evaluation of symptoms by J.T.Kent; and 
(xv) Evaluation of symptoms by C.M. Boger. 
(3) | Department of homoeopathic repertory and case taking,- 

(a) Medical institution shall provide at least ninety square meter area including in addition to 
the area which is provided for under-graduate course. Space for post-graduate students’ 
discussion rooms, post- graduate, teaching faculty room and departmental library shall be 
available with the provision of audio-visual facilities. 

(b) High speed internet facility shall be available for good connectivity during online 
sessions. 

(c) Two cupboards for storage of departmental books and booklist shall be as specified in 
separately notified post-graduate curriculum. Card repertory or model may be available for 
demonstration and discussion. E-Library subscription is mandatory for each student. 

(d) There shall be minimum two Associate Professor and one Professor in the Department or 
additional faculty of higher cadre shall be considered against the lower cadre faculty. 

(e) One non-technical staff such as Assistant or Attendant shall be available. 

(f) Equipment and Materials shall be as per the Table given below :- 
Table 
S. No. Equipment and Quantity 
Material 
(l) Desktop or Laptop 5 
(2) Liquid-crystal Ol 
display Projector 


[भाग ave 4] 


भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


63 


(3) Round or Center Ol 
table 
(4) Chairs 20 
(5) Notice board Ol 
(6) External hard disk Ol 
(7) Charts or Electronic 5 
Display 
(8) Homoeopathic Repertory Software 5 
(Preferably 
multiuser) 
(9) X- Ray View Box Ol 
(0) Poster presentations Dissertations of last three academic 
on Dissertations years 
(l) Books 5 sets 


(g) List of Charts or Electronic Display,— 


(i) Evolution of Repertories; 


(ii) Repertorial approaches- J.T.Kent; 


(iii) Repertorial approaches -C.Von.Boenninghausen; 


(iv) Repertorial approaches —C.M.Boger; 


(v) Concept of Key note Symptoms; 


(vi) Non reportorial approach — Structurisation; 


(vii) Card Repertories; 


(vit) Repertorial syndrome and Potential differential field; 


(ix) Meaning of Rubric and Sub Rubric; 


(x) General concepts of Repertorisation; 


(xi) Repertory and Repertorisation; 


(xii) Regional Repertories; 


(xiii) Computer Software; 


(xiv) Case- Taking and Repertory; 


(xv) Analysis and Evaluation of Symptoms; 


(xvi) Classification of repertory. 


(4) Department of homoeopathic pharmacy,— 


(a) Medical institution shall provide at least ninety square meter area including the space for 
post-graduate students’ discussion rooms, post- graduate, teaching faculty room and 
departmental library shall be available with the provision of audio-visual facilities. 


(b) High speed internet facility shall be available for good connectivity during online 


sessions. 


(c) Two cupboards for storage of departmental books and booklist as specified in separately 
notified in the post-graduate curriculum. E- Library subscription is mandatory for each 


student. 


(d) There shall be minimum two Associate Professor and one Professor in the Department or 


64 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


additional faculty of higher cadre shall be considered against the lower cadre faculty. 
(e) One non-technical staff such as Assistant or Attendant shall be available. 


(f) | Equipment and Materials shall be as per the Table given below :- 


Table 
S.No. Equipment and Material Quantity 
(i) Desktop or Laptop 2 
(2) Liquid-crystal Ol 
display Projector 
(3) Round or Center table Ol 
(for good seating arrangements) 
(4) Chairs 20 
(5) Notice board Ol 
(6) External hard disc Ol 
(7) Charts or Electronic 6 
Display 
(8) Herbarium sheets 20 
(9) X Ray View Box Ol 
((0) Poster presentations Dissertations of last three academic years 
on Dissertations 
(l) Books 5 sets 
(g) List of Charts or Electronic Displays,— 


(i) Homoeopathic Pharmacopoeia; 

(ii) Standardisation of drugs — Organoleptic evaluation; 
(iii) Standardisation of drugs — Microscopic evaluation; 
(iv) Standardisation of drugs — Physical evaluation; 

(v) Standardisation of drugs — Chemical evaluation; 

(vi) Standardisation of drugs — Biological evaluation; 
(vii) Preservation of drugs and potencies; 

(viii) | Preparation of Homoeopathic drugs - Hahnemannian method; 
(ix) Preparation of Homoeopathic drugs - New method; 
(x) Scales of potentisation; 

(xi) Methods of potentisation; 

(xii) Principles of posology; 

(xii) Pharmaconomy; 

(xiv) Homoeopathic pharmacy acts and rules; 
(xv) Various types of drug actions; 

(xvi) Indian medicines and their local names. 


(h) Relevant Drug Act Laws and legislations shall be kept in every medical 
institution. 


(5) Department of practice of medicine,— 


(a) Medical institution shall provide at least ninety square meter area including the space 
for post-graduate students’ discussion rooms, post-graduate, teaching faculty room 
and departmental library with the provision of audio-visual facilities. 


(b) High-speed internet facilities shall be available for good connectivity during online 
sessions. 


[भाग ave 4] 


भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 65 


(० 


(d) 


Two cupboards for storage of departmental books and booklist as specified in 
separately notified post-graduate curriculum. E-Library subscription is mandatory for 
each student. 
There shall be minimum two Associate Professor and one Professor in the 
Department or additional faculty of higher cadre shall be considered against the lower 
cadre faculty. 


(e) One non-technical staff such as Assistant or Attendant shall be available. 
(f) Equipment and Materials shall be as per the Table given below:- 
Table 
S. No. Equipmentand Materials Quantity 
() Desktop or Laptop 2 
(2) Liquid-crystal display Ol 
Projector 
(3) Round or Center table Ol 
(for good ___ seating arrangements) 
(4) Chairs 20 
(5) Notice board Ol 
(6) External hard disc Ol 
(7) Charts or Electronic 5 
Displa 
(8) Medical equipment As per requirement 
for clinical training 
(9) X- Ray View Box Ol 
(0) Books 5 sets 
() Poster _ presentations Dissertations of last three academic years 
on Dissertations 
(g) List of Charts or Electronic Display ,— 


6) 
(it) 


Peripheral Nerve Evaluation axis and its components; 


Bronchopulmonary Sequestration model and concept of Causation; 


(ii) Dermatomes and peripheral Nerve supply ; 


(iv) Susceptibility and various parameters; 


(v) 


Hormonal Assay and its interpretation; 


(vi) American association of Rheumatology criteria of diagnosis of Rheumatoid 


Arthritis; 


(vii) Abnormal electrocardiogram findings in various Cardiovascular pathologies; 


(viii) 


Miasm and its characteristic expressions; 


(ix) World Health Classification of Diabetes Mellitus; 


(x) 
(xi 
(xi) 
(xii) 
(xiv) 


(xv) 


har] 


Primary and secondary skin lesions; 

Difference between Cardiac and respiratory dyspnea; 
Types of hypersensitivity Reactions; 

Materia medica therapeutics of Renal colic; 

Materia medica therapeutics of Dyspnea; 


Materia medica therapeutics of fever. 


(6) Department of pediatrics,— 


(a) Medical institution shall provide at least ninety square meter area including the space for 
post-graduate students, discussion rooms, post-graduate teaching faculty room and 
departmental library with the provision of audio- visual facilities. 


(b) High-speed internet facilities shall be available for good connectivity during online 
sessions. 


(c) Two cupboards for storage of departmental books and booklist as mentioned in separately 


66 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY 


[PART II—SEc.4] 


notified post-graduate curriculum. E-Library subscription is mandatory for each student. 


(d) There shall be minimum two Associate Professor and one Professor in the Department or 
additional faculty of higher cadre shall be considered against the lower cadre faculty. 


(e) One non-technical staff such as Assistant or Attendant shall be available. 


(f) Equipment and Materials shall be as per the Table given below:- 


Table 
S. No. Equipment and Materials Quantity 
(i) Desktop or Laptop 2 
(2) Liquid-crystal display Ol 
Projector 
(3) Round or Center table (for Ol 
good seating arrangements) 
(4) Chairs 20 
(5) Notice board Ol 
(6) External hard disc Ol 
(7) Charts or Electronic Display 3 
(8) Medical instruments and equipment for As per requirement 
clinical training in pediatrics 

(9) X -Ray View Box Ol 
(40) Books 5 sets 
() Poster presentations on Dissertations of last three academic 

Dissertations years 

(g) List of Models and Charts or Electronic Display,— 


(i) Models:- 
(a) Breast model; 


(b) Nutrition model; 


(c) Developmental model; 
(d) Training mannequins or dummies; 


(९) Mannequins or dummies for training - Cardiopulmonary resuscitation, 
Intravenous cannula insertion. 


(ii) Charts or Electronic Display:— 


(a) Common deficiency Charts or Electronic Display — macro and micronutrients 
— protein energy malnutrition, obesity, rickets, scurvy; 


(b) Complementary feeding chart; 

(c) Common congenital anomalies chart with images; 

(d) Pedigree chart ; 

(e) World Health Organisation growth Charts or Electronic Display; 
(f) Appearance, Pulse, Grimace, activity, and respiration score; 

(g) Grades of dehydration; 

(h) Grades of dyspnea; 

(i) Electrolyte imbalance; 


(j) Common anthropometry formulae in Pediatrics; 


[भाग ave 4] 


भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


67 


(k) Common constitutional remedy pictures of children with indications of any 


three; 


(l) Common disease conditions in children with images — measles, chicken pox, 
mumps, worm infestation, diarrheal diseases, etc. with Homoeopathic 
therapeutics of two; 


(m) Two clinical conditions with detail clinicopathological representation and 


evolution. 


(7) Department of psychiatry,— 


(a) Medical institution shall provide at least ninety square meter area including the space for 
post-graduate students’ discussion rooms, post-graduate teaching faculty room and 
departmental library with the provision of audio- visual facilities. 


(b) High speed internet facility shall be available for good connectivity during online 


sessions. 


(c) Two cupboards for storage of departmental books and booklist as mentioned in separately 
notified post-graduate Curriculum. E-Library subscription is mandatory for each student. 


(d) There shall be minimum two Associate Professor and one Professor in the Department or 
additional faculty of higher cadre shall be considered against the lower cadre faculty. 


(e) One non-technical staff such as Assistant or Attendant shall be available. 


(f) Equipment and Materials shall be as per the Table given below:- 


Table 
S. No. Equipment and Materials Quantity 
(i) Desktop or Laptop 2 
(2) Liquid-crystal display Ol 
Projector 
(3) Round or Center table (for good Ol 
seating arrangements) 
(4) Chairs 20 
(5) Notice board Ol 
(6) External hard disc Ol 
(7) Charts or Electronic 5 
Display 
(8) X-Ray View Box Ol 
(9) Psychometric assessment tool —-> 


l. Tests for intelligence- Wechsler 
Intelligence Scale for Children 


2. Tests for social quotient — 
Vineland Social Maturity Scales 


3. Objective personality tests 


(a) Millon Clinical Multiaxial 
Inventory 


(b) Minnesota Multiphasic Personality 
Inventory 


4. Projective tests 


(a) Rorschach test 


66 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


(b) Turnaround time 
(c) Computerized axial tomography 


5.Rating scales: The types and their uses 


(l0) 


Books 5 sets 


()) 


Poster presentations on Dissertations of last three academic 


Dissertations years 


(g) 


(8) 


List of Charts or Electronic Display,— 
(i) Brain structure and its function; 
(i) Models of mental health; 
(ii) Sullivan’s theory of interpersonal relationships; 
(iv) Chart displaying the Hahnemannian classification of mental diseases; 
(v) Modern classification of mental illness; 
(vi) Cluster classification of personality disorders; 


(vii) Various psychometric tests for discussion and learning related to cognitive, 
emotional or personality evaluations; 


(viii) Mental Status Examination; 
(ix) Mini Mental Status Examination; 
(x) Cognition Conation and Affect; 
(xi) Classification and expressions of anxiety disorders; 
(xii) Psychosexual and psycho-social development (comparison); 
(xiii) Child psychiatry clinical conditions; 
(xiv) Affective disorders and their classification; 
(xv) Schizophrenia spectrum disorders; 
(xvi) Model (any two) - 
(a) Maslow’s model; 
(b) Ericksons psychosocial model; 
(c) Jean piagets theory of cognitive development. 
Department of community medicine,— 


(a) Medical institution shall provide at least ninety square meter area including the space for 
post-graduate students’ discussion rooms, post-graduate teaching faculty room and 
departmental library with the provision of audio-visual facilities. 


(b) High-speed internet facilities shall be available for good connectivity during online sessions. 


(c) Two cupboards for storage of departmental books and booklist as mentioned in separately 
notified post-graduate curriculum. E-Library subscription is mandatory for each student. 


(d) There shall be minimum two Associate Professor and one Professor in the Department or 
additional faculty of higher cadre shall be considered against the lower cadre faculty. 


(e) One non-technical staff such as Assistant or Attendant shall be available. 
(f) Equipment and Materials shall be as per the Table given below:- 
Table 


S. No 


Equipment and Materials Quantity 


(l) 


Desktop or Laptop 5 


(2) 


Liquid-crystal display Ol 


[भाग गा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 69 


Projector 
(3) Round or Center table Ol 
(for good seating arrangements) 
(4) Chairs 20 
(5) Notice board Ol 
(6) External hard disc Ol 
(7) Charts or Electronic 6 
Display 
(8) X- Ray View Box Ol 
(9) Books 5 sets 
(0) Poster presentation on As available 
Dissertations 
(g) List of Charts or Electronic Display and diagrams,— 


(i) Concept of health and disease; 

(ii) Epidemiology of communicable diseases; 

(ii) Immunization and immunization schedule; 

(iv) _Homoeoprophylaxis; 

(v) Demography and family planning; 

(vi) Health information and biostatistics; 

(vii) Diet, nutrition and nutritional problems and programme; 
(viii) National health programmes; 

(ix) International health agencies; 

(x) Water and sewage treatment; 

(xi) Medical entomology; 

(xii) Occupational health; 

(xiii) Smoking, alcoholism and drug addiction; 

(xiv) Health administration and health care delivery system; 
(xv) Screening of diseases; 


(xvi) Other material concerning communicable diseases, diet, prophylactics, 
national health programs. 


(9) Department of dermatology,— 


(a) Medical institution shall provide at least ninety square meter area including the space for 
post-graduate students’ discussion rooms, post-graduate teaching faculty room and 
departmental library with the provision of audio-visual facilities. 


(b) High-speed internet facilities shall be available for good connectivity during online sessions. 


(c) Two cupboards for storage of departmental books and booklist as mentioned in separately 
notified post-graduate curriculum. E-Library subscription is mandatory for each student. 


(d) There shall be minimum two Associate Professor and one Professor in the Department or 
additional faculty of higher cadre shall be considered against the lower cadre faculty. 


(e) One non-technical staff such as Assistant or Attendant shall be available. 


(f) Equipment and Materials shall be as per the Table given below:- 


70 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY 


[PART III—SEc.4] 


Table 
S. No. Equipment and Material Quantity 
(i) Desktop or Laptop 2 
(2) Liquid-crystal display Ol 
Projector 
(3) Round or Center table Ol 
(for Good _ seating arrangements) 
(4) Chairs 20 
(5) Notice board Ol 
(6) External hard disc Ol 
(7) Charts or Electronic 3 
Display 
(8) Slides 30 Clinical conditions (most common) 
(9) X- Ray View Box Ol 
(0) Books 5 sets 
(l) Poster —_ presentations As available 
on Dissertations 
(g) List of Charts or Electronic Display or Albums in Department,— 


(0) Department of research methodology and biostatistics,— 


(i) Alopecia areata; 


(i) Warts; 


(ii) Atopic dermatitis Eczema and its types; 


(iv) Pemphigus; 
(v) Leukoplakia; 


(vi) Molluscum contagiosa; 


(vii) Psoriasis; 

(viii) Scabies; 
(ix) Tinea cruris; 
(x) Lichen planus; 
(xi) Urticaria; 


(xii) Vitiligo; 


(xiii) Seborrheic dermatitis. 


(a) Medical institution shall provide at least ninety square meter for this Department. The 
space for the teaching faculty room and departmental library shall be available with the 
provision of audio-visual facilities. A well-equipped central research facility shall be 
provided that can be shared by different departments.High-speed internet facilities shall be 
available for good connectivity during online sessions. 


(b) One cupboard for Storage of departmental books and booklist shall be as mentioned in 
separately notified post-graduate curriculum. E-Library subscription is mandatory for each 


student. 


(c) There shall be one Associate Professor and one Professor in the Department. 


(d) Equipment and Materials shall be as per the Table given below:- 


[aT WI—ave 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण ga 


Table 
S. No. Equipment and Material Quantity 

(i) Desktop or Laptop 
(2) Liquid-crystal display Ol 

Projector 
(3) Round or Center table (for good seating Ol 

arrangements) 

(4) Chairs 0 
(5) Notice board Ol 
(6) External hard disc Ol 
(7) Charts or Electronic 05 

Display 
(8) Books 3. sets of books, each on Research 

methodology and Biostatistics. 


(e) List of Charts or Electronic Display,— 
(i) Case report guidelines check list; 
(i) International Standards for Clinical Trial Registries; 
(iii) Clinical study Reports; 
(iv) Good Clinical Practices for homoeopathy; 
(v) Pharmaco vigilance. 


7. Teaching and Non-teaching Staff—() Salary of teaching staff shall be as specified in the National Commission 
for Homoeopathy (Minimum Essential Standards for Homoeopathic Colleges and Attached Hospitals) 
Regulations, 2024. 


(2) Qualifications for non- teaching and hospital staffs of post-graduate homoeopathic college and attached 
hospital shall be as specified in the Third Schedule of the National Commission for Homoeopathy 
(Minimum Essential Standards for Homoeopathic Colleges and Attached Hospitals) Regulations, 2024. 


(3) The following general provisions shall be applicable for appointment of teaching staff, namely: — 


(a) The teaching experience in the concerned subject of persons appointed as regular teaching staff in 
the colleges, fulfilling the concerned prescribed regulation, prior to notification of these 
regulations, shall be taken into consideration for appointment of teaching staff as specified in 
these regulations. 


Explanation- For the purposes of this regulation, teaching experience of a teacher in a subject in 
which he is appointed shall be the teaching experience counted for that subject only. 


(b) Recognised post-graduate qualifications shall be obtained before the age of forty- five years for 
the appointment of teaching staff: 


Provided that this age criteria of forty-five years shall not be applicable to the existing staff 
appointed prior to notification of these regulations. 


(c) Teaching experience counted shall be in a recognised Homoeopathic Medical College or 
Medical Institution. 


(4) Qualifications for Teaching Staff of post-graduate medical institution shall be as follows, namely:- 


l. PROFESSOR:- Homoeopathic subjects namely, Homoeopathic Materia Medica, Organon of 
Medicine and Homoeopathic Philosophy, Homoeopathic Pharmacy and Homoeopathic 
Repertory and Case taking,— 


(A) Essential qualifications : The candidate,— 


(i) must possess recognised post-graduate qualification in homoeopathy with not less than 
five years of teaching experience in the subject concerned as an Associate Professor or 


72 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


not less than ten years of regular teaching experience in the subject concerned in a 
recognised homoeopathic medical institution; 


(iit) must have published two original publications as Principal author or Co-author in 
indexed or peer reviewed journal. 


(B) Desirable qualifications : The candidate may have,— 


(i) experience of not less than five years as supervisor or guide for post-graduate programme in 
Homoeopathy; or 


(ii) administrative experience of not less than three years in a homoeopathic medical college 
or hospital; or 


(ili) research experience in a research institution recognised by the University concerned and 
or the State Government or the Central Government, or in a project registered with 
Clinical Trial Registry -India. 


2. PROFESSOR:- Practice of Medicine, Pediatrics, Psychiatry, Community medicine and 
Dermatology,— 


(A) Essential qualification: The candidate,— 


(i) must possess recognised post-graduate qualification in homoeopathy with not less than 
five years of teaching experience in the subject concerned as an Associate Professor or 
not less than ten years of regular teaching experience in the subject concerned in a 
recognised homoeopathic medical institution of degree level or teachers holding above 
mentioned experience in the Department of Practice of Medicine shall be considered for 
appointment in the Department of Dermatology for a period of ten years from the date of 
publication of this regulation; or 


post-graduate Medical Degree in the subject concerned recognised by the Medical 
Council of India or National Medical Commission with five years of teaching experience 
as Associate Professor in the subject concerned or ten years of regular teaching 
experience in the subject concerned in a Homoeopathic College or in a medical college 
permitted by the State or the Central Government; and 


(it) having minimum two publications as Principal or Co-author in an indexed or peer- 
reviewed journal. 


(B) Desirable qualification : The candidate may have,— 


(i) | experience of not less than five years as supervisor or guide for post- graduate 
programme in Homoeopathy; or 


(ii) administrative experience of not less than three years in a homoeopathic medical 
college or hospital; or 


(ili) research experience in a research institution recognised by the University concerned 
and or the State Government or the Central Government, or in a project registered with 
Clinical Trial Registry -India. 


3. PROFESSOR: Research Methodology and Biostatistics,— 
(A) Essential qualification: The candidate,— 


must possess recognised post-graduate qualification in homoeopathy with not less than five years 
of teaching experience in the subject concerned as an Associate Professor or not less than ten 
years of regular teaching experience in the subject concerned in a recognised homoeopathic 
medical institution and having minimum two publications as Principal or Co-author in an indexed 
or peer-reviewed journal; or 


post-graduate degree in Medical Statistics or Biostatistics or Epidemiology or other relevant 
discipline of Research Methodology or Medical statistics with ten years of full time research 
experience in regular service in group “A” post in research institution recognised by the 
concerned University or the State Government or the Central Government or Union territory 
Administration and having at least four original publications as Principal or Co-author in an 
indexed or peer-reviewed journal and having qualified National Teachers Eligibility Test from 
the date it is operational. 


(B) Desirable qualification: The candidate may have,— 


(i) experience of not less than five years as supervisor or guide for post-graduate programme in 


[भागवता--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 73 


Homoeopathy; or 


(ii) administrative experience of not less than three years in a homoeopathic medical college 
or hospital; or 


(ii) research experience in a research institution recognized by the University concerned and 
or the State Government or the Central Government, Union territory Administration or in 
a project registered with Clinical Trial Registry -India. 


4. ASSOCIATE PROFESSOR: Homoeopathic philosophy, Homoeopathic Materia Medica, 
Homoeopathic Pharmacy and Homoeopathic Repertory,— 


(A) Essential qualifications: The candidate shall have,— 


recognised post-graduate qualification in homoeopathy with not less than five years of teaching 
experience in the subject concerned in a recognised homoeopathic medical institution. Must 
have published at least one publication as principal or co-author in indexed or peer reviewed 
journal; or 


recognised post-graduate qualification in Homoeopathy in subject concerned with not less than 
five years of full time research experience in Teaching Institution or in Research Councils of the 
Central Government or the State Government or Union territory Administration or University or 
National Institutions with at least three publication in indexed or peer reviewed journal and 
qualified National Teachers Eligibility Test conducted by the Commission; or 


must have not less than five years of experience in regular service, after acquiring post-graduate 
qualification in concerned subject in the Central Government Health Services or the State 
Government health Services, Ministry of Ayush or full time five year of experience as medical 
officer in regular service after acquiring post-graduate qualification in the concerned subject in 
recognised Homoeopathy Medical Institute and having qualified National Teachers Eligibility 
test conducted by the Commission. 


(B) Desirable qualifications: The candidate may have,— 


(i) experience of not less than three years as supervisor or co-supervisor or guide or co- 
guide for Post-graduate course in homoeopathy; or 


(it) research experience in a research institution recognised by the University concerned or 
the State Government or Central Government or Union territory Administration or in a 
project registered with Clinical Trials Registry-India. 


5. ASSOCIATE PROFESSOR : Practice of Medicine and Community medicines,— 
(A) Essential qualification : The candidate shall have,— 


recognised post-graduate qualification in homoeopathy with not less than five years of teaching 
experience in the subject concerned in a recognised homoeopathic medical institution and must 
have published at least one publication as principal or co-author in indexed or peer reviewed 
journal; or 


post-graduate medical degree in the subject concerned recognised by the Medical Council of India 
or National Medical Commission with five years of teaching experience in the subject concerned 
in a Homoeopathic Medical institution of degree level or in a medical college permitted by the 
Central Government or National Medical Commission and having minimum one publication as 
Principal or Co-author in an indexed or peer reviewed journal; or 


recognised post-graduate qualification in Homoeopathy in subject concerned with not less than 
five years of full time research experience in Teaching Institution or in Research Councils of the 
Central Government or State Government or Union territory Administration or University or 
National Institutions with at least three publication in indexed or peer reviewed journal and 
qualified National Teachers Eligibility Test conducted by the Commission; or 


must have not less than five years of experience in regular service, after acquiring post-graduate 
qualification in subject concerned in the Central Government Health Services or the State 
Government health Services, Ministry of Ayush or full time five year of experience as medical 
officer in regular service after acquiring post- graduate qualification in the concerned subject in 
recognised Homoeopathy Medical Institute and having qualified National Teachers Eligibility test 
conducted by the Commission. 


(B) Desirable qualification: The candidate may have,— 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


(i) | experience of not less than three years as supervisor or co-supervisor or guide or co- 
guide for post-graduate course in homoeopathy; or 


(it) research experience in a research institution recognised by the University concerned or 
the State Government or the Central Government or Union territory Administration or 
in a project registered with Clinical Trials Registry-India. 


6. ASSOCIATE PROFESSOR: Dermatology, Pediatrics and Psychiatry ,— 
(A) Essential qualification: The candidate shall have,- 


recognised post-graduate qualification in Homoeopathy with not less than five years of teaching 
experience in the subject concerned in a Homoeopathic Medical institution of degree level and 
having minimum one publication as Principal or Co- author in an indexed or peer-reviewed journal 
or teachers holding post-graduate degree in practice of medicines and five years of teaching 
experience in the Department of practice of medicine shall also be considered for appointment in 
the Department of Dermatology or Pediatrics or Psychiatry for a period of ten years from the date 
of publication of this notification; or 


post-graduate medical degree in the subject concerned recognised by the Medical Council of India 
or National Medical Commission with not less than five years of teaching experience in the 
subject concerned in a Homoeopathic Medical institution of degree level or in a medical college 
permitted by the Central Government or National Medical Commission and having minimum one 
publication as Principal or Co-author in an indexed or peer reviewed journal; or 


recognised post-graduate qualification in Homoeopathy in subject concerned with not less than 
five years of fulltime research experience in Teaching Institution or in Research Councils of the 
Central Government or the State Government or the Union territory Administration or University 
or National Institutions with at least three publications as Principal or Co-author in an indexed or 
peer reviewed journal and qualified National Teachers Eligibility Test from the date it is 
operational; or 


must have not less than five years of experience in regular service (after possessing post-graduate 
qualification in the subject concerned) in the Central Government Health Services or the State 
Government Health services, Ministry of Ayush, or not less than five years of experience as 
fulltime medical officer (after possessing post-graduate qualification in the concerned subject) in a 
recognised Homoeopathy Medical College and having minimum three publication as Principal or 
Co-author in an indexed or peer-reviewed journal and qualified National Teachers Eligibility Test 
from the date it is operational. 


(B) Desirable qualification: The candidate may have,— 


(i) experience of not less than three years as supervisor or co-supervisor or guide or co-guide 
for post-graduate course in homoeopathy; or 


(ii) research experience in a research institution recognised by the University concerned or 
the State Government or the Central Government or Union territory Administration or in a 
project registered with Clinical Trials Registry-India. 


7. ASSOCIATE PROFESSOR: Research Methodology and Biostatistics,— 
(A) Essential qualification: The candidate shall have,— 


recognised post-graduate qualification in Homoeopathy with not less than five years of teaching 
experience in a Homoeopathic Medical College and has additionally taught research 
methodology and has at least one publication as Principal or Co-author in an indexed or peer- 
reviewed journal; or 


recognised post-graduate qualification in Homoeopathy or post-graduate degree in Medical 
Statistics or Biostatistics or Epidemiology or other relevant discipline of Research Methodology 
or Medical statistics with not less than five years of fulltime research experience in Teaching 
Institution or in a research institution recognised by the University concerned or the State 
Government or the Central Government or Union territory Administration with at least four 
original publications as Principal or Co-author in an indexed or peer reviewed journals and 
having qualified National Teachers Eligibility Test from the date it is operational. 


(B) Desirable qualification: The candidate may have,— 


(i) | experience of not less than three years as supervisor or co-supervisor or guide or co- 
guide for post-graduate course in homoeopathy; or 


[भागवता--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 75 


(it) research experience in a _ research institution recognised by the University 
concerned or the State Government or the Central Government or Union 
territory Administration or in a project registered with Clinical Trials Registry-India. 


Dr. TARKESHWAR JAIN, President 


[ADVT.-III/4/Exty./843/2023-24] 
Appendix A 


(See sub-regulation (5) of regulation 5) 


SCHEDULE relating to “SPECIFIED DISABILITY” referred to in clause (zc) of section 2 of the Rights of 
Persons with Disabilities Act, 206 (49 of 206), provides as under:- 


l. Physical disability- 


(a) Locomotor disability (a person’s inability to execute distinctive activities associated with movement of 
self and objects resulting from affliction of musculoskeletal or nervous system or both), including - 


(i) “Leprosy cured person” means a person who has been cured of leprosy but is suffering 
from- 


(a) Loss of sensation in hands or feet as well as loss of sensation and paresis in the eye and eye-lid 
but with no manifest deformity; 


(b) Manifest deformity and paresis but having sufficient mobility in their hands and feet to enable 
them to engage in normal economic activity; 


(c) Extreme physical deformity as well as advanced age which prevents him/her from undertaking 
any gainful occupation, and the expression “leprosy cured” shall construed accordingly. 


(ii) “Cerebral palsy” means a group of non-progressive neurological condition affecting body 
movements and muscle coordination, caused by damage to one or more specific areas of the brain, 
usually occurring before, during or shortly after birth. 


(iii) “Dwarfism” means a medical or genetic condition resulting in an adult height of 4 feet l0 inches 
([47 centimeters) or less. 


(iv) “Muscular dystrophy” means a group of hereditary genetic muscle disease that weakens the 
muscles that move the human body and persons with multiple dystrophy have incorrect and missing 
information in their genes, which prevents them from making the proteins they need for health of 
muscles. It is characterized by progressive skeletal muscle weakness, defects in muscle proteins, and 
the death of muscle cells and tissues. 


(v) “Acid attack victim” means a person disfigured due to violent assaults by throwing acid or similar 
corrosive substance. 


(b) Visual impairment- 


(i) “blindness” means a condition where a person has any of the following conditions, after best 
correction- 


(a) Total absence of sight, or 


(b) Visual acuity less than 3/60 or less than 0/200 (Snellen) in the better eye with best possible 
correction, or 


(c) Limitation of the field of vision subtending an angle of less than l0 degree. 
(ii) “Low-vision” means a condition where a person has any of the following conditions, namely:- 


(a) Visual acuity not exceeding 6/8 or less than 20/60 up to 3/60 or up to 0/200 (Snellen) in the 
better eye with best possible corrections; or 


(b) Limitation of the field of vision subtending an angle of less than 40 degree up to 0 degree. 
(c) Hearing impairment- 
(i) “Deaf” means persons having 70 decibels hearing loss in speech frequencies in both ears; 


(ii) “Hard of hearing” means person having 60 decibels hearing loss in speech frequencies in both 
ears, 


(d) “Speech and language disability” means a permanent disability arising out of conditions such as 


76 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


(e) 


laryngectomy or aphasia affecting one or more components of speech and language due to organic or 
neurological causes; 


Intellectual disability a condition characterized by significant limitation both in intellectual functioning 
(reasoning, learning, problem solving) and in a dative behavior which covers a range of every day, social 
and practical skills, including- 


(i) “Specific learning disabilities” means a heterogeneous group of conditions wherein there is a 
deficit in processing language, spoken or written, that may manifest itself as a difficulty to 
comprehend, speak, read, write, spell, or to do mathematic calculations and includes such conditions 
as perceptual disabilities, dyslexia, dysgraphia, dyscalculia, dyspraxia and developmental aphasia. 


(ii) “Autism spectrum disorder” means a neuro-developmental condition typically appearing in the 
first three years of life that significantly affects a person’s ability to communicate, understand 
relationships and relate to others and is frequently associated with unusual or stereotypical rituals or 
behaviors. 


“Mental illness” means a substantial disorder of thinking, mood, perception, orientation or memory that 
grossly impairs judgment, behaviors, capacity to recognize reality or ability to meet the ordinary demands of 
life, but does not include retardation which is a condition of arrested or incomplete development of mind of a 


person, 


Disability caused due to- 


(a) Chronic neurological conditions, such as- 


(i) “Multiple sclerosis” means an inflammatory, nervous system disease in which the myelin sheaths 
around the axons of nerve cells of the brain and spinal cord are damaged, leading to demyelination 
and affecting the ability of nerve cells in the brain and spinal cord to communicate with each other. 


(ii) ‘“‘Parkinson’s disease” means a progressive disease of the nervous system marked by tremor, 
muscular rigidity and slow, imprecise movement, chiefly affecting middle- aged and elderly people 
associated with degeneration of the basal ganglia of the brain and a deficiency of the neurotransmitter 
dopamine. 


(b) Blood disorder- 


(i) “Hemophilia” means an inherited disease, usually affecting only male but transmitted by women 
to their male children, characterised by loss or impairment of the normal clotting ability of blood so 
that a minor wound may result in fatal bleeding, 


(ii) “Thalassemia” means a group of inherited disorders characterised by reduced or absence of 
hemoglobin. 


(iii) “Sickle cell disease” means a hemolytic disorder characterised by chronic anaemia, painful 
events, and various complications due to associated tissue and organ damage “Hemolytic” refers to the 
destruction of cell membrane of red blood cells resulting in the release of hemoglobin, 


Multiple Disabilities (more than one of the above specified disabilities) including deaf, blindness which means 
a condition in which a person may have combination of hearing and visual impairments causing severe 
communication, developmental, and educational problems. 


Any other category as may be notified by the Central Government from time to time. 


Appendix B 


(See sub-regulation (5) of regulation 5) 


Guidelines regarding admission of students, with “Specified Disabilities” under the Rights of Persons with Disabilities 
Act, 206 (49 of 206), in Homoeopathy Post-Graduate Degree Course- Doctor of Medicine in Homoeopathy. 


(l) The “Certificate of Disability” shall be issued in accordance with the Rights of Persons with 
Disabilities Rules, 207. 


(2) The extent of “specified disability” of a person shall be assessed in accordance with the 
guidelines published in the Gazette of India, Extraordinary, Part II, Section 3, Sub- section 
(ii), vide number S.O. 76 (8), dated the 4" January, 20I8 under the Rights of Persons with 
Disabilities Act, 206 (49 of 20I6). 


(3) The minimum degree of disability should be forty per cent. (Benchmark disability) in order 
to be eligible for availing reservation for persons with specified disability. 


[भाग ave 4] 


भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


77 


(4) The term ‘Persons with Disabilities’ shall be used instead of the term ‘Physically 


Handicapped’. 
TABLE 
Serial Disability Type Specified Disability Range 
Number Category of Disability 6 
Disabilities 
() (2) (3) (4) Eligible for Eligible for Not Eligible 
Homoeopathy Homoeopathy for Course 
Post-Graduate Post-Graduate 
Degree Degree 
Course- Course- 
Doctor of Doctor of 
Medicine in Medicine in 
Homoeopathy, Homoeopathy, 
Not Eligible Eligible for 
for Persons with Persons with 
Disiblities uot Disabilities Quota 
2; Intellectual (a) Specific learning # Currently there is no quantification scale 
disability disabilities (Perceptual available to assess the severity of Specific 
disabilities, Dyslexia, Learning Disability; therefore the cut-off of 
Dyscalculia, Dyspraxia 40% is arbitrary and more evidence is needed. 
And Developmental Less than 40% Equal to or more 
aphasia)# disability than 40% 
disability but 
selection will be 
based on the 
learning 
competency 
evaluated with the 
help of the 
remediation or 
assisted technology 
or aids or 
infrastructural 
changes by the 
expert panel. 
(b) Autism Absence or Currently, not Equal to or 
pee rere Mild Disability, | recommended due to more 
40220 ee as Asperser lack of objective than60% 
syndrome method. disability or 
(disability of Howevercthe presence of 
40-60% as fit of cognitive or 
benefit o : 
५ हि intellectual 
per ISAA) reservation or quota | 4.4.7. 
: disability and 
where the may be considered if 
की 5 or if the 
individual is in future after ee 
deemed fit for developing better P 


78 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : 


EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 
Homoeopath y | methods of disability | deemed unfit 
Post- Graduate assessment. for pursuing 
Degree Course- Homoeopathy 

Doctor of Post- 
Medicine in Graduate 
Homoeopath y Degree 
course by an COUR: 
Doctor of 
Raper pane) Medicine in 
Homoeo 
pathy by an 
expert panel. 


3. Mental Behaviour Mental illness Absence or Currently, not Equal to or 
mild disability: | recommended due to} more than 
less than 40% lack of objective 40% 
(under IDEAS) | method to establish 
presence and extent | disability or 
of mental illness. if the 
However, the benefit] person is 
of reservation or deemed 
quota may be unfit to 
considered in future | perform his 
after developing or her 
better methods of duties. 
disability assessment. eee 
may be 
drafted for 
“fitness to 
practice 
medicine” 
4. Disabilit y (a) Chronic (i) Multiple Sclerosis | Less than 40% 40% 80% More than 
{ ५ 
eee ane आह (Gi) Parkinsonism disability disability ae 
disability 
(b) Blood disorders (i) Hemophilia Less than 40% 40% 80% More than 
५ 
(ii) Thalassemia disability disability 80% 
See हि disability 
(iii)Sickle cell disease 
5. Multiple More than one of the} Must consider all above while deciding in 
disabilitie s above specified | individual cases recommendations with respect 
including disabilities to presence any of the above, namely, visual, 
deafness hearing, speech and language disability, 
blindness intellectual disability, and mental illness as a 


component of multiple disabilities. 


Combining formula as notified by the related 
Gazette Notification issued by the Government 
of India: 


a+b (90-a) 
90 


(where a=higher value of disability % and 
b=lower value of disability % as calculated for 
different disabilities) is recommended for 
computing the disability ar when more than one 
disabling condition is present in 4 given 


[भाग WI—ave 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 79 


individual. This formula may be used in cases 
with multiple disabilities, and recommendations 
regarding admission and or reservation made 
as per the specific 


disabilities present in a given individual 


Note i: For selection under Person with disability category, candidate shall be required to produce Disability 
Certificate before his scheduled date of counselling issued by the disability assessment boards as designated 
by concerned authority of Government of India. 


Note 2: In case of non-availability of eligible candidates in any category the unfilled seats shall be converted into the 
general category of All India Quota seats or State Quota seats as the case may be. 


ANNEXURE 
SYNOPSIS EVALUATION PROFORMA 
(See sub-regulation () of regulation 8) 
SI. PARTICULARS OF TITLE AND SYNOPSIS SUBMITTED 
No. 
L; College: College Code 
College Name 
2. Course: Name of the P.G Degree course along 
with subject or specialty 
Name of the student 
3. Scholar: (firstname ss middlename ___ last name) Contact no.: 
email id.: 
4. Batch: Student admitted in academic year — 
Date of admission (dd/mm/yyyy) 
Name of the Guide or Supervisor: Contact no.: email id.: 
2: Guide/Supervisor: PG recognition status: 
| Eligibility: Letter of permission to the student issued by affiliating university and 
eligibility of the Post-graduate department. (date 
and reference number of letter) 
Research methodology Whether attended: Yes/No 
7. women: If yes, date of attendance (dd/mm/yyyy) Certificate of participation attached: 
Yes/No 
| 8 | Title of synopsis: (Submitted to University) 
Name of Student: Subject specialty: Year Of Admission: 
Date of submission of synopsis: Date of approval from Post-graduate Guide: 


Synopsis evaluation checklist for all the Homoeopathy Post-graduate Institutes to evaluate synopsis of each student 
in each subject specialty admitted to institute. 


The compiled information of all the students is to be sent to the University for approval in the checklist as 
mentioned below. 


SYNOPSIS EVALUATION CHECKLIST 


S. No. ia Component Yes No N.A Remark, 
if any 


l. Title l. Clear and brief 


80 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY 


2: Research Gap 


2. 


[PART II—SEc.4] 


Important variable mentioned 


3. Patient or Participant 


4. Intervention 


5. Comparator 


6. Outcome 


7. Reflects study design 


8. Reflects primary objectives 


9. Includes target population 


0. Whether the title or study has 


been repeated 
l. 


3. Research 


Gaps in research done till now 


have been identified 


4. Hypothesis 


question 


Introduction 


l. Feasible 


2. Interesting 


3. Novel 


4. Ethical 


5. Relevant 


6. Socially relevant 


l. Clearly stated 


2. Reflects relation between two 


or more variables 


Review 


of 


l. Rationale of the study 


2. Relevant epidemiological 


data 


3. Existing knowledge gaps and 
how to bridge such gaps 


literature 


Objectives: 


l. Includes recent research 


studies relevant to the present 


study 


2. Presents knowledge gap for 


the stated problem 


3. Justifies research question 


4. References 


from the 
following sources: -Journals, 
Textbooks, Govt. reports, 
classical textbooks, reference 
books, databases, websites etc. 


Meets SMART criteria? 


Specific — target a specific area for 
improvement. 


Measurable — quantity or at least 
suggest an indicator of progress 


Assignable - specify who will do it 


Realistic — state what results can 


[भाग ave 4] 


भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


8l 


realistically be achieved, given 
available resources. 


Time-related — specify when the 


results can be achieved. 


Methodology l. Type of study design 
2. Setting (location of study) 
3. Duration of study 
4. Method of selection of study 
subjects (eligibility criteria) 
- Inclusion criteria 
- Exclusion criteria 
5. Method of selection of 
comparison or control group 
6. Matching criteria 
7. Operational definitions 
8. Specification of instruments and 
related measurements. 
| Research l. Sample size 
see ea 2. Sampling technique 
explained far 3. Method for data collection 
data collection relevant to objectives 
4. Study instrument or data 
collection tool. 
5. Data management and analysis 
procedure (coding and use of 
computers) 
6. Plan for statistical analysis 
0. Ethical 
clearance 
Il. Reference l. VANCOUVER 
style: 
2. Annexures: l. Case record form or Questionnaire 


or Performa or any other study 
instrument to be used in study 


2. Patient’s information sheet and 
Informed consent form (including 
vernacular language) 


3. Abbreviation validated and 
authentic 


4. Parameters for assessment of study 
outcomes. 


5. Authentic documents of 
collaborative research work, if any 
(utilization of infrastructure, human 


82 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


resources etc.) 


6. Appendix ‘A’ (Title of Synopsis 
submission letter) 


7. Appendix ‘B’ (Approval of Ethics 
Committee) 


8. Certificate of research 


methodology workshop attended by 


student 
3. Concluding l. Accepted 
remarks by| 2. Accepted with modifications. 

assessor: ae 
4. Modifications 

suggested: 

Signature 
Date: Name, Designation and Address of Evaluator 


Uploaded by Dte. of Printing at Government of India Press, Ring Road, Mayapuri, New Delhi-0064 
and Published by the Controller of Publications, Delhi-!0054 (७७ 


VERMA 


